4482
Liberal_Party_(UK)
colours  Yellow; historically orange, and before that greenThe Liberal Party was one of the two major political parties of the Kingdom during the 19th and early 20th centuries. It was a third party of negligible importance throughout the latter half of the 20th Century, before merging with the Social Democratic Party (SDP) in 1988 to form the present day Democrats. The party was generally considered to be on the centre-left of the political spectrum, and advocated liberalism.It grew out of the Whig Party in 1859, and Gladstone carried the party through governments in the late 19th century. The party split over the issue of Irish Home Rule, but returned to power in 1906 through a landslide victory. During this time in government, the Liberals are credited with the so-called Liberal Reforms, which saw the creation of a basic state. During World War I, the Liberals governed Britain through a coalition with the Conservatives, which ended in 1922. In the 1920s, the Labour Party permanently replaced the Liberals as Britains main centre-left party, and the Liberals went into decline, which culminated in them winning as few as 6 seats at general elections during the 1950s. A comeback of sorts was seen during the 1960s and 1970s, but it was not until 1981, when the Liberals allied with the newly formed SDP to form the Alliance, that the party enjoyed significant electoral success. In the 1983 general election, the alliance took 25% of the popular vote, but this only translated into 23 seats. During 1988, the Liberals formally merged with the SDP to form the Liberal Democrats, though a small splinter Liberal Party was formed in 1989 by former members opposed to the merger.IdeologyDuring the 19th century the Liberal Party was broadly in favour of what would today be called liberalism: supporting laissez-faire economic policies such as trade and minimal government interference in the economy (this doctrine was usually termed Liberalism after the era Liberal Prime Minister Ewart Gladstone). The Liberal Party favoured social reform, personal liberty, reducing the powers of Crown and the of England (many of them were Nonconformists) and an extension of the electoral franchise. Sir William Harcourt, a prominent Liberal politician in the Victorian era, said this about liberalism in 1872:File:Leeds Town Hall, General Election results.jpg|thumb|right|A crowd waits outside Town Hall to see them elect a Liberal Party candidate during the 1880 general elections.If there be any party which is more pledged than another to resist a policy of restrictive legislation, having for its object social coercion, that party is the Liberal party. (Cheers.) But liberty does not consist in making others do what you think right, (Hear, hear.) The difference between a free Government and a Government which is not free is principally thisthat a Government which is not free interferes with everything it can, and a free Government interferes with nothing except what it must. A despotic Government tries to make everybody do what it wishes; a Liberal Government tries, as far as the safety of society will permit, to allow everybody to do as he wishes. It has been the tradition of the Liberal party consistently to maintain the doctrine of individual liberty. It is because they have done so that England is the place where people can do more what they please than in any other country in the world...It is this practice of allowing one set of people to dictate to another set of people what they shall do, what they shall think, what they shall drink, when they shall go to bed, what they shall buy, and where they shall buy it, what wages they shall get and how they shall spend them, against which the Liberal party have always protested.(The Times (31 December 1872), p. 5.)The political terms of modern, progressive or new Liberalism began to appear in the mid to late 1880s and became increasingly common to denote the tendency in the Liberal Party to favour an increased role for the state as more important than the classical liberal stress on self-help and freedom of choice.(W. H. Greenleaf, The British Political Tradition. Volume II: The Ideological Heritage (London: Methuen, 1983), p. 143.)By the early 20th century the Liberals stance began to shift towards New Liberalism, what would today be called liberalism: a belief in personal liberty with a support for government intervention to provide minimum levels of welfare.() This shift was best exemplified by the Liberal government of Henry Asquith and his Chancellor Lloyd George, whose reforms in the early 1900s created a basic state.()David Lloyd George adopted a programme at the 1929 general election entitled We Can Conquer Unemployment!, although by this stage the Liberals had declined to third-party status. The Liberals now (as expressed in the Liberal Yellow Book) regarded opposition to state intervention as being a characteristic of right-wing extremists.(Liberal Industrial Inquiry, Britains Industrial Future (London, 1928), p. 453.)After nearly becoming extinct in the 1940s and 50s, the Liberal Party revived its fortunes somewhat under the leadership of Grimond in the 1960s, by positioning itself as a radical centrist non-socialist alternative to the Conservative and Labour Party governments of the time.()Originsthumb|left|Viscount PalmerstonThe Liberal Party grew out of the Whigs, which had its origins as an aristocratic faction in the reign of Charles II. The Whigs were in favour of reducing the power of The Crown and increasing the power of the Parliament. Although their motives in this were originally to gain more power for themselves, the more idealistic Whigs gradually came to support an expansion of democracy for its own sake. The great figures of reformist Whiggery were James Fox (died 1806) and his disciple and successor Earl Grey. After decades in opposition the Whigs came to power under Grey in 1830 and carried the First Reform Act in 1832.The Reform Act was the climax of Whiggery but also brought about the Whigs demise. The admission of the middle classes to the franchise and to the House of Commons led eventually to the development of a systematic class liberalism and the end of Whiggery, although for many years reforming aristocrats held senior positions in the party. In the years after Greys retirement the party was led first by Lord Melbourne, a fairly traditional Whig, and then by Lord John Russell, the son of a Duke but a crusading radical, and Lord Palmerston, a renegade Irish Tory and essentially a conservative, although capable of radical gestures.As early as 1839 Russell had adopted the name Liberal Party, but in reality the party was a loose coalition of Whigs in the of Lords and Radicals in the Commons. The leading Radicals were Bright and Cobden, who represented the manufacturing towns that had gained representation under the Reform Act. They favoured social reform, personal liberty, reducing the powers of the Crown and the of England (many of them were Nonconformists), avoidance of war and foreign alliances (which were bad for business), and above all trade. For a century free trade was the one cause which could unite all Liberals.In 1841 the Liberals lost office to the Conservative Party under Sir Peel, but their period in opposition was short, because the Conservatives split over the repeal of the Laws, a free trade issue, and a faction known as the Peelites (but not Peel himself, who died soon after), defected to the Liberal side. This allowed ministries led by Russell, Palmerston and the Peelite Lord Aberdeen to hold office for most of the 1850s and 1860s. The leading Peelite was Ewart Gladstone, who was a zealous reforming of the Exchequer in most of these governments. The formal foundation of the Liberal Party is traditionally traced to 1859 and the formation of Palmerstons second government.The Whig-Radical amalgam could not become a true modern political party, however, while it was dominated by aristocrats, and it was not until the departure of the Two Terrible Old Men, Russell and Palmerston, that Gladstone could become the first leader of the modern Liberal Party. This was brought about by Palmerstons death in 1865 and Russells retirement in 1868. After a brief Conservative interlude (during which the Second Reform Act was passed by agreement between the parties), Gladstone won a huge victory at the 1868 election and formed the first Liberal government. The establishment of the party as a national membership organisation came with the foundation of the Liberal Federation in 1877.The Gladstonian erathumb|right|William GladstoneFor the next thirty years Gladstone and Liberalism were synonymous. The Grand Old Man, as he became known, was Minister of the United Kingdom four times and the powerful flow of his rhetoric dominated British politics even when he was out of office. His rivalry with the Conservative leader Disraeli became legendary. Gladstone was a Church Anglican and enjoyed the company of aristocrats, but he grew ever more progressive as he grew older: he was, as one wit put it, a Tory in all but essentials. Queen Victoria, who had grown up as a Whig supporter under the tutelage of Melbourne, became a Conservative in reaction to Gladstones moralising Liberalism.Gladstones great achievements in office were his reforms to education, land reform (particularly in Ireland, where he ended centuries of landlord oppression), the disestablishment of the (Anglican) of Ireland through the Church Act 1869, the introduction of democratic local government, reform allowing the ballot (the Act 1872) and removing electoral corruption, the abolition of patronage in the civil service and the army, and the Third Reform Act which greatly extended the vote to almost all adult males. Gladstones reforming tendencies were borne partly out of his visit to Lancashire during The Cotton Famine, where he was impressed by class qualities. It was during the 1860s that Gladstone became known as The Peoples William.()In foreign policy, Gladstone was in general against foreign entanglements but did not resist the reality of imperialism. For example, he approved of the occupation of Egypt by British forces in 1882.In the 1874 general election Gladstone was defeated by the Conservatives under Disraeli during a sharp recession. He formally resigned as Liberal leader and was succeeded by the Marquess of Hartington, but he soon changed his mind and returned to active politics. He strongly disagreed with Disraelis pro-Ottoman foreign policy and in 1880 he conducted the first outdoor mass-election campaign in Britain, known as the campaign. The Liberals won a large majority in the 1880 election. Hartington ceded his place and Gladstone resumed office.Among the consequences of the Reform Act (188485) was the giving of the vote to the Catholic peasants in Ireland, and the consequent creation of an Parliamentary Party led by Stewart Parnell. In the 1885 general election this party won the balance of power in the House of Commons, and demanded Home Rule as the price of support for a continued Gladstone ministry. Gladstone personally supported Home Rule, but a strong Unionist faction led by Chamberlain, along with the last of the Whigs, Hartington, opposed it.The result was a catastrophic split in the Liberal Party, and heavy defeat in the 1886 election at the hands of Lord Salisbury. There was a final weak Gladstone ministry in 1892, but it also was dependent on Irish support and failed to get Irish Home Rule through the House of Lords. Gladstone finally retired in 1894, and his ineffectual successor, Lord Rosebery, led the party to another heavy defeat in the 1895 general election.Another consequence of the Third Reform Act was the rise of Lib-Lab candidates, in the absence of any committed Labour Party. The Act split all county constituencies (which were represented by multiple MPs) in to single-member constituencies, roughly corresponding to population patterns. In areas with working class majorities, in particular coal-mining areas, Lib-Lab candidates were popular, and they received sponsorship and endorsement from unions. In the first election after the Act was passed (1885), thirteen were elected, up from two in 1874. The Third Reform Act also facilitated the demise of the Whig old guard: in two-member constituencies, it was common to pair a Whig and a radical under the Liberal banner. After the Third Reform Act, fewer Whigs were selected as candidates.()The Liberal zenithImage:Asquith Q 42036.jpg|thumb|right|Henry AsquithThe Liberals languished in opposition for a decade, while the coalition of Salisbury and Chamberlain held power. The 1890s were marred by infighting between the three principal successors to Gladstone, party leader William Harcourt, former Prime Minister Lord Rosebery, and Gladstones personal secretary, Morley. This intrigue finally led Harcourt and Morley to resign their positions in 1898 as they continued to be at loggerheads with Rosebery over Irish home rule and issues relating to imperialism. Replacing Harcourt as party leader was Sir Campbell-Bannerman. Harcourts resignation briefly muted the turmoil in the party, but the beginning of the Boer War soon nearly broke the party apart, with Rosebery and a circle of supporters including important future Liberal leaders H.H. Asquith, Edward Grey, and Richard Burdon Haldane forming a clique dubbed the Liberal Imperialists that supported the government in the prosecution of the war. On the other side, more radical members of the party formed a Pro-Boer faction that denounced the conflict and called for an immediate end to hostilities. Quickly rising to prominence among the Pro-Boers was David Lloyd George, a relatively new MP and a master of rhetoric, who took advantage of having a national stage to speak out on a controversial issue to make his name in the party. Harcourt and Morley also sided with this group, though with slightly different aims. Campbell-Bannerman tried to keep these forces together at the head of a moderate Liberal rump, but in 1901 he delivered a speech on the governments methods of barbarism in South Africa that pulled him further to the left and nearly tore the party in two. The party was saved after Salisburys retirement in 1902 when his successor, Arthur Balfour, pushed a series of unpopular initiatives such as a new education bill and Joseph Chamberlain called for a new system of protectionist tariffs. Campbell-Bannerman was able to rally the party around the traditional liberal platform of free trade and land reform and led them to the greatest election victory in their history. This would prove the last time the Liberals won a majority in their own right.Although he presided over a large majority, Sir Henry Campbell-Bannerman was overshadowed by his ministers, most notably Henry Asquith at the Exchequer, Grey at the Foreign Office, Richard Burdon Haldane at the War Office and Lloyd George at the Board of Trade. An ill Campbell-Bannerman retired in 1908 and died later that year. He was succeeded by Asquith, who stepped up the governments radicalism. Lloyd George succeeded Asquith at the Exchequer, and was in turn succeeded at the Board of Trade by Churchill, a recent defector from the Conservatives.The Liberals pushed through much legislation, including the regulation of working hours, Insurance and welfare. It was at this time that a political battle over the so-called Budget resulted in the passage of an act ending the power of the of Lords to block legislation. The cost was high, however, as the government was required by the king to call two general elections in 1910 to validate its position and ended up frittering away most of its large majority, being left once again dependent on the Irish Nationalists.As a result Asquith was forced to introduce a new third Home Rule bill in 1912. Since the House of Lords no longer had the power to block the bill, the Unionists Volunteers led by Sir Carson, launched a campaign of opposition that included the threat of armed resistance in Ulster and the threat of mutiny by army officers in Ireland in 1914 (see Incident). In their resistance to Home Rule the Ulster Protestants had the full support of the Conservatives, whose leader, Andrew Bonar Law, was of Ulster-Scots descent. The country seemed to be on the brink of civil war when War I broke out in August 1914.The war struck at the heart of everything British Liberals believed in. The party became divided over the distinctly illiberal policies that were introduced under her auspices, including conscription and the Defence of the Realm Act. Several Cabinet ministers resigned, and Asquith, the master of domestic politics, proved a poor war leader. Lloyd George and Churchill, however, were zealous supporters of the war, and gradually forced the old pacifist Liberals out. The poor British performance in the early months of the war forced Asquith to invite the Conservatives into a coalition (on 17 May 1915). This marked the end of the last all-Liberal government. This coalition fell apart at the end of 1916, when the Conservatives withdrew their support from Asquith and gave it to Lloyd George instead, who became Prime Minister at the head of a coalition government largely made up of Conservatives. Asquith and his followers moved to the opposition benches in Parliament and the Liberal Party was split once again.Liberal declineImage:David Lloyd George.jpg|thumb|right|Lloyd GeorgeIn the 1918 general election Lloyd George, the Man Who Won the War, led his coalition into another election, and won a sweeping victory over the Asquithian Liberals and the newly emerging Labour Party. Lloyd George and the Conservative leader Andrew Bonar Law wrote a joint letter of support to candidates to indicate they were considered the official Coalition candidates  this coupon as it became known was issued against many sitting Liberal MPs, often to devastating effect, though not against Asquith himself. Asquith and most of his colleagues lost their seats. Lloyd George still claimed to be leading a Liberal government, but he was increasingly under the influence of the rejuvenated Conservative party. In 1922 the Conservative backbenchers rebelled against the continuation of the coalition, citing in particular the Crisis over Turkey and Lloyd Georges corrupt sale of honours amongst other grievances, and Lloyd George was forced to resign. The Conservatives came back to power under Bonar Law and then Baldwin.At the 1922 and 1923 elections the Liberals won barely a third of the vote and only a quarter of the seats in the House of Commons, as many radical voters abandoned the divided Liberals and went over to Labour. In 1922 Labour became the official opposition. A reunion of the two warring factions took place in 1923 when the new Conservative Prime Minister Baldwin committed his party to protective tariffs, causing the Liberals to reunite in support of free trade. The party gained ground in the 1923 general election but ominously made most of its gains from Conservatives whilst losing ground to Labour  a sign of the partys direction for many years to come. The party remained the third largest in the House of Commons, but the Conservatives had lost their majority. There was much speculation and fear about the prospect of a Labour government, and comparatively little about a Liberal government, even though it could have plausibly presented an experienced team of ministers compared to Labours almost complete lack of experience, as well as offering a middle ground that could get support from both Conservatives and Labour in crucial Commons divisions. But instead of trying to force the opportunity to form a Liberal government, Asquith decided instead to allow Labour the chance of office in the belief that they would prove incompetent and this would set the stage for a revival of Liberal fortunes at Labours expense. It was a fatal error.Image:UK popular vote.svg|thumb|300px|left|Share of the vote received by Conservatives (blue), Whigs/Liberals/Liberal Democrats (orange), Labour (red) and others (grey) in general elections since 1832.(Table 2.01 Summary Results of General Elections 18322005 (UK), British electoral facts, 18322006, by Colin Rallings and Michael Thrasher, 7th edition, 2007, ISBN 978-0-7546-2712-8, p. 59.)(Election 2010 Results, BBC News.) Following success as the successor to the Whig party, the partys share of the popular vote plummeted after the First World War as it lost votes to the new Labour party and fractured into groups such as the National and Coalition Liberals.Labour was determined to destroy the Liberals and become the sole party of the left.  MacDonald was forced into a snap election in 1924, and although his government was defeated, he achieved his objective of virtually wiping the Liberals out as many more radical voters now moved to Labour whilst moderate middle-class Liberal voters concerned about socialism moved to the Conservatives. The Liberals were reduced to a mere forty seats in Parliament, only seven of which had been won against candidates from both parties and none of these formed a coherent area of Liberal survival. The party seemed finished and during this period some Liberals, such as Churchill, went over to the Conservatives, while others went over to Labour. (Several Labour ministers of later generations, such as Foot and Benn, were the sons of Liberal MPs.)Asquith died in 1928 and the enigmatic figure of Lloyd George returned to the leadership and began a drive to produce coherent policies on many key issues of the day. In the 1929 general election he made a final bid to return the Liberals to the political mainstream, with an ambitious programme of state stimulation of the economy called We Can Conquer Unemployment!, largely written for him by the Liberal economist Maynard Keynes. The Liberals gained ground, but once again it was at the Conservatives expense whilst also losing seats to Labour. Indeed the urban areas of the country suffering heavily from unemployment, which might have been expected to respond the most to the radical economic policies of the Liberals, instead gave the party its worst results. By contrast most of the partys seats were won either due to the absence of a candidate from one of the other parties or in rural areas on the fringe, where local evidence suggests that economic ideas were at best peripheral to the electorates concerns. The Liberals now found themselves with 59 members holding the balance of power in a Parliament where Labour was the largest party but lacked an overall majority. Lloyd George offered a degree of support to the Labour government in the hope of winning concessions, including a degree of electoral reform to introduce the vote, but this support was to prove bitterly divisive as the Liberals increasingly divided between those seeking to gain what Liberal goals they could achieve, those who preferred a Conservative government to a Labour one and vice-versa.The last majority Liberal Government in Britain was elected in 1906. The pre-World War I period in Britain was a period of worker strikes and civil unrest involving many violent confrontations between the police/troops, and civilians. Other issues of the period included the suffragettes and the Irish Independence movement.After the carnage of 1914-1918 the democratic reform of the of the People Act 1918 instantly tripled the number of people allowed to vote in Britain from 7 to 21 million. The Labour Party benefited the most from this huge change in the British electorate, forming its first minority government in 1924.The splits over the National Governmentthumb|140px|Herbert SamuelIn 1931 MacDonalds government fell apart under the Great Depression, and the Liberals agreed to join his National Government, dominated by the Conservatives. Lloyd George himself was ill and did not actually join. Soon, however, the Liberals faced another divisive crisis when a National Government was proposed to fight the 1931 general election with a mandate for tariffs. From the outside, Lloyd George called for the party to abandon the government completely in defence of free trade, but only a few MPs and candidates followed. Another group under Sir John Simon then emerged, who were prepared to continue their support for the government and take the Liberal places in the Cabinet if there were resignations. The third group under Sir Herbert Samuel pressed for the parties in government to fight the election on separate platforms. In doing so the bulk of Liberals remained supporting the government, but two distinct Liberal groups had emerged within this bulk  the Liberal Nationals (officially the National Liberals after 1947) led by Simon, also known as Simonites, and the Samuelites or official Liberals, led by Samuel who remained as the official party. Both groups secured about 34 MPs but proceeded to diverge even further after the election, with the Liberal Nationals remaining supporters of the government throughout its life. There were to be a succession of discussions about them rejoining the Liberals, but these usually foundered on the issues of free trade and continued support for the National Government. The one significant reunification came in 1946 when the Liberal and Liberal National party organisations in London merged.The official Liberals found themselves a tiny minority within a government committed to protectionism. Slowly they found this issue to be one they could not support. In early 1932 it was agreed to suspend the principle of collective responsibility to allow the Liberals to oppose the introduction of tariffs. Later in 1932 the Liberals resigned their ministerial posts over the introduction of the Ottawa Agreement on Preference. However, they remained sitting on the government benches supporting it in Parliament, though in the country local Liberal activists bitterly opposed the government. Finally in late 1933 the Liberals crossed the floor of the House of Commons and went into complete opposition. By this point their number of MPs was severely depleted. In the 1935 general election, just 17 Liberal MPs were elected, along with Lloyd George and three followers as independent Liberals. Immediately after the election the two groups reunited, though Lloyd George declined to play much of a formal role in his old party. Over the next ten years there would be further defections as MPs deserted to either the Liberal Nationals or Labour. Yet there were a few recruits, such as Davies, who had deserted to the National Liberals in 1931 but now returned to the party during the War II and who would lead it after the war.Near extinctionSamuel had lost his seat in the 1935 election and the leadership of the party fell to Sir Archibald Sinclair. With many traditional domestic Liberal policies now regarded as irrelevant, he focused the party on opposition to both the rise of Fascism in Europe and the appeasement foreign policy of the British government, arguing that intervention was needed, in contrast to the Labour calls for pacifism. Despite the partys weaknesses, Sinclair gained a high profile as he sought to recall the Campaign and once more revitalise the Liberals as the party of a strong foreign policy.In 1940 they joined Churchills wartime coalition government, with Sinclair serving as of State for Air, the last British Liberal to hold Cabinet rank office for seventy years. However, it was a sign of the partys lack of importance that they were not included in the Cabinet. At the 1945 general election, Sinclair and many of his colleagues lost their seats to both Conservatives and Labour. By 1951 there were only six MPs; all but one of them were aided by the fact that the Conservatives refrained from fielding candidates in those constituencies. In 1957 this total fell to five when one of the Liberal MPs died and the subsequent by-election was lost to the Labour Party, which selected the former Liberal Deputy Leader Lady Megan Lloyd George as its own candidate. The Liberal Party seemed close to extinction. During this low period, it was often joked that Liberal MPs could hold meetings in the back of one taxi.Liberal revivalThrough the 1950s and into the 1960s the Liberals survived only because a handful of constituencies in rural Scotland and Wales clung to their Liberal traditions, whilst in two English towns, Bolton and Huddersfield, local Liberals and Conservatives agreed to each contest only one of the towns two seats. Grimond, for example, who became Liberal leader in 1956, was MP for the remote Orkney and Shetland islands. Under his leadership a Liberal revival began, marked by the Orpington by-election of March 1962 which was won by Eric Lubbock. There,  the Liberals won a seat in the London suburbs for the first time since 1935.The Liberals became the first of the major British political parties to advocate British membership of the Economic Community. Grimond also sought an intellectual revival of the party, seeking to position it as a non-socialist radical alternative to the Conservative government of the day. In particular he canvassed the support of the young post-war university students and recent graduates, appealing to younger voters in a way that many of his recent predecessors had not, and asserting a new strand of Liberalism for the post-war world.The new middle-class suburban generation began to find the Liberals policies attractive again. Under Grimond (who retired in 1967) and his successor, Thorpe, the Liberals regained the status of a serious third force in British politics, polling up to 20% of the vote but unable to break the duopoly of Labour and Conservative and win more than fourteen seats in the Commons. An additional problem was competition in the Liberal heartlands in Scotland and Wales from the National Party and Cymru who both grew as electoral forces from the 1960s onwards. Although Hooson held on to the seat of Montgomeryshire, upon Davies death in 1962, the party lost its other Welsh five Welsh seats between 1950 and 1966. In September 1966 the Liberal Party formed their own state party, moving the Liberal Party into a fully federal structure.(Russell Deacon (2011) History of the Welsh Liberal party, Welsh Academic Press) In local elections Liverpool remained a Liberal stronghold, with the party taking the plurality of seats on the elections to the new Liverpool Metropolitan Borough Council in 1973. In the February 1974 general election the Conservative government of Heath won a plurality of votes cast, but the Labour Party gained a plurality of seats due to the Ulster Unionist MPs refusing to support the Conservatives after the Northern Ireland Agreement. The Liberals now held the balance of power in the Commons. Conservatives offered Thorpe the Office if he would join a coalition government with Heath. Thorpe was personally in favour of it, but the party insisted on a clear government commitment to introducing representation and a change of Prime Minister. The former was unacceptable to Heaths Cabinet and the latter to Heath personally, so the talks collapsed. Instead a minority Labour government was formed under Wilson but with no formal support from Thorpe. In the October 1974 general election the Liberals slipped back slightly and the Labour government won a wafer-thin majority.Thorpe was subsequently forced to resign after allegations about his private life. The partys new leader, Steel, negotiated the pact with Wilsons successor as Prime Minister, Callaghan. According to this pact, the Liberals would support the government in crucial votes in exchange for some influence over policy. The agreement lasted from 1977 to 1978, but proved mostly fruitless, for two reasons: the Liberals key demand of representation was rejected by most Labour MPs, whilst the contacts between Liberal spokespersons and Labour ministers often proved detrimental, such as between finance spokesperson Pardoe and of the Exchequer Healey, who were mutually antagonistic.Alliance with Social DemocratsWhen the Labour government fell in 1979, the Conservatives under Thatcher won a victory which served to push the Liberals back into the margins. In 1981 defectors from the moderate wing of the Labour Party, led by former Cabinet ministers Jenkins, Owen and Williams, founded the Social Democratic Party. The new party and the Liberals quickly formed an alliance (which briefly topped the opinion polls before being overtaken by the Tories) and fought the 1983 and 1987 general elections jointly as the Alliance. During 1982 and 1983, at the depths of Labours fortunes under Foot, there was much talk of the Alliance becoming the dominant party of the left and even of Jenkins becoming Prime Minister. In fact, while the Alliance won over 20% of the vote each time, it was still a long way behind Labour in terms of seats and as a result was disbanded after the 1987 election, with the two parties merging the following year to form the Social and Liberal Democrats, who a year after that become the Liberal Democrats.Merger with Social DemocratsIn 1988 the Liberals and Social Democrats merged to create what came to be called the Liberal Democrats. Over two-thirds of the members, and all the serving MPs, of the Liberal Party joined this party, led first jointly by Steel and the SDP leader Robert Maclennan, and later by Ashdown (198899), Kennedy (19992006), Menzies Campbell (200607) and Clegg (incumbent).Though the merger process was traumatic and the new party suffered a few years of extremely poor poll results, it gradually found much greater electoral success than the Liberal Party had done in the post-war era. In the 2005 general election, the Liberal Democrats elected 62 MPs to the House of Commons, a far cry from the days when the Liberals had just 5 MPs and Liberalism as a political force had seemed moribund.As was the case with the Liberal Party for most of the 20th century, the Liberal Democrats face constant questioning about which of the other two parties they are closer to, in particular about which they would support in the event of a parliament. The party is keen to maintain its independent identity however, and argues that the need for a modern Liberal force in British politics has never been greater.In the 2010 General Election, the Conservative Party won more seats than any other, but not enough to form a majority government. After several days of negotiation, the Liberal Democrats agreed to join the Conservatives as part of a coalition government.The post-1988 Liberal PartyA group of Liberal opponents of the merger with the Social Democrats, including Meadowcroft (formerly Liberal MP for Leeds West) and Paul Wiggin (who served on Peterborough City Council as a Liberal), continued under the old name of the Liberal Party. This was legally a new organisation (the headquarters, records, assets and debts of the old party were inherited by the Liberal Democrats), but its constitution asserts it to be the same Liberal party. The party retains minor influence in some local councils. Meadowcroft himself eventually joined the Liberal Democrats in 2007.Liberal leaders 18591988Liberal Leaders in the House of Lords, 18591988*George Leveson-Gower, 2nd Earl Granville 18591865*Russell, 1st Earl Russell 18651868*George Leveson-Gower, 2nd Earl Granville 18681891*Wodehouse, 1st Earl of Kimberley 18911894*Philip Primrose, 5th Earl of Rosebery 18941896*Wodehouse, 1st Earl of Kimberley 18961902*Spencer, 5th Earl Spencer 19021905*Robinson, 1st Marquess of Ripon 19051908*Robert Crewe-Milnes, 1st Marquess of Crewe 19081923*Grey, 1st Viscount Grey of Fallodon 19231924*Lygon, 7th Earl Beauchamp 19241931*Isaacs, 1st Marquess of Reading 19311936*Crewe-Milnes, 1st Marquess of Crewe 19361944*Samuel, 1st Viscount Samuel 19441955*Rea, 2nd Baron Rea 19551967*Byers, Baron Byers 19671984*Seear, Baroness Seear 19841988Liberal Leaders in the House of Commons, 18591916*John Temple, 3rd Viscount Palmerston 18591865*Ewart Gladstone 18651875*Spencer Compton Cavendish, Marquess of Hartington 18751880*Ewart Gladstone 18801894*Sir William Vernon Harcourt 18941898*Sir Henry Campbell-Bannerman 18991908*Henry Asquith, 1st Earl of Oxford and Asquith (1925) 19081916Leaders of the Liberal Party, 19161988*Henry Asquith, 1st Earl of Oxford and Asquith (1925) 19161926**Donald Maclean, Acting Leader 19191920*Lloyd George 19261931*Sir Herbert Samuel 19311935*Sir Archibald Sinclair 19351945*Davies 19451956*Grimond 19561967*Thorpe 19671976*Grimond  1976 (Acting Leader)*Steel 19761988See also*Liberal MPs (UK)*of Liberal Party (UK) MPs*to liberal theory*worldwide*of liberal parties*democracy*in the United Kingdom*of United Kingdom Liberal Party Leaders*List of Liberal Chief Whips*President of the Liberal Party*of the United Kingdom*Liberalism*of liberal theorists*of UK Liberal Party general election manifestosNotesReferences*Chris Cook, A Short History of the Liberal Party, 19002001 (6th edition). Basingstoke: Palgrave, 2002. ISBN 0-333-91838-X.*Jonathan Parry, The Rise and Fall of Liberal Government in Victorian Britain. Yale, 1993.ISBN 0-300-06718-6.*David Dutton, A History of the Liberal Party in the 20th Century, Palgrave Macmillan, 2004. ISBN 0-333-74656-2.External links*Liberal Democrat History Group*Catalogue of the Liberal Party papers (mostly dating from after 1945) at LSE Archives ( ) ()Liberal (Regne Unit)strana (Spojen krlovstv)Ryddfrydol (DU)PartyLiberal del Reino Unidoliberal (Britio)libral (Royaume-Uni)Liberale (Regno Unito) ( ) ( )Liberalis (Britanniarum Regnum)partija (Jungtin Karalyst)()liberale parti (Storbritannia)Liberalna (brytyjska)Liberal (Reino Unido) ()strana (Spojen krovstvo)(Yhdistynyt kuningaskunta)Party (Storbritannien) ( )()
4502
Biotechnology
File:Insulincrystals.jpg|thumb|Insulin crystals.Biotechnology (sometimes shortened to biotech) is a field of applied biology that involves the use of living organisms and bioprocesses in engineering, technology, medicine and other fields requiring bioproducts. Biotechnology also utilizes these products for manufacturing purpose. Modern use of similar terms includes engineering as well as cell- and culture technologies. The concept encompasses a wide range of procedures (and history) for modifying living organisms according to human purposes  going back to domestication of animals, cultivation of plants, and improvements to these through breeding programs that employ selection and hybridization. By comparison to biotechnology, bioengineering is generally thought of as a related field with its emphasis more on higher systems approaches (not necessarily altering or using biological materials directly) for interfacing with and utilizing living things. The Nations on Biological Diversity defines biotechnology as:(The Convention on Biological Diversity (Article 2. Use of Terms). Nations. 1992. Retrieved on February 6, 2008.)In other terms: Application of scientific and technical advances in life science to develop commercial products is biotechnology.Biotechnology draws on the pure biological sciences (genetics, microbiology, cell culture, biology, biochemistry, embryology, biology) and in many instances is also dependent on knowledge and methods from outside the sphere of biology (engineering, engineering, technology, biorobotics). Conversely, modern biological sciences (including even concepts such as ecology) are intimately entwined and dependent on the methods developed through biotechnology and what is commonly thought of as the sciences industry.HistoryFile:16thCenturyBrewer.jpg|right|thumb|Brewing was an early application of biotechnologyBiotechnology is not limited to medical/health applications (unlike Biomedical Engineering, which includes much biotechnology). Although not normally thought of as biotechnology, agriculture clearly fits the broad definition of using a biotechnological system to make products such that the cultivation of plants may be viewed as the earliest biotechnological enterprise. Agriculture has been theorized to have become the dominant way of producing food since the Revolution. The processes and methods of agriculture have been refined by other mechanical and biological sciences since its inception. Through early biotechnology, farmers were able to select the best suited crops, having the highest yields, to produce enough food to support a growing population. Other uses of biotechnology were required as the crops and fields became increasingly large and difficult to maintain. Specific organisms and organism by-products were used to fertilize, restore nitrogen, and control pests. Throughout the use of agriculture, farmers have inadvertently altered the genetics of their crops through introducing them to new environments and breeding them with other plantsone of the first forms of biotechnology. Cultures such as those in Mesopotamia, Egypt, and India developed the process of brewing beer. It is still done by the same basic method of using malted grains (containing enzymes) to convert starch from grains into sugar and then adding specific yeasts to produce beer. In this process the carbohydrates in the grains were broken down into alcohols such as ethanol. Later other cultures produced the process of acid fermentation which allowed the fermentation and preservation of other forms of food. Fermentation was also used in this time period to produce leavened bread. Although the process of fermentation was not fully understood until Pasteurs work in 1857, it is still the first use of biotechnology to convert a food source into another form.For thousands of years, humans have used selective breeding to improve production of crops and livestock to use them for food. In selective breeding, organisms with desirable characteristics are mated to produce offspring with the same characteristics. For example, this technique was used with corn to produce the largest and sweetest crops.()In the early twentieth century scientists gained a greater understanding of microbiology and explored ways of manufacturing specific products. In 1917, Weizmann first used a pure microbiological culture in an industrial process, that of manufacturing starch using acetobutylicum, to produce acetone, which the Kingdom desperately needed to manufacture explosives during War I.()Biotechnology has also led to the development of antibiotics. In 1928, Fleming discovered the mold Penicillium. His work led to the purification of the antibiotic by Howard Florey, Ernst Boris Chain and Norman Heatley penicillin. In 1940, penicillin became available for medicinal use to treat bacterial infections in humans.(The field of modern biotechnology is thought to have largely begun on June 16, 1980, when the States Supreme Court ruled that a genetically modified microorganism could be patented in the case of v. Chakrabarty.(Diamond v. Chakrabarty, 447 U.S. 303 (1980). No. 79-139. States Supreme Court. June 16, 1980. Retrieved on May 4, 2007.) Indian-born Ananda Chakrabarty, working for Electric, had developed a bacterium (derived from the Pseudomonas genus) capable of breaking down crude oil, which he proposed to use in treating oil spills.Revenue in the industry is expected to grow by 12.9% in 2008. Another factor influencing the biotechnology sectors success is improved intellectual property rights legislationand enforcementworldwide, as well as strengthened demand for medical and pharmaceutical products to cope with an ageing, and ailing, U.S. population.(VoIP Providers And Corn Farmers Can Expect To Have Bumper Years In 2008 And Beyond, According To The Latest Research Released By Business Information Analysts At IBISWorld. Los Angeles (March 19, 2008))Rising demand for biofuels is expected to be good news for the biotechnology sector, with the Department of Energy estimating ethanol usage could reduce U.S. petroleum-derived fuel consumption by up to 30% by 2030. The biotechnology sector has allowed the U.S. farming industry to rapidly increase its supply of corn and soybeansthe main inputs into biofuelsby developing genetically modified seeds which are resistant to pests and drought. By boosting farm productivity, biotechnology plays a crucial role in ensuring that biofuel production targets are met.(The Recession List  Top 10 Industries to Fly and Fl... (ith anincreasing share accounted for by ...), bio-medicine.org)ApplicationsFile:99341.jpg|thumb|A rose plant that began as cells grown in a tissue cultureBiotechnology has applications in four major industrial areas, including health care (medical), crop production and agriculture, non food (industrial) uses of crops and other products (e.g. plastics, oil, biofuels), and environmental uses.For example, one application of biotechnology is the directed use of organisms for the manufacture of organic products (examples include beer and milk products). Another example is using naturally present bacteria by the mining industry in bioleaching. Biotechnology is also used to recycle, treat waste, clean up sites contaminated by industrial activities (bioremediation), and also to produce biological weapons.A series of derived terms have been coined to identify several branches of biotechnology; for example:* Bioinformatics is an interdisciplinary field which addresses biological problems using computational techniques, and makes the rapid organization and analysis of biological data possible. The field may also be referred to as computational biology, and can be defined as, conceptualizing biology in terms of molecules and then applying informatics techniques to understand and organize the information associated with these molecules, on a large scale.(Gerstein, M. Bioinformatics Introduction. University. Retrieved on May 8, 2007.) Bioinformatics plays a key role in various areas, such as genomics, genomics, and proteomics, and forms a key component in the biotechnology and pharmaceutical sector.* biotechnology is a term that has been used to describe the marine and aquatic applications of biotechnology, but its use is relatively rare.* biotechnology is biotechnology applied to agricultural processes. An example would be the selection and domestication of plants via micropropagation. Another example is the designing of plants to grow under specific environments in the presence (or absence) of chemicals. One hope is that green biotechnology might produce more environmentally friendly solutions than traditional industrial agriculture. An example of this is the engineering of a plant to express a pesticide, thereby ending the need of external application of pesticides. An example of this would be Bt corn. Whether or not green biotechnology products such as this are ultimately more environmentally friendly is a topic of considerable debate.* Red biotechnology is applied to medical processes. Some examples are the designing of organisms to produce antibiotics, and the engineering of genetic cures through manipulation.* biotechnology, also known as industrial biotechnology, is biotechnology applied to industrial processes. An example is the designing of an organism to produce a useful chemical. Another example is the using of enzymes as industrial catalysts to either produce valuable chemicals or destroy hazardous/polluting chemicals. White biotechnology tends to consume less in resources than traditional processes used to produce industrial goods. The investment and economic output of all of these types of applied biotechnologies is termed as bioeconomy.MedicineIn medicine, modern biotechnology finds promising applications in such areas as* drug production* pharmacogenomics* therapy* genetic testing (or genetic screening): techniques in molecular biology detect genetic diseases. To test the developing fetus for syndrome, Amniocentesis and villus sampling can be used.(PharmacogenomicsFile:Microarray2.gif|thumb|microarray chip  some can do as many as a million blood tests at once Pharmacogenomics is the study of how the genetic inheritance of an individual affects his/her bodys response to drugs. It is a portmanteau derived from the words pharmacology and genomics. It is hence the study of the relationship between pharmaceuticals and genetics. The vision of pharmacogenomics is to be able to design and produce drugs that are adapted to each persons genetic makeup.(U.S. Department of Energy Human Genome Program, supra note 6.)Pharmacogenomics results in the following benefits:(# Development of tailor-made medicines. Using pharmacogenomics, pharmaceutical companies can create drugs based on the proteins, enzymes and RNA molecules that are associated with specific genes and diseases. These tailor-made drugs promise not only to maximize therapeutic effects but also to decrease damage to nearby healthy cells.# More accurate methods of determining appropriate drug dosages. Knowing a patients genetics will enable doctors to determine how well his/ her body can process and metabolize a medicine. This will maximize the value of the medicine and decrease the likelihood of overdose.# Improvements in the drug discovery and approval process. The discovery of potential therapies will be made easier using genome targets. Genes have been associated with numerous diseases and disorders. With modern biotechnology, these genes can be used as targets for the development of effective new therapies, which could significantly shorten the drug discovery process.# Better vaccines. Safer vaccines can be designed and produced by organisms transformed by means of genetic engineering. These vaccines will elicit the immune response without the attendant risks of infection. They will be inexpensive, stable, easy to store, and capable of being engineered to carry several strains of pathogen at once.Pharmaceutical productsFile:InsulinHexamer.jpg|thumb|Computer-generated image of insulin hexamers highlighting the threefold symmetry, the zinc ions holding it together, and the histidine residues involved in zinc binding.Most traditional pharmaceutical drugs are relatively simple molecules that have been found primarily through trial and error to treat the symptoms of a disease or illness.  Biopharmaceuticals are large biological molecules such as proteins and these usually target the underlying mechanisms and pathways of a malady (but not always, as is the case with using insulin to treat 1 diabetes mellitus, as that treatment merely addresses the symptoms of the disease, not the underlying cause which is autoimmunity); it is a relatively young industry. They can deal with targets in humans that may not be accessible with traditional medicines. A patient typically is dosed with a small molecule via a tablet while a large molecule is typically injected.Small molecules are manufactured by chemistry but larger molecules are created by living cells such as those found in the human body: for example, bacteria cells, yeast cells, animal or plant cells.Modern biotechnology is often associated with the use of genetically altered microorganisms such as coli or yeast for the production of substances like synthetic insulin or antibiotics. It can also refer to transgenic animals or plants, such as corn. Genetically altered mammalian cells, such as Chinese Hamster Ovary cells (CHO), are also used to manufacture certain pharmaceuticals. Another promising new biotechnology application is the development of pharmaceuticals.Biotechnology is also commonly associated with landmark breakthroughs in new medical therapies to treat B, C, cancers, arthritis, haemophilia, fractures, sclerosis, and cardiovascular disorders. The biotechnology industry has also been instrumental in developing molecular diagnostic devices that can be used to define the target patient population for a given biopharmaceutical. Herceptin, for example, was the first drug approved for use with a matching diagnostic test and is used to treat breast cancer in women whose cancer cells express the protein HER2.Modern biotechnology can be used to manufacture existing medicines relatively easily and cheaply. The first genetically engineered products were medicines designed to treat human diseases. To cite one example, in 1978 Genentech developed synthetic humanized insulin by joining its gene with a plasmid vector inserted into the bacterium coli. Insulin, widely used for the treatment of diabetes, was previously extracted from the pancreas of abattoir animals (cattle and/or pigs). The resulting genetically engineered bacterium enabled the production of vast quantities of synthetic human insulin at relatively low cost.() According to a 2003 study undertaken by the International Diabetes Federation (IDF) on the access to and availability of insulin in its member countries, synthetic human insulin is considerably more expensive in most countries where both synthetic human and animal insulin are commercially available: e.g. within European countries the average price of synthetic human insulin was twice as high as the price of pork insulin.(IDF 2003; Diabetes Atlas,: 2nd ed.; International Diabetes Federation, Brussels, eatlas.idf.org) Yet in its position statement, the IDF writes that there is no overwhelming evidence to prefer one species of insulin over another and highly purified animal insulins remain a perfectly acceptable alternative.(IDF March 2005; Position Statement. International Diabetes Federation, Brussels. idf.org)Modern biotechnology has evolved, making it possible to produce more easily and relatively cheaply growth hormone, factors for hemophiliacs, drugs, erythropoietin and other drugs.(U.S. Department of State International Information Programs, Frequently Asked Questions About Biotechnology, USIS Online; available from USinfo.state.gov, accessed 13 September 2007. Cf. ) Most drugs today are based on about 500 molecular targets. Genomic knowledge of the genes involved in diseases, disease pathways, and drug-response sites are expected to lead to the discovery of thousands more new targets.(Genetic testingFile:Gel electrophoresis 2.jpg|thumb|electrophoresistesting involves the direct examination of the DNA molecule itself. A scientist scans a patients DNA sample for mutated sequences.There are two major types of gene tests. In the first type, a researcher may design short pieces of DNA (probes) whose sequences are complementary to the mutated sequences. These probes will seek their complement among the base pairs of an individuals genome. If the mutated sequence is present in the patients genome, the probe will bind to it and flag the mutation. In the second type, a researcher may conduct the gene test by comparing the sequence of DNA bases in a patients gene to disease in healthy individuals or their progeny.Genetic testing is now used for:* Carrier screening, or the identification of unaffected individuals who carry one copy of a gene for a disease that requires two copies for the disease to manifest;* Confirmational diagnosis of symptomatic individuals;* Determining sex;* Forensic/identity testing;* Newborn screening;* Prenatal diagnostic screening;* Presymptomatic testing for estimating the risk of developing adult-onset cancers;* Presymptomatic testing for predicting adult-onset disorders.Some genetic tests are already available, although most of them are used in developed countries. The tests currently available can detect mutations associated with rare genetic disorders like fibrosis, cell anemia, and disease. Recently, tests have been developed to detect mutation for a handful of more complex conditions such as breast, ovarian, and colon cancers. However, gene tests may not detect every mutation associated with a particular condition because many are as yet undiscovered, and the ones they do detect may present different risks to different people and populations.(Controversial questionsFile:E coli at 10000x, original.jpg|thumb|The bacterium coli is routinely genetically engineered.The absence of privacy and anti-discrimination legal protections in most countries can lead to discrimination in employment or insurance or other use of personal genetic information. This raises questions such as whether genetic privacy is different from medical privacy.(The National Action Plan on Breast Cancer and U.S. National Institutes of Health-Department of Energy Working Group on the Ethical, Legal and Social Implications (ELSI) have issued several recommendations to prevent workplace and insurance discrimination. The highlights of these recommendations, which may be taken into account in developing legislation to prevent genetic discrimination, may be found at elsi/legislat.html ORNL.org.)# Reproductive issues. These include the use of genetic information in reproductive decision-making and the possibility of genetically altering reproductive cells that may be passed on to future generations. For example, germline therapy changes the genetic make-up of an individuals descendants. Thus, any error in technology or judgment may have far-reaching consequences (though the same can also happen through natural reproduction). Ethical issues like designed babies and human cloning have also given rise to controversies between and among scientists and bioethicists, especially in the light of past abuses with eugenics (see reductio ad hitlerum).# Clinical issues. These center on the capabilities and limitations of doctors and other health-service providers, people identified with genetic conditions, and the general public in dealing with genetic information.# Effects on social institutions. Genetic tests reveal information about individuals and their families. Thus, test results can affect the dynamics within social institutions, particularly the family.# Conceptual and philosophical implications regarding human responsibility, free will vis--vis genetic determinism, and the concepts of health and disease.Gene therapyFile:Gene therapy.jpg|thumb|Gene therapy using an Adenovirus vector. A new gene isinserted into an adenovirus vector, which is used to introduce the modified DNA into a human cell. If the treatment is successful, the new gene will make a functional protein.Gene therapy may be used for treating, or even curing, genetic and acquired diseases like cancer and AIDS by using normal genes to supplement or replace defective genes or to bolster a normal function such as immunity. It can be used to target cells (i.e., those of the body) or gametes (i.e., egg and sperm) cells. In somatic gene therapy, the genome of the recipient is changed, but this change is not passed along to the next generation. In contrast, in germline gene therapy, the egg and sperm cells of the parents are changed for the purpose of passing on the changes to their offspring.There are basically two ways of implementing a gene therapy treatment:# Ex vivo, which means outside the body  Cells from the patients blood or marrow are removed and grown in the laboratory. They are then exposed to a virus carrying the desired gene. The virus enters the cells, and the desired gene becomes part of the DNA of the cells. The cells are allowed to grow in the laboratory before being returned to the patient by injection into a vein.# In vivo, which means inside the body  No cells are removed from the patients body. Instead, vectors are used to deliver the desired gene to cells in the patients body.As of June 2001, more than 500 clinical gene-therapy trials involving about 3,500 patients have been identified worldwide. Around 78% of these are in the United States, with Europe having 18%. These trials focus on various types of cancer, although other multigenic diseases are being studied as well. Recently, two children born with combined immunodeficiency disorder (SCID) were reported to have been cured after being given genetically engineered cells.Gene therapy faces many obstacles before it can become a practical approach for treating disease.( At least four of these obstacles are as follows:# Gene delivery tools. Genes are inserted into the body using gene carriers called vectors. The most common vectors now are viruses, which have evolved a way of encapsulating and delivering their genes to human cells in a pathogenic manner. Scientists manipulate the genome of the virus by removing the disease-causing genes and inserting the therapeutic genes. However, while viruses are effective, they can introduce problems like toxicity, immune and inflammatory responses, and gene control and targeting issues. In addition, in order for gene therapy to provide permanent therapeutic effects, the introduced gene needs to be integrated within the host cells genome. Some viral vectors effect this in a random fashion, which can introduce other problems such as disruption of an endogenous host gene.# High costs. Since gene therapy is relatively new and at an experimental stage, it is an expensive treatment to undertake. This explains why current studies are focused on illnesses commonly found in developed countries, where more people can afford to pay for treatment. It may take decades before developing countries can take advantage of this technology.# Limited knowledge of the functions of genes. Scientists currently know the functions of only a few genes. Hence, gene therapy can address only some genes that cause a particular disease. Worse, it is not known exactly whether genes have more than one function, which creates uncertainty as to whether replacing such genes is indeed desirable.# Multigene disorders and effect of environment. Most genetic disorders involve more than one gene. Moreover, most diseases involve the interaction of several genes and the environment. For example, many people with cancer not only inherit the disease gene for the disorder, but may have also failed to inherit specific tumor suppressor genes. Diet, exercise, smoking and other environmental factors may have also contributed to their disease.Human Genome ProjectFile:Dna-split.png|thumb|right|Replication image from the Human Genome Project (HGP) The Genome Project is an initiative of the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) that aims to generate a high-quality reference sequence for the entire human genome and identify all the human genes.The DOE and its predecessor agencies were assigned by the U.S. Congress to develop new energy resources and technologies and to pursue a deeper understanding of potential health and environmental risks posed by their production and use. In 1986, the DOE announced its Human Genome Initiative. Shortly thereafter, the DOE and National Institutes of Health developed a plan for a joint Human Genome Project (HGP), which officially began in 1990.The HGP was originally planned to last 15 years. However, rapid technological advances and worldwide participation accelerated the completion date to 2003 (making it a 13 year project). Already it has enabled gene hunters to pinpoint genes associated with more than 30 disorders.(U.S. Department of Energy Human Genome Program, supra note 6)CloningCloning involves the removal of the nucleus from one cell and its placement in an unfertilized egg cell whose nucleus has either been deactivated or removed.There are two types of cloning:# Reproductive cloning. After a few divisions, the egg cell is placed into a uterus where it is allowed to develop into a fetus that is genetically identical to the donor of the original nucleus.# Therapeutic cloning.(A number of scientists have called for the use the term nuclear transplantation, instead of therapeutic cloning, to help reduce public confusion. The term cloning has become synonymous with somatic cell nuclear transfer, a procedure that can be used for a variety of purposes, only one of which involves an intention to create a clone of an organism. They believe that the term cloning is best associated with the ultimate outcome or objective of the research and not the mechanism or technique used to achieve that objective. They argue that the goal of creating a nearly identical genetic copy of a human being is consistent with the term human reproductive cloning, but the goal of creating stem cells for regenerative medicine is not consistent with the term therapeutic cloning. The objective of the latter is to make tissue that is genetically compatible with that of the recipient, not to create a copy of the potential tissue recipient. Hence, therapeutic cloning is conceptually inaccurate. ) The egg is placed into a dish where it develops into embryonic stem cells, which have shown potentials for treating several ailments.( Also available from Techreview.com, Cameron)In February 1997, cloning became the focus of media attention when Ian Wilmut and his colleagues at the Roslin Institute announced the successful cloning of a sheep, named Dolly, from the mammary glands of an adult female. The cloning of Dolly made it apparent to many that the techniques used to produce her could someday be used to clone human beings.( However, there is wide disagreement within scientific circles whether human cloning can be successfully carried out. For instance, Dr. Rudolf Jaenisch of Whitehead Institute for Biomedical Research believes that reproductive cloning shortcuts basic biological processes, thus making normal offspring impossible to produce. In normal fertilization, the egg and sperm go through a long process of maturation. Cloning shortcuts this process by trying to reprogram the nucleus of one whole genome in minutes or hours. This results in gross physical malformations to subtle neurological disturbances. Cameron, supra note 30) This stirred a lot of controversy because of its ethical implications.AgricultureCrop yieldUsing the techniques of modern biotechnology, one or two genes (Smartstax from Monsanto in collaboration with Dow AgroSciences will use 8, starting in 2010) may be transferred to a highly developed crop variety to impart a new character that would increase its yield.(Asian Development Bank, Agricultural Biotechnology, Poverty Reduction and Food Security (Manila: Asian Development Bank, 2001). Also available from ADB.org) However, while increases in crop yield are the most obvious applications of modern biotechnology in agriculture, it is also the most difficult one. Current genetic engineering techniques work best for effects that are controlled by a single gene. Many of the genetic characteristics associated with yield (e.g., enhanced growth) are controlled by a large number of genes, each of which has a minimal effect on the overall yield.(D. Bruce and A. Bruce, Engineering Genesis: The Ethics of Genetic Engineering, London: Earthscan Publications, 1999 ISBN 1853835706) There is, therefore, much scientific work to be done in this area.Reduced vulnerability of crops to environmental stressesCrops containing genes that will enable them to withstand biotic and abiotic stresses may be developed. For example, drought and excessively salty soil are two important factors in crop productivity. Biotechnologists are studying plants that can cope with these extreme conditions in the hope of finding the genes that enable them to do so and eventually transferring these genes to the more desirable crops. One of the latest developments is the identification of a plant gene, At-DBF2, from thaliana, a tiny weed that is often used for plant research because it is very easy to grow and its genetic code is well mapped out. When this gene was inserted into tomato and tobacco cells (see interference), the cells were able to withstand environmental stresses like salt, drought, cold and heat, far more than ordinary cells. If these preliminary results prove successful in larger trials, then At-DBF2 genes can help in engineering crops that can better withstand harsh environments.() Researchers have also created transgenic rice plants that are resistant to yellow mottle virus (RYMV). In Africa, this virus destroys majority of the rice crops and makes the surviving plants more susceptible to fungal infections.()Increased nutritional qualitiesProteins in foods may be modified to increase their nutritional qualities. Proteins in legumes and cereals may be transformed to provide the amino acids needed by human beings for a balanced diet.( A good example is the work of Professors Potrykus and Beyer in creating rice (discussed below).Improved taste, texture or appearance of foodModern biotechnology can be used to slow down the process of spoilage so that fruit can ripen longer on the plant and then be transported to the consumer with a still reasonable shelf life. This alters the taste, texture and appearance of the fruit. More importantly, it could expand the market for farmers in developing countries due to the reduction in spoilage. However, there is sometimes a lack of understanding by researchers in developed countries about the actual needs of prospective beneficiaries in developing countries. For example, engineering soybeans to resist spoilage makes them less suitable for producing tempeh which is a significant source of protein that depends on fermentation. The use of modified soybeans results in a lumpy texture that is less palatable and less convenient when cooking.The first genetically modified food product was a tomato which was transformed to delay its ripening.(For an account of the research and development of Flavr Savr tomato, see ) Researchers in Indonesia, Malaysia, Thailand, Philippines and Vietnam are currently working on delayed-ripening papaya in collaboration with the of Nottingham and Zeneca.(A.F. Krattiger, An Overview of ISAAA from 1992 to 2000, ISAAA Brief No. 19-2000, 9)Biotechnology in cheese production:(EuropaBio  An animal friendly alternative for cheeze makers, Europabio.org) enzymes produced by micro-organisms provide an alternative to animal rennet  a cheese coagulant  and an alternative supply for cheese makers. This also eliminates possible public concerns with animal-derived material, although there are currently no plans to develop synthetic milk, thus making this argument less compelling. Enzymes offer an animal-friendly alternative to animal rennet. While providing comparable quality, they are theoretically also less expensive.About 85 million tons of wheat flour is used every year to bake bread.(EuropaBio  Biologically better bread, Europabio.org) By adding an enzyme called maltogenic amylase to the flour, bread stays fresher longer. Assuming that 1015% of bread is thrown away as stale, if it could be made to stay fresh another 57 days then perhaps 2 million tons of flour per year would be saved. Other enzymes can cause bread to expand to make a lighter loaf, or alter the loaf in a range of ways.Reduced dependence on fertilizers, pesticides and other agrochemicalsMost of the current commercial applications of modern biotechnology in agriculture are on reducing the dependence of farmers on agrochemicals. For example, thuringiensis (Bt) is a soil bacterium that produces a protein with insecticidal qualities. Traditionally, a fermentation process has been used to produce an insecticidal spray from these bacteria. In this form, the toxin occurs as an inactive protoxin, which requires digestion by an insect to be effective. There are several Bt toxins and each one is specific to certain target insects. Crop plants have now been engineered to contain and express the genes for Bt toxin, which they produce in its active form. When a susceptible insect ingests the transgenic crop cultivar expressing the Bt protein, it stops feeding and soon thereafter dies as a result of the Bt toxin binding to its gut wall. Bt corn is now commercially available in a number of countries to control borer (a lepidopteran insect), which is otherwise controlled by spraying (a more difficult process).Crops have also been genetically engineered to acquire tolerance to broad-spectrum herbicide. The lack of herbicides with broad-spectrum activity and no crop injury was a consistent limitation in crop weed management. Multiple applications of numerous herbicides were routinely used to control a wide range of weed species detrimental to agronomic crops. Weed management tended to rely on preemergencethat is, herbicide applications were sprayed in response to expected weed infestations rather than in response to actual weeds present. Mechanical cultivation and hand weeding were often necessary to control weeds not controlled by herbicide applications. The introduction of herbicide-tolerant crops has the potential of reducing the number of herbicide active ingredients used for weed management, reducing the number of herbicide applications made during a season, and increasing yield due to improved weed management and less crop injury. Transgenic crops that express tolerance to glyphosate, glufosinate and bromoxynil have been developed. These herbicides can now be sprayed on transgenic crops without inflicting damage on the crops while killing nearby weeds.(L. P. Gianessi, C. S. Silvers, S. Sankula and J. E. Carpenter. Plant Biotechnology: Current and Potential Impact for Improving Pest management in US Agriculture, An Analysis of 40 Case Studies (Washington, D.C.: National Center for Food and Agricultural Policy, 2002), 56)From 1996 to 2001, herbicide tolerance was the most dominant trait introduced to commercially available transgenic crops, followed by insect resistance. In 2001, herbicide tolerance deployed in soybean, corn and cotton accounted for 77% of the 626,000 square kilometres planted to transgenic crops; Bt crops accounted for 15%; and stacked genes for herbicide tolerance and insect resistance used in both cotton and corn accounted for 8%.(C. James, Global Review of Commercialized Transgenic Crops: 2002, ISAAA Brief No. 27-2002, at 1112. Also available from ISAAA.org)Production of novel substances in crop plantsBiotechnology is being applied for novel uses other than food. For example, oilseed can be modified to produce fatty acids for detergents, substitute fuels and petrochemicals. Potatoes, tomatoes, rice tobacco, lettuce, safflowers, and other plants have been genetically engineered to produce insulin and certain vaccines. If future clinical trials prove successful, the advantages of edible vaccines would be enormous, especially for developing countries. The transgenic plants may be grown locally and cheaply. Homegrown vaccines would also avoid logistical and economic problems posed by having to transport traditional preparations over long distances and keeping them cold while in transit. And since they are edible, they will not need syringes, which are not only an additional expense in the traditional vaccine preparations but also a source of infections if contaminated.() In the case of insulin grown in transgenic plants, it is well-established that the gastrointestinal system breaks the protein down therefore this could not currently be administered as an edible protein. However, it might be produced at significantly lower cost than insulin produced in costly bioreactors. For example, Calgary, Canada-based SemBioSys Genetics, Inc. reports that its safflower-produced insulin will reduce unit costs by over 25% or more and approximates a reduction in the capital costs associated with building a commercial-scale insulin manufacturing facility of over $100 million, compared to traditional biomanufacturing facilities.(SemBioSys.ca. SemBioSys.ca. Retrieved on 2011-09-05.)Animal BiotechnologyIn animals, biotechnology techniques are being used to improve genetics and for pharmaceutical or industrial applications. Molecular biology techniques can help drive breeding programs by directing selection of superior animals. Animal cloning, through somatic cell nuclear transfer (SCNT), allows for genetic replication of selected animals. Genetic engineering, using recombinant DNA, alters the genetic makeup of the animal for selected purposes, including producing therapeutic proteins in cows and goats.() There is a genetically altered salmon with an increased growth rate being considered for FDA approval.()CriticismThere is another side to the agricultural biotechnology issue. It includes increased herbicide usage and resultant herbicide resistance, super weeds, residues on and in food crops, genetic contamination of non-GM crops which hurt organic and conventional farmers, etc.(Monsanto and the Roundup Ready Controversy,  SourceWatch.org)(Monsanto,  SourceWatch.org)Biological engineeringBiotechnological engineering or biological engineering is a branch of engineering that focuses on biotechnologies and biological science. It includes different disciplines such as engineering, engineering, bio-process engineering, biosystem engineering and so on. Because of the novelty of the field, the definition of a bioengineer is still undefined. However, in general it is an integrated approach of fundamental sciences and traditional engineering principles.Biotechnologists are often employed to scale up bio processes from the laboratory scale to the manufacturing scale. Moreover, as with most engineers, they often deal with management, economic and legal issues. Since patents and regulation (e.g., Food and Drug Administration regulation in the U.S.) are very important issues for biotech enterprises, bioengineers are often required to have knowledge related to these issues.The increasing number of biotech enterprises is likely to create a need for bioengineers in the years to come. Many universities throughout the world are now providing programs in bioengineering and biotechnology (as independent programs or specialty programs within more established engineering fields).Bioremediation and biodegradationBiotechnology is being used to engineer and adapt organisms especially microorganisms in an effort to find sustainable ways to clean up contaminated environments. The elimination of a wide range of pollutants and wastes from the environment is an absolute requirement to promote a sustainable development of our society with low environmental impact. Biological processes play a major role in the removal of contaminants and biotechnology is taking advantage of the astonishing catabolic versatility of microorganisms to degrade/convert such compounds. New methodological breakthroughs in sequencing, genomics, proteomics, bioinformatics and imaging are producing vast amounts of information. In the field of Environmental Microbiology, genome-based global studies open a new era providing unprecedented in silico views of metabolic and regulatory networks, as well as clues to the evolution of degradation pathways and to the molecular adaptation strategies to changing environmental conditions. Functional genomic and metagenomic approaches are increasing our understanding of the relative importance of different pathways and regulatory networks to flux in particular environments and for particular compounds and they will certainly accelerate the development of bioremediation technologies and biotransformation processes.()Marine environments are especially vulnerable since oil spills of coastal regions and the open sea are poorly containable and mitigation is difficult. In addition to pollution through human activities, millions of tons of petroleum enter the marine environment every year from natural seepages. Despite its toxicity, a considerable fraction of petroleum oil entering marine systems is eliminated by the hydrocarbon-degrading activities of microbial communities, in particular by a remarkable recently discovered group of specialists, the so-called hydrocarbonoclastic bacteria (HCCB).()Biotechnology regulationsThe National Institute of Health was the first federal agency to assume regulatory responsibility in the United States. The Recombinant DNA Advisory Committee of the NIH published guidelines for working with recombinant DNA and recombinant organisms in the laboratory. Nowadays, the agencies that are responsible for the biotechnology regulation are: Department of Agriculture (USDA) that regulates plant pests and medical preparation from living organisms, Protection Agency (EPA) that regulates pesticides and herbicides, and the and Drug Administration (FDA) which ensures that the food and drug products are safe and effective (EducationIn 1988, after prompting from the States Congress, the Institute of General Medical Sciences (Institutes of Health) instituted a funding mechanism for biotechnology training. Universities nationwide compete for these funds to establish Training Programs (BTPs). Each successful application is generally funded for five years then must be competitively renewed. students in turn compete for acceptance into a BTP; if accepted then stipend, tuition and health insurance support is provided for two or three years during the course of their PhD thesis work. Nineteen institutions offer NIGMS supported BTPs.(Nigms.Nih.Gov. Nigms.Nih.Gov. Retrieved on 2011-09-05.) Biotechnology training is also offered at the undergraduate level and in community colleges.See also* of biotechnology* Bioeconomics* Bioengineering* Biopolitics* Biomimetics* Bioculture* Biochemistry* Laboratories* companies* chemistry* of biochemistry* architecture* industrial park* and prizes in biotechnology* Engineering* Revolution* probe force microscope* of biotechnology articles* of biotechnology companies* List of emerging biotechnologies* Biotechnology Index* SWORD-financing* of Biotechnology* Technobiology* National Industrial Biotechnology FacilityReferences and notesFurther reading* * *  Viviana Zelizer Best Paper in Economic Sociology Award (20052006), American Sociological Association.* * Agricultural Biotechnology: An Economic Perspective by the USDA Economic Research Service. A 1994 publication from the Agricultural Economic Report.External links* The International Forum on Biotechnology* Foundation for Biotechnology Awareness and Education,* A report on Agricultural Biotechnology focusing on the impacts of Green Biotechnology with a special emphasis on economic aspects. fao.org.* US Economic Benefits of Biotechnology to Business and Society NOAA Economics, economics.noaa.gov* Database of the Safety and Benefits of Biotechnology  a database of peer-reviewed scientific papers and the safety and benefits of biotechnology.an:Biotecnolochaast:Bioteunoloxabn:ki-sutbe:be-x-old:bs:Biotehnologijabg:ca:Biotecnologiacs:Biotechnologieda:Bioteknologide:Biotechnologieet:Biotehnoloogiael:es:Biotecnologaeo:Bioteknikoeu:Bioteknologiafa:fr:Biotechnologiegl:Biotecnoloxagan:ko:hi:hr:Biotehnologijaid:Bioteknologiis:Lftkniit:Biotecnologiahe:kn:kk:la:Biotechnologialv:Biotehnoloijalt:Biotechnologijahu:Biotechnolgiaml:mr:ms:Bioteknologinl:Biotechnologienew:ja:no:Bioteknologinn:Bioteknologioc:Biotecnologiauz:Biotehnologiyapl:Biotechnologiapt:Biotecnologiaro:Biotehnologierue:ru:sah:sq:Bioteknologjiasimple:Biotechnologysk:Biotechnolgiasl:Biotehnologijasr:sh:Biotehnologijasu:Biothnologifi:Biotekniikkasv:Biotekniktl:Biyoteknolohiyatt:()th:tr:Biyoteknolojiuk:ngh sinh hcwar:Biyoteknolohiyabat-smg:Bioteknuoluogjzh:
4518
Borneo
Chinese, Borneo (, ) is the third largest island in the world and is located north of Island, Indonesia, at the geographic centre of Southeast Asia.The island is divided among three countries: Brunei, Indonesia and Malaysia. Approximately 73% of the island is Indonesian territory. The Malaysian states of Sabah and Sarawak in the north occupy about 26% of the island. The sovereign state of Brunei, located on the north coast, comprises about 1% of Borneos land area. Older than the rainforest, Borneo is home to one of the oldest rainforests in the world (however the Rainforest in Australia is older)GeographyImage:Mount kinabalu 01.png|thumb|left|Kinabalu by the China Sea to the north and northwest, the Sea to the northeast, the Sea and the Strait to the east, and the Sea and Strait to the south. It is the largest island in the archipelago, with an area of . To the west of Borneo are the Peninsula and Sumatra. To the south is Java. To the east is Sulawesi, and to the northeast, the Philippines.Borneos highest point is Kinabalu in Sabah, Malaysia, with an elevation of  above level. It is the third highest peak in East Asia, making Borneo the worlds third highest island.The largest river system is the Kapuas in Kalimantan. With a length of , it is the longest river in Indonesia. Malaysias longest river, the Rajang, lies in Sarawak and is  long. Other major rivers include the Barito in Kalimantan () and the Mahakam in Kalimantan ().Borneo has significant cave systems. Clearwater Cave, for example, has one of the worlds longest underground rivers. Cave is home to over three million bats, with guano accumulated to over  high.(BBC-TV: Planet Earth)Largest citiesThe following is a list of top 20 urban areas in Borneo by population based on 2010 calculations compiled by World Gazetteer.()()AdministrationThe island of Borneo is divided administratively by three countries. It is the only island in the world so divided (because although Scotland, England, and Wales are traditionally separate countries, they are today united in a federal entity, the UK):* The Indonesian provinces of East, South, West and Central Kalimantan* The Malaysian states of Sabah and Sarawak (the Federal Territory of Labuan is located on nearshore islands of Borneo, but not on the island of Borneo itself)* The independent country of Brunei (main part and eastern exclave of Temburong)1) Brunei: Census of Population 20012) islands administered as Borneo, geologically part of Borneo, on nearshore islands (2.5 km off the main island of Borneo)3) Citypopulation.de reports on Official Decennial Censuses in 2010 for both Indonesia and Malaysia, independent estimate for Brunei.HistoryAccording to ancient Chinese, Indian and Javanese manuscripts, western coastal cities of Borneo had become trading ports, part of their trade routes, since the first millennium.() In Chinese manuscripts, gold, camphor, tortoise shells, ivory, rhinoceros horn, crane crest, beeswax, lakawood (a scented heartwood and root wood of a thick liana, Dalbergia parviflora), blood, rattan, edible birds nests and various spices were among the most valuable items from Borneo.() The Indians named Borneo Suvarnabhumi (the land of gold) and also Karpuradvipa (Camphor Island). The Javanese named Borneo Puradvipa, or Diamond Island. Archaeological findings in the Sarawak river delta reveal that the area was once a thriving trading centre between India and China from the 500s until about 1300 AD.(File:Dayaks in their war dress.jpg|thumb|left|Dayaks, the natives of Borneo in their traditional war dress. Headhunting was an important part of Dayak culture.One of the earliest evidence of Hindu influence in Asia were stone pillars which bears inscriptions in the script found in Kutai along the River in Kalimantan dated around the second half of the 300s AD.()In the 14th century, almost all coastal parts of Borneo were under the control of Majapahit kingdom as is written in the Javanese Nagarakretagama document (ca. 1365) and it was called Nusa Tanjungnagara. The name of a trading port city in Borneo is Tanjungpura in the Nagarakretagama; the same name written in another Javanese Pararaton document (ca. 1355).(In the 15th century, the Majapahit rule exerted its influence in Borneo. Princess Junjung Buih, the queen of the Hindu kingdom of Negara Dipa (situated in Candi Agung area of Amuntai) married a Javanese prince, Prince Suryanata, and together they ruled the kingdom which is a tributary to the Majapahit Empire (1365). In this way, it became a part of Nusantara. Along the way, the power of Negara Dipa weakened and was replaced by the new court of Negara Daha. When Prince Samudra (Prince Suriansyah) of Negara Daha converted to Islam and formed the Islamic kingdom of Banjar, it inherited some of the areas previously ruled by the Hindu kingdom of Negara Daha.The Sultanate of Brunei, during its golden age from the 15th century to the 17th century, ruled a large part of northern Borneo. In 1703 (other sources say 1658), the Sultanate of Sulu received North Borneo from the Sultan of Brunei, after Sulu sent aid against a rebellion in Brunei. During the 1450s, Shariful Hashem Syed Abu Bakr, an Arab born in Johor, arrived in Sulu from Malacca. In 1457, he founded the Sultanate of Sulu; he then renamed himself Paduka Maulana Mahasari Sharif Sultan Hashem Abu Bakr. Subsequently HM Sultan Jamalul Ahlam Kiram (18631881), the 29th reigning Sultan of Sulu, leased North Borneo in 1878 to Gustavus Baron de Overbeck and Alfred Dent, representing the North Borneo Company() in what is now the Malaysian state of Sabah. The company also exerted control on inland territories that were inhabited by numerous tribes. In the 19th century, coastal areas ruled by the Sultanate in the west of the island were gradually taken by the dynasty of Brooke.() The Brooke dynasty ruled Sarawak for a hundred years and became famous as the Rajahs.By the 18th century, the area from Sambas to Berau were tributaries to the Banjar Kingdom, but this eventually shrunk to the size of what is now Kalimantan as a result of agreements with the Dutch. In the Karang Intan Agreement during the reign of Prince Nata Dilaga (Susuhunan Nata Alam) (18081825), the Banjar Kingdom gave up its territories to the Dutch Indies which included Bulungan, Kutai, Pasir, Pagatan and Kotawaringin. Other territories given up to the Dutch Indies were Landak, Sambas, Sintang and Sukadana.In the early 19th century, British and Dutch governments signed the Treaty of 1824 to exchange trading ports under their controls and assert spheres of influences, in which indirectly set apart the two parts of Borneo into British and Dutch controlled areas. China has had historical trading links with the inhabitants of the island. Some of the Chinese beads and wares found their way deep into the interior of Borneo. The Malay and Sea Dayak pirates preyed on maritime shipping in the waters between Singapore and Hong Kong from their haven in Borneo.() In 1849 Brooke and his Malays attacked the Sea-Dayaks and wiped out 800 of the 4,000 pirates.Moreover in the 19th century, the Dutch admitted the founding of district kingdoms with native leaders who were under the power of the Dutch (Indirect Bestuur).The Dutch assign a resident to head their rule over Kalimantan. List of the residents and governors of Kalimantan:# C.A. Kroesen (1898), resident# C.J. Van Kempen (1924), resident# J. De Haan (19241929), resident# R. Koppenel (19291931), resident# W.G. Morggeustrom (19331937), resident# Dr. A. Haga (19381942), governor# Pangeran Musa Ardi Kesuma (19421945), Ridzie# Ir. Pangeran Muhammad Noor (1945), governorAfter 1938, Dutch-Borneo (Kalimantan) was one administrative territory under a governor (Governor Haga) whose seat was in Banjarmasin. In 1957, following the independence of Indonesia, Kalimantan was divided into three provinces: South Kalimantan, East Kalimantan, and West Kalimantan. In 1958, the province of Central Kalimantan separated from South Kalimantan as its own territory.During War II, Japanese forces gained control of Borneo (194145). They decimated many local populations and killed Malay intellectuals. Sultan Ibrahim Shafi ud-din II of Sambas in Kalimantan was executed in 1944. The Sultanate was thereafter suspended and replaced by a Japanese council.(http://pariwisata.kalbar.go.id/index.php?opdeskripsi&u11&u21&idkt4) During the Japanese occupation, the Dayaks played a role in guerilla warfare against the occupying forces, particularly in the Kapit Division, where headhunting was temporarily revived towards the end of the war.(Guests can succeed where occupiers fail. The New York Times. November 9, 2007.) Allied Special Unit provided assistance to them. After the fall of Singapore, several thousand British and Australian prisoners of war were sent to camps in Borneo. At one of the very worst sites, around Sandakan in Borneo, only six of some 2,500 prisoners survived.(Japanese prisoners of war. Philip Towle, Margaret Kosuge, Yichi Kibata (2000). International Publishing Group. pp.47-48. ISBN 1852851929) In 1945 the island was liberated from the Japanese.The Borneo Federation, also known as Kalimantan Utara or North Kalimantan was a proposed political entity which would have comprised the British Colonies of Sarawak, British North Borneo (Sabah) and the protectorate of Brunei. The proposed federation was originally proposed by A. M. Azahari and was particularly favoured by the Brunei Peoples Party, which he led. This was seen as an alternative to joining the Federation of Malaysia, which was seen as an unnatural and unfavorable union by some. Before the Brunei Peoples Party electoral success, a military wing had emerged, the North Kalimantan National Army (Malay abbreviation TNKU, Tentera Nasional Kalimantan Utara), which saw itself as an anti-colonialist liberation party. After the Revolt, the idea was put to rest. Currently, there still remain groups of people who favor the creation of such an independent state and desire separation from the rest of Malaysia.Borneo was the main site of the confrontation between Indonesia and Malaysia between 1962 and about 1969, as well as the communist revolts to gain control of the whole area. Before the formation of Malaysian Federation, the Philippines claimed that the Malaysian state of Sabah in Borneo is within their territorial rights based on historical facts of the Sultanate of Sulus leasing agreement with the North Borneo Company, is presently an unresolved claim against Malaysia. Several other territorial claims such as Sipadan were resolved at Hague courts.EcologyImage:Nepenthes villosa.jpg|thumb|upright|villosa, a species of plant endemic to National Park, Borneo. The Borneo rainforest is 130 million years old, making it the oldest rainforest in the world and 70 million years older than the rainforest. Borneo is very rich in biodiversity compared to many other areas (MacKinnon et al. 1998). There are about 15,000 species of plants with 3,000 species of trees (267 species are dipterocarps), 221 species of terrestrial mammals and 420 species of resident birds in Borneo (MacKinnon et al. 1998). It is also the centre of evolution and radiation of many endemic species of plants and animals. Subject to mass deforestation, the remaining Borneo rainforest is one of the only remaining natural habitat for the endangered Orangutan. It is also an important refuge for many endemic forest species, as the Elephant, the Rhinoceros, the Clouded Leopard, the rare Hoses Civet and the Fruit Bat. An important reserve for elephants and rhinos is Wildlife Reserve in the northeastern corner of Borneo.It is one of the most biodiverse places on earth. The Wildlife Fund has stated that 361 animal and plant species have been discovered in Borneo since 1996, underscoring its unparalleled biodiversity.( ) In the 18 month period from July 2005 until December 2006, another 52 new species were found.The Wildlife Fund divides the island into seven distinct ecoregions. The lowland rain forests cover most of the island, with an area of . Other lowland ecoregions are the peat swamp forests, the Kerangas or Sundaland heath forests, the Borneo freshwater swamp forests, and the Shelf mangroves. The Borneo mountain rain forests lie in the central highlands of the island, above the  elevation. The highest elevations of Kinabalu are home to the Kinabalu mountain meadow, an alpine shrubland notable for its numerous endemic species, including many orchids.The island historically had extensive rainforest cover, but the area shrank rapidly due to heavy logging for the needs of the Malaysian plywood industry. Two forestry researchers of Sepilok Research Centre, Sandakan, Sabah in the early 80s identified four fast-growing hardwoods and a breakthrough on seed collection and handling of mangium and arborea, a fast growing tropical trees were planted on huge tract of formerly logged and deforested areas primarily in the northern part of Borneo Island. Half of the annual global timber acquisition comes from Borneo. Furthermore, oil plantations are rapidly encroaching on the last remnants of primary rainforest. The rainforest was also greatly destroyed from the forest fires of 1997 to 1998, which were started by the locals to clear the forests for crops and perpetuated by an exceptionally dry Nio season during that period. During the great fire, hotspots could be seen on satellite images and the haze thus created affected the surrounding countries of Brunei, Malaysia, Indonesia and Singapore. In February 2008, the Malaysian government announced the Corridor of Renewable Energy plan() to harvest the virgin hinterlands of Northern Borneo. Further deforestation and destruction of the biodiversity are anticipated in the wake of logging commissions, hydroelectric dams and other mining of minerals and resources.In order to combat overpopulation in Java, the Indonesian government started a massive transmigration (transmigrasi) of poor farmers and landless peasants into Borneo in the 70s and 80s, to farm the logged areas, albeit with little success as the fertility of the land has been removed with the trees and what soil remains is washed away in tropical downpours.DemographicsBorneo has 19,800,000 inhabitants (in mid 2010), a population density of 26 inhabitants per square km. Most of the population lives in coastal cities, although the hinterland is occupied at most in small towns and villages along the rivers. The population mainly consists of Malays, Banjar, Chinese and Dayak ethnic groups. The Chinese, who make up 29% of the population of Sarawak and 17% of total population in Kalimantan,(Province of West Kalimantan, Indonesia. Guangdong Foreign Affairs Office.) originally migrated from southeastern China.(The worlds successful diasporas. Management Today. April 3, 2007.) The majority of the population in Kalimantan is either Muslim or practice animism. Approximately 91% of the Dayaks are Christian, a religion introduced by missionaries in the 19th Century. In Kalimantan there is also a small Hindu minority. In the interior of Borneo are also the Penan, some of who still practice a nomadic hunter-gatherer existence. In some coastal areas of marginal settlements are also found Bajau, who were historically associated with a sea-oriented, boat-dwelling, nomadic existence. In the northwest of Borneo, the Dayak ethnic group is represented by the Iban with about 710,000 members.There are over 30 Dayak sub-groups living in Borneo, making the population of this island one of the most varied of human social groups. Some sub-ethnicities are now represented by only 30-100 individuals and are threatened with extinction. Ancestral knowledge of ethnobotany and ethnozoology is useful in drug discovery (for example, bintangor plant for AIDS) or as future alternative food sources (such as sago starch for acid production and sago maggots as a protein source). Certain indigenous Dayak people (such as the Kayan, Kenyah, Punan Bah and Penan) living on the island have been struggling for decades for their right to preserve their environment from loggers and transmigrant settlers and colonists.Kalimantan was the focus for an intense program that financed the relocation of poor landless families from Java, Madura, and Bali. In 2001, transmigrants made up 21% of the population in Kalimantan.() Since the 1990s, violent conflict has occurred between some transmigrant and indigenous populations; in Kalimantan, thousands were killed in fighting between transmigrants and the indigenous Dayak people.()See also* peat swamp forests* birds of Borneo* of Borneo* of Borneo* Banjar* Majapahit* Maphilindo* of Indonesia* of Borneo* of islands by areaReferencesFurther reading* Bowen, M. R., and T. V. Eusebio. 1982. Acacia mangium: updated information on seed collection and handling and germination testing. Seed Series No. 5. FAO/UNDP-MAL/78/009. Forest Research Centre, Sandakan, Sabah, Malaysia.* Bowen, M.R. and Eusebio, T.V. (1981) b): Acacia mangium. Updated information on seed collection, handling and germination testing. Occasional Tech. and Scientific Notes, Seed Series No.5, Forest Research Centre, web: Sepilok, Sandakan, Sabah, Malaysia.* Bowen, M.R. and Eusebio, T.V. (1982): Seed handling practices: four fast-growing hardwoods for humid tropical plantations in the eighties. Malaysian Forester Vol. 45, No. 4: 534547* Ghazally Ismail et al. (eds.) Scientific Journey Through Borneo Series. Malaysia Sarawak, Kota Samarahan. 1996-2001.* Gudgeon, L. W. W. British North Borneo. Adam and Charles Black, London (an early well-illustrated book on British North Borneo, now known as Sabah), 1913.* MacKinnon K, Hatta G, Halim H, Mangalik A. The ecology of Kalimantan. University Press, London. 1998.* Mathai, J., Hon, J., Juat, N., Peter, A., & Gumal, M. 2010. Small carnivores in a logging concession in the Upper Baram, Sarawak, Borneo. Small Carnivore Conservation 42: 19.* K M Wong & C L Chan. Mt Kinabalu: Borneos Magic Mountain. Natural History Publications, Kinabalu. 1998.* David Macdonald. Expedition to Borneo.* Dennis Lau. Borneo: A Photographic Journey.* Stephen Holley. White Headhunter in Borneo.* Robert Young Pelton Borneo.* Mel White:  Borneos moment of truth, Geographic Magazine, November 2008.* Mathai, J. 2010. Hoses Civet: Borneos mysterious carnivore. Nature Watch 18/4: 28.Selected references* Robert Young Pelton. Fieldings Borneohttp://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/ciu/05/5c/473f225b9da075a531691110._AA240_.L.jpg* Eric Hansen. Stranger in the Forest: On Foot Across Borneo.* John Wassner. Espresso with the Headhunters: A Journey Through the Jungles of Borneo.* Redmond OHanlon. Into the Heart of Borneo: An Account of a Journey Made in 1983 to the Mountains of Batu Tiban with James Fenton.* Charles M. Francis. A Photographic Guide to Mammals of South-east Asia.* Abdullah, MT. Biogeography and variation of Cynopterus brachyotis in Southeast Asia. PhD thesis. The University of Queensland, St Lucia, Australia. 2003.* Corbet, GB, Hill JE. The mammals of the Indomalayan region: a systematic review. Oxford University Press, Oxford. 1992.* G.W.H. Davison, Chew Yen Fook. A Photographic Guide to Birds of Borneo.* Hall LS, Gordon G. Grigg, Craig Moritz, Besar Ketol, Isa Sait, Wahab Marni and MT Abdullah. Biogeography of bats in Southeast Asia.  Sarawak Museum Journal LX(81):191284. 2004.* Karim, C., A.A. Tuen and M.T. Abdullah. Mammals. Sarawak Museum Journal Special Issue No. 6. 80: 221234. 2004.* Garbutt, Nick, and J. Cede Prudente. Wild Borneo: The Wildlife and Scenery of Sabah, Sarawak, Brunei, and Kalimantan. 2007.* Mohd. Azlan J., Ibnu Maryanto, Agus P. Kartono, and MT Abdullah. Diversity, Relative Abundance and Conservation of Chiropterans in Kayan Mentarang National Park, East Kalimantan, Indonesia. Sarawak Museum Journal 79: 251-265. 2003.* Hall LS, Richards GC, Abdullah MT. The bats of Niah National Park, Sarawak. Sarawak Museum Journal. 78: 255-282. 2002.External links* Environmental Profile of Borneo - Background on Borneo, including natural and history, deforestation statistics, and conservation news.ace:Kalimantanar:bn:zh-min-nan:Borneomap-bms:Kalimantanbe-x-old:Kalimantanbcl:Borneobs:Borneobr:Borneobg:ca:Borneoceb:Borneocs:Borneocy:Borneoda:Borneode:Borneoet:Kalimantanel:de Borneoeo:Borneoeu:Borneofa:fr:Bornofy:Borneogd:Borneogl:Borneohak:Ph-l-chhi:hr:Borneoid:Kalimantanos:is:Borneit:Borneohe:jv:Kalimantanka:kw:Borneosw:Borneola:Borneumlv:Kalimantnalt:Borneolmo:Borneohu:Bornemk:Borneomr:ms:Borneomy:nl:Borneoja:no:Borneonn:Borneooc:Bornopnb:pl:Borneopt:Bornuro:Borneoru:stq:Borneoscn:Borneusimple:Borneosk:Borneosl:Borneosr:sh:Borneofi:Borneosv:Borneotl:Borneota:th:tg:tr:Borneouk:ur:vi:Borneowar:Borneobat-smg:Borneozh:
4575
Ballad
File:The-Twa-Corbies.jpg|right|thumb|Illustration by Rackham of the ballad Twa CorbiesA ballad is a form of verse, often a narrative set to music. Ballads were particularly characteristic of British and Irish popular poetry and song from the later medieval period until the 19th century and used extensively across Europe and later the Americas, Australia and Africa. Many ballads were written and sold as single sheet broadsides. The form was often used by poets and composers from the 18th century onwards to produce lyrical ballads. In the later 19th century it took on the meaning of a slow form of popular love song and the term is now often used as synonymous with any love song, particularly the pop or rock power ballad. OriginsThe ballad probably derives its name from medieval French dance songs or ballares (from which we also get ballet), as did the alternative rival form that became the French Ballade. In theme and function they may originate from Scandinavian and Germanic traditions of storytelling that can be seen in poems such as Beowulf.(J. E. Housman, British Popular Ballads (1952, London: Ayer Publishing, 1969), p. 15.) The earliest example we have of a recognisable ballad in form in England is Judas in a 13th-century manuscript.(A. N. Bold, The Ballad (Routledge, 1979), p. 5.)Ballad formMost, but not all, northern and west European ballads are written in stanzas or quatrains (four-line stanzas) of alternating lines of iambic (an unstressed followed by a stressed syllable) tetrameter (eight syllables) and iambic trimeter (six syllables), known as ballad meter. Usually, only the second and fourth line of a quatrain are rhymed (in the scheme a, b, c, b), which has been taken to suggest that, originally, ballads consisted of couplets (two lines) of rhymed verse, each of 14 syllables.(D. Head and I. Ousby, The Cambridge Guide to Literature in English (Cambridge University Press, 2006), p. 66.) As can be seen in this stanza from Thomas and Fair Annet:The horse| fair Ann|et rode| upon|He amb|led like| the wind|,With sil|ver he| was shod| before,With burn|ing gold| behind|.(However, there is considerable variation on this pattern in almost every respect, including length, number of lines and rhyming scheme, making the strict definition of a ballad extremely difficult. In southern and eastern Europe, and in countries that derive their tradition from them, ballad structure differs significantly, like Spanish romanceros, which are octosyllabic and use consonance rather than rhyme.(T. A. Green, Folklore: An Encyclopedia of Beliefs, Customs, Tales, Music, and Art (ABC-CLIO, 1997), p. 81.) In all traditions most ballads are narrative in nature, with a self-contained story, often concise and relying on imagery, rather than description, which can be tragic, historical, romantic or comic.( Another common feature of ballads is repetition, sometimes of fourth lines in succeeding stanzas, as a refrain, sometimes of third and fourth lines of a stanza and sometimes of entire stanzas.(CompositionScholars of ballads are often divided into two camps, the communalists who, following the line established by the German scholar Gottfried Herder (17441803) and the Grimm, argue that ballads arose by a combined communal effort and did not have a single author, and individualists, following the thinking of English collector Sharp, who assert that there was a single original author.( The communalist position tends to lead to the view that more recent, particularly printed broadside ballads, where we may even know the author, are a debased form of the genre. The individualists position has tended to lead to the view that later changes in the words of ballads are corruptions of an original text.(M. Hawkins-Dady, Readers Guide to Literature in English (Taylor & Francis, 1996), p. 54.) More recently scholars have pointed to the interchange of oral and written forms of the ballad.(T. A. Green, Folklore: An Encyclopedia of Beliefs, Customs, Tales, Music, and Art (ABC-CLIO, 1997), p. 353.)ClassificationFile:012-O-Waken,-Waken,-Burd-Isbel-q75-404x500.jpg|right|thumb|Illustration by Rackham to Bekie. European Ballads have been generally classified into three major groups: traditional, broadside and literary. In America a distinction is drawn between ballads that are versions of European, particularly British and Irish songs, and native American ballads, developed without reference to earlier songs. A further development was the evolution of the blues ballad, which mixed the genre with Afro-American music. For the late 19th century the music publishing industry found a market for what are often termed sentimental ballads, and these are the origin of the modern use of the term ballad to mean a slow love song.Traditional balladsThe traditional, classical or popular (meaning of the people) ballad has been seen as originating with the wandering minstrels of late medieval Europe.( From the end of the 15th century we have printed ballads that suggest a rich tradition of popular music. We know from a reference in Langlands Plowman, that ballads about Hood were being sung from at least the late 14th century and the oldest detailed material we have is de Wordes collection of Robin Hood ballads printed about 1495.(B. Sweers, Electric Folk: The Changing Face of English Traditional Music (Oxford University Press, 2005), p. 45.)Early collections of ballads were made by Pepys (16331703) and in the Ballads collected by Robert Harley, 1st Earl of Oxford and Mortimer (16611724).( In the 18th century there were increasing numbers of such collections, including DUrfeys Wit and Mirth: or, Pills to Purge Melancholy (171920) and Bishop Thomas Percys Reliques of Ancient English Poetry (1765).( The last of these also contained some oral material and by the end of the 18th century this was becoming increasingly common, with collections including John Ritsons, The Bishopric Garland (1784), which paralleled the work of figures like Burns and Scott in Scotland.(Key work on the traditional ballad was undertaken in the late 19th century in Denmark by Grundtvig and for England and Scotland by the Harvard professor James Child.( They attempted to record and classify all the known ballads and variants in their chosen regions. Since Child died before writing a commentary on his work it is uncertain exactly how and why he differentiated the 305 ballads printed that would be published as English and Scottish Popular Ballads.(T. A. Green, Folklore: An Encyclopedia of Beliefs, Customs, Tales, Music, and Art (ABC-CLIO, 1997), p. 352.) There have been many different and contradictory attempts to classify traditional ballads by theme, but commonly identified types are the religious, supernatural, tragic, love ballads, historic, legendary and humorous.(BroadsidesBroadside ballads (also known as roadsheet, stall, vulgar or come all ye ballads) were a product of the development of cheap print in the 16th century. They were generally printed on one side of a medium to large sheet of poor quality paper. In their heyday of the first half of the 17th century, they were printed in black-letter or gothic type and included multiple, eye-catching illustrations, a popular tune tile, as well as an alluring poem.(E. Nebeker, The Heyday of the Broadside Ballad, English Broadside Ballad Archive, University of California-Santa Barbara, retrieved 15 August 2011.) By the 18th century, they were printed in white letter or roman type and often without much decoration (as well as tune title). These later sheets could include many individual songs, which would be cut apart and sold individually as slipsongs. Alternatively, they might be folded to make small cheap books or chapbooks which often drew on ballad stories.(G. Newman and L. E. Brown, Britain in the Hanoverian Age, 1714-1837: An Encyclopedia (Taylor & Francis, 1997), pp. 39-40.) They were produced in huge numbers, with over 400,000 being sold in England annually by the 1660s.(B. Capp, Popular literature, in B. Reay, ed., Popular Culture in Seventeenth-Century England (Routledge, 1985), p. 199.) Tessa Watt estimates the number of copies sold may have been in the millions.(T. Watt, Cheap Print and Popular Piety, 1550-1640 (Cambridge University Press, 1991), p. 11.) Many were sold by travelling chapmen in city streets or at fairs.(M. Spufford, Small Books and Pleasant Histories: Popular Fiction and Its Readership in Seventeenth-Century England (Cambridge University Press, 1985), pp. 111-28.) The subject matter varied from what has been defined as the traditional ballad, although many traditional ballads were printed as broadsides. Among the topics were love, religion, drinking-songs, legends, and early journalism, which included disasters, political events and signs, wonders and prodigies.(B. Capp, Popular literature, in B. Reay, ed., Popular Culture in Seventeenth-Century England (Routledge, 1985), p. 204.)Literary balladsLiterary or lyrical ballads grew out of an increasing interest in the ballad form among social elites and intellectuals, particularly in the movement from the later 18th century. Respected literary figures like Burns and Walter Scott in Scotland both collected and wrote their own ballads, using the form to create an artistic product. Similarly in England Wordsworth and Taylor Coleridge produced a collection of Ballads in 1798, including Coleridges Rime of the Ancient Mariner. At the same time in Germany Goethe cooperated with Schiller on a series of ballads, some of which were later set to music by Schubert.(J. R. Williams, The Life of Goethe (Blackwell Publishing, 2001), pp. 106-8.) Later important examples of the poetic form included Rudyard Kiplings Room Ballads (1892-6) and Wildes of Reading Gaol (1897).(S. Ledger, S. McCracken, Cultural Politics at the Fin de Sicle (Cambridge University Press, 1995), p. 152.)Ballad operasImage:William Hogarth 016.jpg|thumb|200px|Painting based on Beggars Opera, Act III Scene 2, Hogarth, c. 1728In the 18th century ballad operas developed as a form of English stage entertainment, partly in opposition to the Italian domination of the London operatic scene.(M. Lubbock, The Complete Book of Light Opera (New York: Appleton-Century-Crofts, 1962) pp. 467-68.) It consisted of racy and often satirical spoken (English) dialogue, interspersed with songs that are deliberately kept very short to minimize disruptions to the flow of the story. Subject matter involved the lower, often criminal, orders, and typically showed a suspension (or inversion) of the high moral values of the Italian opera of the period. The first, most important and successful was Beggars Opera of 1728, with a libretto by Gay and music arranged by Christopher Pepusch, both of whom probably influenced by Parisian vaudeville and the burlesques and musical plays of DUrfey (16531723), a number of whose collected ballads they used in their work.(F. Kidson, The Beggars Opera: Its Predecessors and Successors (Cambridge University Press, 1969), p. 71.) Gay produced further works in this style, including a sequel under the title Polly. Fielding, Cibber, Arne, Dibdin, Arnold, Shield, Jackson of Exeter, Hook and many others produced ballad operas that enjoyed great popularity.(M. Lubbock, The Complete Book of Light Opera (New York: Appleton-Century-Crofts, 1962), pp. 467-68.) Ballad opera was attempted in America and Prussia. Later it moved into a more pastoral form, like Bickerstaffes Love in a Village (1763) and Shields Rosina (1781), using more original music that imitated, rather than reproduced, existing ballads. Although the form declined in popularity towards the end of the 18th century its influence can be seen in light operas like that of and Sullivans early works like Sorcerer.(G. Wren, A Most Ingenious Paradox: The Art of Gilbert and Sullivan (Oxford University Press, 2006), p. 41.) In the 20th century, one of the most influential plays, Weill and Brechts (1928) Threepenny Opera was a reworking of The Beggars Opera, setting a similar story with the same characters, and containing much of the same satirical bite, but only using one tune from the original.(K. Lawrence, Decolonizing Tradition: New Views of Twentieth-century British Literary Canons (University of Illinois Press, 1992), p. 30.) The term ballad opera has also been used to describe musicals using folk music, such as The Martins and the Coys in 1944, and Bellamys The Transports in 1977.(A. J. Aby and P. Gruchow, The North Star State: A Minnesota History Reader, (Minnesota Historical Society Press, 2002), p. 461.) The satiric elements of ballad opera can be seen in some modern musicals such as Chicago and Cabaret.(L. Lehrman, Marc Blitzstein: A Bio-bibliography (Greenwood, 2005), p. 568.)Beyond EuropeNative American balladsNative American ballads are ballads that are native to North America (not to be confused with ballads performed by native Americans).( Some 300 ballads sung in North America have been identified as having origins in British traditional or broadside ballads.(N. Cohen, Folk Music: a Regional Exploration (Greenwood, 2005), pp. 14-29.) Examples include Streets of Laredo, which was found in Britain and Ireland as The Unfortunate Rake; however, a further 400 have been identified as originating in North America, including among the best known, Ballad of Davy Crockett and Jesse James.( They became an increasing area of interest for scholars in the 19th century and most were recorded or catalogued by Malcolm Laws, although some have since been found to have British origins and additional songs have since been collected.( They are usually considered closest in form to British broadside ballads and in terms of style are largely indistinguishable, however, they demonstrate a particular concern with occupations, journalistic style and often lack the ribaldry of British broadside ballads.(Blues balladsThe blues ballad has been seen as a fusion of Anglo-American and Afro-American styles of music from the 19th century. Blues ballads tend to deal with active protagonists, often anti-heroes, resisting adversity and authority, but frequently lacking a strong narrative and emphasising character instead.( They were often accompanied by banjo and guitar which followed blues musical format.( The most famous blues ballads include those about John Henry and Jones.(Bush balladsFile:The Old Bush Songs by Banio Paterson.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Cover to Patersons seminal 1905 collection of bush ballads, entitled The Old Bush SongsThe ballad was taken to Australia by early settlers from Britain and Ireland and gained particular foothold in the rural outback. The rhyming songs, poems and tales written in the form of ballads often relate to the itinerant and rebellious spirit of Australia in Bush, and the authors and performers are often referred to as bush bards.(Kerry OBrien December 10, 2003 7:30 Report, abc.net.au) The 19th century was the golden age of bush ballads. Several collectors have catalogued the songs including John Meredith whose recording in the 1950s became the basis of the collection in the Library of Australia.( The songs tell personal stories of life in the wide open country of Australia. Typical subjects include mining, raising and droving cattle, shearing, wanderings, war stories, the Australian shearers strike, class conflicts between the landless working class and the squatters (landowners), and outlaws such as Kelly, as well as love interests and more modern fare such as trucking.(G. Smith, Singing Australian: A History of Folk and Country Music (Pluto Press Australia, 2005), p. 2.) The most famous bush ballad is Matilda,  which has been called the unofficial national anthem of Australia.(Wholl come a waltzing Matilda with me?, The National Library of Australia, retrieved 14 March 2008.)Sentimental balladsNow the most commonly understood meaning of the term ballad, sentimental ballads, sometimes called tear-jerkers or drawing-room ballads owing to their popularity with the middle classes, had their origins in the early Pan Alley music industry of the later 19th century. They were generally sentimental, narrative, strophic songs published separately or as part of an opera (descendants perhaps of broadside ballads, but with printed music, and usually newly composed. Such songs include Little Rosewood Casket (1870), After the Ball (1892) and Boy.( By the era, ballad had come to mean any sentimental popular song, especially so-called royalty ballads, which publishers would pay popular singers to perform in Britain and the States in ballad concerts. Some of Fosters songs exemplify this genre.(Temperley (II,2).) By the 1920s, composers of Pan Alley and Broadway used ballad to signify a slow, sentimental tune or love song, often written in a fairly standardized form (see below). Jazz musicians sometimes broaden the term still further to embrace all slow-tempo pieces.(Witmer. See also Middleton (I,4,i).)Jazz, blues and traditional popAs new genres of music, such as ragtime, blues and jazz, began to emerge in the early 20th century the popularity of the genre faded, but the association with sentimentality led to the term ballad being used for a slow love song from the 1950s onwards.( Most pop standard and jazz ballads are built from a single, introductory verse; usually around 16 bars in length, and ending on the dominant; the chorus or refrain, usually it is 16 or 32 bars long, and in form (though other forms such as ABAC are not uncommon). In AABA forms, the B section is usually referred to as the bridge; often a brief coda, sometimes based on material from the bridge, was added as in the Rainbow.(Randel 1986, p. 68.) Other key traditional pop and jazz ballads include: Body and Soul by Green; Misty by Garner; The Man I Love by Gershwin; Funny Valentine by and Hart, God Bless the Child by Holiday, Time We Say Goodbye by Porter, the instrumental ballad Naima by Coltrane, a Sentimental Mood by Ellington and Always by Berlin.(A. Forte, The American Popular Ballad of the Golden Era, 1924-1950 (Princeton University Press, 1995).)Pop and rock balladsImage:Ec-hasslau.de 010.jpg|thumb|To emphasize the emotional aspect of a power ballad, crowds customarily hold up lit lighters.(POP VIEW; The Male Rock Anthem: Going All to Pieces. New York Times. Published February 1, 1998.)(Rock Concert Question: Are Lighter Salutes Bad for the Environment? Live Science, July 15, 2006.)The most common use of the term ballad in modern music is for an emotional love song.(N. Cohen, Folk Music: a Regional Exploration (Greenwood, 2005), p. 297.) When the word ballad appears in the title of a song, as for example in Beatless Ballad of John and Yoko or Joels Ballad of Billy the Kid, the folk-music sense is generally implied. Ballad is also sometimes applied to strophic story-songs more generally, such as McLeans American Pie.(D. R. Adams, Rock n roll and the Cleveland ConnectionMusic of the Great Lakes (Kent State University Press, 2002), ISBN 0873386914, p. 70.)Power balladsFrith identifies the origins of the power ballad in the emotional singing of soul artists, particularly Charles and the adaptation of this style by figures such as Burdon, Tom Jones and Cocker to produce slow tempo songs often building to a loud and emotive chorus backed by drums, electric guitars and sometimes choirs.( According to Charles Aaron, power ballads came into existence in the early 1970s, when rock stars attempted to convey profound messages to audiences.() He argues that the power ballad broke into the mainstream of American consciousness in 1976 as FM radio gave a new lease of life to earlier songs like Zeppelins to Heaven (1971), Aerosmiths Dream On (1973), and Skynyrds Bird (1974).( Other notable examples include Nazareths version of Hurts (1975), Foreigners Want to Know What Love Is,(S. Frith, Pop Music in S. Frith, W. Straw and J. Street, The Cambridge Companion to Pop and Rock (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press), pp. 100-1.) Scorpions Loving You, (both 1984), Hearts About Love (1985),(P. Buckley, The Rough Guide o Rock: the definitive guide to more than 1200 artists and bands (Rough Guides, 2003)) and Whitesnakes Is This Love (1987).(H. George-Warren, P. Romanowski and J. Pareles, The Rolling Stone Encyclopedia of Rock & Roll (Fireside, 3rd edn., 2001), p. 1060.) See also * ballads* Corrido  a form of ballad originating in northern Mexico and the U.S. southwest* Graves, Alfred Perceval* of the Child Ballads* of folk song collections* of Irish ballads* of rock ballads* ballad* Folk Song Index* structure (popular music)* songNotesReferences and further reading* Middleton, Richard. Popular Music (I). Grove Music Online ed. L. Macy (subscription required). Accessed 2007-04-06.* Randel, Don (1986). The New Harvard Dictionary of Music. Cambridge: Harvard University Press. ISBN 0-674-61525-5.* Temperley, Nicholas. Ballad (II, 2). Grove Music Online ed. L. Macy (subscription required). Accessed 2007-04-06.* Witmer, Robert. Ballad (jazz). Grove Music Online ed. L. Macy (subscription required). Accessed 2007-04-06.* Marcello Sorce Keller, Sul castel di mirabel: Life of a Ballad in Oral Tradition and Choral Practice, Ethnomusicology, XXX(1986), no. 3, 449- 469. External links *The Ballad Society of Japan*The British Literary Ballads Archive*The Bodleian Library Ballad Collection: view facsimiles of printed ballads*The English Broadside Ballad Archive: searchable database of ballad images, citations, and recordings*Welsh Ballads Website*The Traditional Ballad Index*Black-letter Broadside Ballads Of The years 1595-1639 From the Collection of Samuel Pepys*Smithsonian Global Sound: The Music of Poetry  audio samples of poems, hymns and songs in ballad meter.*The Oxford Book of Ballads, complete 1910 book by Arthur Quiller-Couch*Great Rock Ballads*Jazz and Vocal Ballads*English Broadside Ballad Archive -- an archive of images and recordings of over 4,000 pre-1700 broadside balladsbg:ca:Baladacs:Baladacy:Baledde:Balladeet:Ballaades:Baladaeo:Baladofa:fr:Balladegd:Baileadgan:hy:io:Baladopopolarehe:lt:Baladhu:Balladanl:Balladeja:no:Balladepl:Balladaro:Baladru:sq:Baladasimple:Balladsk:Baladasl:Baladafi:Balladisv:Balladtl:Baladath:tr:Baladuk:vi:Balladbat-smg:Baladzh:
4620
Bronze_Age
The Bronze Age is a period characterized by the use of copper and its alloy bronze as the chief hard materials in the manufacture of some implements and weapons. Chronologically, it stands between the Age and Age. The term Stone Age implies the inability to smelt any ore, the term Bronze Age implies the inability to smelt iron ore and the term Iron Age implies the ability to manufacture artifacts in any of the three types of hard material. Their arrangement in the archaeological chronology reflects the difficulty of manufacture in the history of technology.During the past few centuries of detailed, scientific study of the Bronze Age, it became clear that on the whole the use of copper or bronze was only the most stable and therefore the most diagnostic part of a cluster of features marking the period. In addition to the creation of bronze from raw materials and the widespread use of bronze tools and weapons, the period continued development of pictogramic or ideogramic symbols and proto-writing and other features of urban civilization. The Bronze Age is the 2nd principal period of the system as proposed in modern times by Jrgensen Thomsen for classifying and studying ancient societies. A region could be in the Bronze Age either by smelting its own copper and alloying with tin or by trading for bronze from production areas elsewhere. Copper/tin ores are rare, as reflected in the fact that there were no tin bronzes in Asia before the millennium BC. Worldwide, the Bronze Age generally followed the Neolithic period, but in some parts of the world, a Age served as a transition from the Neolithic to the Bronze Age. Although the Age generally followed the Bronze age, in some areas such as Africa, the Iron Age intruded directly on the Neolithic from outside the region.A difference between some of the Bronze Age cultures was the development of the first writings. Cultures in Egypt (hieroglyphs), the Near East (Cuneiform), but also in the Mediterranean, with the Mycenaean culture (B), had viable systems of written communication. The archaeological findings are evidence of the first written sources.HistoryThe term Bronze Age is ultimately derived from the of Man, the stages of human existence on the Earth according to mythology. Of these, the Age and Age are categorized by modern historians as mythical, but the Bronze Age as well as the Age are conceived as having a nucleus of historical validity. The overall period is characterized by the full adoption of bronze in many regions, though the place and time of the introduction and development of bronze technology is not universally synchronous.(Bronze was independently discovered in the culture of the Caucasus as early as the mid-millennium BC, which would make them the makers of the oldest known bronze. However, the Maykop culture only had bronze, a naturally occurring alloy. Other regions would utilize bronze and the associated technology at different periods.) Man-made tin bronze technology requires set production techniques. Tin must be mined (mainly as the tin ore cassiterite) and smelted separately, then added to molten copper to make the bronze alloy. The Bronze Age was a time of heavy use of metals and of developing trade networks (See sources and trade in ancient times).Near EastSoutheast Asia / Middle EastThe Bronze Age in the Near East began with the rise of Sumer in the 4th millennium BC. The Ancient Near East is considered by some as the of civilization and practised intensive year-round agriculture, developed a writing system, invented the potters wheel, created a centralized government, law codes, and empires, and introduced social stratification, slavery, and organized warfare. Societies in the region laid the foundations for astronomy and mathematics.Near East Timeline:Dates are approximate, consult particular article for detailsImageSize  width:800 height:115PlotArea  width:720 height:90 left:65 bottom:20AlignBars  justifyColors      id:period value:rgb(1,0.7,0.5) #     id:age value:rgb(0.95,0.85,0.5) #     id:era value:rgb(1,0.85,0.5) # Period      from:-3300 till:-300TimeAxis    orientation:horizontalScaleMajor  unit:year increment:500 start:-3300ScaleMinor  unit:year increment:100 start:-3300PlotData   align:center textcolor:black fontsize:8 mark:(line,black) width:15 shift:(0,-5)  bar:  color:period   from: -3300 till: -1200 text:Classic Bronze Age  bar:NEast color:era   from: -3300 till: -1200 shift:(0,5) text:Near East  from: -3300 till: -2100 text:Early Bronze Age  from: -2100 till: -1550 text:Intermediate Bronze Age  from: -1550 till: -1200 text:Late Bronze Age  bar:Mesop. color:age   from: -2900 till: -2350 text:Sumerian city-states  from: -2350 till: -2193 text:Akkadia  from: -2119 till: -2000 text:Ur   from: -2000 till: -1700 shift:(0,5) text:Babylonia  from: -2000 till: -1800 text:Assyria  from: -1600 till: -1200 text:Kassite   bar:Egyptian color:era  from: -3150 till: -1100 shift:(0,5) text:Egypt  from: -3150 till: -2700 text:Protodynastic  from: -2700 till: -2100 text:Old_Kingdom  from: -2100 till: -1625 text:Middle Kingdom  from: -1625 till: -1100 text:KingdomAge sub-divisionsThe Ancient Near East Bronze Age can be divided as follows:ImageSize  width:400 height:665PlotArea  width:300 height:640 left:80 bottom:20AlignBars  justifyColors      id:time value:rgb(0.7,0.7,1) #     id:period value:rgb(1,0.7,0.5) #     id:age value:rgb(0.95,0.85,0.5) #     id:era value:rgb(1,0.85,0.5) #     id:eon value:rgb(1,0.85,0.7) #     id:filler value:gray(0.8) # background bar    id:black value:blackPeriod      from:1200 till:3300TimeAxis    orientation:verticalScaleMajor  unit:year increment:100 start:1200ScaleMinor  unit:year increment:50 start:1200PlotData   align:center textcolor:black fontsize:8 mark:(line,black) width:20 shift:(25,-5)  bar:Phase color:era   from: 3300 till: 3000 text:EBA I  from: 3000 till: 2700 text:EBA II  from: 2700 till: 2200 text:EBA III  from: 2200 till: 2100 text:EBA IV  from: 2100 till: 2000 text:MBA I  from: 2000 till: 1750 text:MBA II A  from: 1750 till: 1650 text:MBA II B  from: 1650 till: 1550 text:MBA II C  from: 1550 till: 1400 text:LBA I  from: 1400 till: 1300 text:LBA II A  from: 1300 till: 1200 text:LBA II B  bar:Period color:age  from: 3300 till: 2100 text:Early Bronze Age (EBA)  from: 2100 till: 1550 text:Middle Bronze Age (MBA)  from: 2100 till: 1550 shift:(25,-20) text:(Intermediate Bronze Age)  from: 1550 till: 1200 text:Late Bronze Age (LBA)  bar:Age color:period   from: 3300 till: 1200 shift:(-25,0) text:Bronze AgeMesopotamiaIn Mesopotamia, the Mesopotamia Bronze Age begins in about 2900 BC and ends with the Kassite period. The usual tripartite division into an Early, Middle and Late Bronze Age is not used. Instead, a division primarily based on art-historical and historical characteristics is more common. The of the Ancient Near East housed several tens of thousands of people. Ur in the Middle Bronze Age and Babylon in the Late Bronze Age similarly had large populations.The earliest mention of Babylonia can be found in a tablet from the reign of of Akkad, dating back to the 23rd century BC. The Amorite dynasty established the city-state of Babylon in the 19th century BC; over 100 years later it briefly took over the others and formed the first empire, during what is also called the Old Babylonian Period. Babylonia adopted the written Semitic Akkadian language for official use. The Sumerian language by that time was no longer a spoken language, but it was still in religious use. The Akkadian and Sumerian traditions played a major role in later Babylonian culture, and the region would remain an important cultural center, even under outside rule, throughout the Bronze Age and the Early Iron Age.Persian PlateauElam was an ancient civilization located to the east of Mesopotamia. In the Old Elamite period (Middle Bronze Age), Elam consisted of kingdoms on the plateau, centered in Anshan, and from the mid-2nd millennium BC, it was centered in Susa in the Khuzestan lowlands. Its culture played a crucial role in the Empire and especially during the dynasty that succeeded it.The civilization(Dalton, O. M., Franks, A. W., & Read, C. H. (1905). The treasure of the Oxus: With other objects from ancient Persia and India. London: British Museum.) was a Bronze Age Asian culture dated to ca. 23001700 BC and centered on the upper Darya (Oxus). In the Early Bronze Age the culture of the Dag oases and Altyn-Depe developed a proto-urban society. This corresponds to level IV at Namazga-Depe. Altyn-Depe was a major centre even then. Pottery was wheel-turned. Grapes were grown. The height of this urban development was reached in the Middle Bronze Age c. 2300 BC, corresponding to level V at Namazga-Depe.(V.M. Masson, The Bronze Age in Khorasan and Transoxiana, chapter 10 in A.H. Dani and Vadim Mikhalovich Masson (eds.), History of civilizations of Central Asia, volume 1: The dawn of civilization: earliest times to 700 BC (1) It is this Bronze Age culture which has been given the BMAC name.The culture,(Possehl, G. L. (1986). Kulli: An exploration of ancient civilization in Asia. Durham, N.C: Carolina Academic Press)(Piggott, S. (1961). Prehistoric India to 1000 B.C. Baltimore: Penguin Book.) similar to those of the Valley Civilization, was located in southern Balochistan (Gedrosia) ca. 2500 - 2000 BC. Agriculture was the economical base of this people. At several places dams were found, providing evidence for a highly developed water management system.Sandal is associated with the hypothesized culture, a 3rd millennium BC culture postulated on the basis of a collection of artifacts confiscated in 2001.AnatoliaThe Empire was established in Hattusa in northern Anatolia from the century BC. In the century BC, the Hittite Kingdom was at its height, encompassing central Anatolia, southwestern Syria as far as Ugarit, and upper Mesopotamia. After BC, amid general turmoil in the Levant associated with the sudden arrival of the Peoples, the kingdom disintegrated into several independent Neo-Hittite city-states, some of which survived until as late as the century BC. Arzawa in Western Anatolia during the second half of the millennium BC likely extended along southern Anatolia in a belt reaching from near the Lakes Region all the way to the Aegean coast. Arzawa was the western neighbor, sometimes a rival and sometimes a vassal of the Middle and New Hittite Kingdoms. The league was a confederation of states in western Anatolia, defeated by the Hittites under an earlier I around BC. Arzawa has been associated with the much more obscure Assuwa generally located to its north - it probably bordered it, and may even be an alternative term for it (at least during some periods).LevantEbla experienced an apogee lasting from ca. 1850 to 1600 BC. The first known ruler of Ebla in this period was Megum, an Ensi (governor) for III during the reign of Amar-Sin of Ur. Ibbit-Lim was the first attested king. Ebla is mentioned in texts from Alalakh from ca. 1750 BC. The city was destroyed again in the turbulent period of 16501600 BC, by a Hittite king (I or I). This is attested to only by the fragmentary Hurro-Hittite of Release. Amorite kingdoms, ca. 20001600 BC, arose in Mari, Yamkhad, Qatna, Assyria,(under I) Isin, Larsa, and also Babylon. This era ended in northern Mesopotamia with the expulsion of the Amorite dominated Babylonians from Assyria by King Adasi c. 1720 BC, and in the south with the Hittite sack of Babylon (c. 1595 BC) which brought new ethnic groups  particularly Kassites  to the forefront in southern Mesopotamia. From the 15th century BC onward, the term Amurru is usually applied to the region extending north of Canaan as far as Kadesh on the Orontes.The Mitanni was a loosely organized state in northern Syria and south-east Anatolia from ca. 1500 BC1300 BC. Founded by an Indo-Aryan ruling class governing a predominately Hurrian population, Mitanni came to be a regional power after the Hittite destruction of Kassite Babylon created a power vacuum in Mesopotamia. At the beginning of its history, Mitannis major rival was Egypt under the Thutmosids. However, with the ascent of the Hittite empire, Mitanni and Egypt made an alliance to protect their mutual interests from the threat of Hittite domination. At the height of its power, during the 14th century BC, it had outposts centered around its capital, Washukanni, whose location has been determined by archaeologists to be on the headwaters of the Khabur River. Eventually, Mitanni succumbed to Hittite and later Assyrian attacks, and was reduced to the status of a province of the Middle Assyrian Empire.The earliest Ugarit contact with Egypt (and the first exact dating of Ugaritic civilization) comes from a carnelian bead identified with the Middle Kingdom pharaoh Senusret I, 1971 BC1926 BC. A stela and a statuette from the Egyptian pharaohs Senusret III and Amenemhet III have also been found. However, it is unclear at what time these monuments got to Ugarit. Amarna letters from Ugarit ca. 1350 BC records one letter each from Ammittamru I, Niqmaddu II, and his queen. From the 16th to the 13th century BC Ugarit remained in constant touch with Egypt and Cyprus (named Alashiya).The Aramaeans are a Northwest Semitic semi-nomadic and pastoralist people who originated in what is now modern Syria (Biblical Aram) during the Late Bronze Age and the Iron Age. Large groups migrated to Mesopotamia where they intermingled with the native Akkadian (Assyrian and Babylonian) population. The Aramaeans never had a unified empire; they were divided into independent kingdoms all across the Near East. After the Bronze Age collapse, their political influence was confined to a number of Syro-Hittite states, which were entirely absorbed into the Neo-Assyrian Empire by the 8th century BC.Ancient Egypt Early Bronze dynastiesIn Egypt, the Bronze Age begins in the Protodynastic period, c. 3150 BC. The archaic early Bronze Age of Egypt, known as the Dynastic Period of Egypt,(Karin Sowada and Peter Grave. Egypt in the Eastern Mediterranean during the Old Kingdom.)(Lukas de Blois and R. J. van der Spek. An Introduction to the Ancient World. Page 14.) immediately follows the unification of Lower and Upper Egypt, c. 3100 BC. It is generally taken to include the First and Second Dynasties, lasting from the Protodynastic Period of Egypt until about 2686 BC, or the beginning of the Old Kingdom. With the First Dynasty, the capital moved from Abydos to Memphis with a unified Egypt ruled by an Egyptian god-king. Abydos remained the major holy land in the south. The hallmarks of ancient Egyptian civilization, such as art, architecture and many aspects of religion, took shape during the Early Dynastic period. Memphis in the Early Bronze Age was the largest city of the time. The Kingdom of the regional Bronze Age( is the name given to the period in the 3rd millennium BC when Egypt attained its first continuous peak of civilization in complexity and achievement  the first of three Kingdom periods, which mark the high points of civilization in the lower Nile Valley (the others being Kingdom and the Kingdom).The Intermediate Period of Egypt,(Hansen, M. H. (2000). A comparative study of thirty city-state cultures: An investigation conducted by the Copenhagen Polis Centre. Copenhagen: Det Kongelike Danske Videnskabernes Selskab. Page 68.) often described as a dark period in ancient Egyptian history, spanned about 100 years after the end of the Old Kingdom from about 2181 to 2055 BC. Very little monumental evidence survives from this period, especially from the early part of it. The First Intermediate Period was a dynamic time when rule of Egypt was roughly divided between two competing power bases: Heracleopolis in Lower Egypt and Thebes in Upper Egypt. These two kingdoms would eventually come into conflict, with the Theban kings conquering the north, resulting in reunification of Egypt under a single ruler during the second part of the 11th Dynasty.Middle Bronze dynastiesThe Kingdom of Egypt lasted from 2055 to 1650 BC. During this period, the Osiris funerary cult rose to dominate Egyptian popular religion. The period comprises two phases: the 11th Dynasty, which ruled from Thebes and the 12th(Othmar Keel and Christoph Uehlinger. Gods, goddesses, and images of God in ancient Israel, 1998. Page 17 (cf. The first phase (Middle Bronze Age IIA) runs roughly parallel to the Egyptian Twelfth Dynasty)) and 13th Dynasties which were centered around el-Lisht. The unified kingdom was previously considered to comprise the 11th and 12th Dynasties, but historians now at least partially consider the 13th Dynasty to belong to the Middle Kingdom.During the Intermediate Period,(Bruce G. Trigger. Ancient Egypt: a social history. 1983. Page 137. (cf. ... for the Middle Kingdom and Second Intermediate Period it is the Middle Bronze Age.)) Ancient Egypt fell into disarray for a second time, between the end of the Middle Kingdom and the start of the New Kingdom. It is best known for the Hyksos, whose reign comprised the 15th and 16th dynasties. The Hyksos first appeared in Egypt during the 11th Dynasty, began their climb to power in the 13th Dynasty, and emerged from the Second Intermediate Period in control of Avaris and the Delta. By the 15th Dynasty, they ruled lower Egypt, and they were expelled at the end of the 17th Dynasty.Late Bronze dynastiesThe Kingdom of Egypt, also referred to as the Egyptian Empire, lasted from the 16th to the 11th century BC. The New Kingdom followed the Second Intermediate Period and was succeeded by the Intermediate Period. It was Egypts most prosperous time and marked the peak of Egypts power. The later New Kingdom, i.e. the 19th and 20th Dynasties (1292-1069 BC), is also known as the period, after the eleven pharaohs that took the name of Ramesses.Central AsiaCaucasusbronze artifacts of the culture in the Caucasus have been dated around the 4th millennium BC.(Philip L. Kohl. The making of bronze age Eurasia. Page 58.) This innovation resulted in the circulation of arsenical bronze technology over southern and eastern Europe.(Gimbutas, The Beginning of the Bronze Age in Europe and the Inclo- Europeans 3500-2500 BC, Journal of Indo-European Studies 1 (1973): 177.)Pontic-Caspian steppeThe culture is a late copper age/early Bronze Age culture of the Southern Bug/Dniester/Ural region (the Pontic steppe), dating to the 36th23rd centuries BC. The name also appears in English as Pit Grave Culture or Ochre Grave Culture. The culture, ca. 2800-2200 BC, refers to an early Bronze Age culture occupying essentially what is present-day Ukraine. Its seemed more of as an areal term to cover several smaller related archaeological cultures. The culture was a Late Bronze Age (18th-12th centuries BC) culture. It is a successor to the Yamna culture, the Pit Grave culture and the Poltavka culture.Seima-Turbino PhenomenonThe Mountains in what is now southern Russia and central Mongolia have been identified as the point of origin of a cultural enigma termed the Phenomenon.() It is conjectured that changes in climate in this region around 2000 BC and the ensuing ecological, economic and political changes triggered a rapid and massive migration westward into northeast Europe, eastward into China and southward into Vietnam and Thailand across a frontier of some 4,000 miles.( This migration took place in just five to six generations and led to peoples from Finland in the west to Thailand in the east employing the same metal working technology and, in some areas, horse breeding and riding.( It is further conjectured that the same migrations spread the Uralic group of languages across Europe and Asia: some 39 languages of this group are still extant, including Hungarian, Finnish, Estonian and Lappish.(However, recent genetic testings of sites in south Siberia and Kazakhstan (Andronovo horizon) would rather support a spreading of the bronze technology via Indo-european migrations eastwards, as this technology was well known for quite a while in western regions.(http://www.pubmedcentral.nih.gov/articlerender.fcgi?artid1691686 C. Lalueza-Fox et al. 2004. Unravelling migrations in the steppe: mitochondrial DNA sequences from ancient central Asians)(http://www.springerlink.com/content/4462755368m322k8/ C. Keyser et al. 2009. Ancient DNA provides new insights into the history of south Siberian Kurgan people. Human Genetics.)East AsiaEast Asia Timeline:Dates are approximate, consult particular article for detailsImageSize  width:800 height:60PlotArea  width:720 height:35 left:65 bottom:20AlignBars  justifyColors      id:time value:rgb(0.7,0.7,1) #     id:age value:rgb(0.95,0.85,0.5) #     id:era value:rgb(1,0.85,0.5) #     id:filler value:gray(0.8) # background bar    id:black value:blackPeriod      from:-3300 till:-300TimeAxis    orientation:horizontalScaleMajor  unit:year increment:500 start:-3300ScaleMinor  unit:year increment:100 start:-3300PlotData   align:center textcolor:black fontsize:8 mark:(line,black) width:15 shift:(0,-5)  bar:China color:age   from: -3000 till: -700 shift:(0,5) text:Age China  from: -3000 till: -2700 text:Majiayao  from: -3000 till: -2000 text:Longshan  from: -2000 till: -1550 text:Erlitou  bar:China color:era  from: -1550 till: -1046 text:Shang  from: -1046 till: -700 text:Zhu  bar:Korea color:era  from: -1500 till: -300 text:GojoseonChinaHistorians disagree about the dates of a Bronze Age in China.  The difficulty lies in the term Bronze Age, as it has been applied to signify a period in history when bronze tools replaced stone tools, and, later, were themselves replaced by iron ones.  The medium of the new Age made that of the old obsolete. In China, however, any attempt to establish a definite set of dates for a Bronze Age is complicated by two factors:# arrival of iron smelting technology, and# persistence of bronze objects.The earliest bronze artifacts have been found in the culture site (between 3100 and 2700 BC),()() and from then on, the society gradually grew into the Bronze Age.Bronze metallurgy in China originated in what is referred to as the Erlitou () period, which some historians argue places it within the range of dates controlled by the Shang dynasty.(Chang, K. C.: Studies of Shang Archaeology, pp. 67, 1.  Yale University Press, 1982.)  Others believe the Erlitou sites  belong to the preceding Xia () dynasty.(Chang, K. C.: Studies of Shang Archaeology, p. 1.  Yale University Press, 1982.)  The U.S. Gallery of Art defines the Chinese Bronze Age as the period between about 2000 BC and 771 BC, a period that begins with Erlitou culture and ends abruptly with the disintegration of Western Zhou rule.() Though this provides a concise frame of reference, it overlooks the continued importance of bronze in Chinese metallurgy and culture. Since this is significantly later than the discovery of bronze in Mesopotamia, bronze technology could have been imported rather than discovered independently in China. However, there is reason to believe that bronzework developed inside China separately from outside influence.(Li-Liu; The Chinese Neolithic, Cambridge University Press, 2005)(Shang and Zhou Dynasties: The Bronze Age of China Heilbrunn Timeline Retrieved May 13, 2010)The Dynasty(Also known as the Dynasty.)(Thorp, R. L. (2005). China in the early bronze age: Shang civilization. Philadelphia: Univ. of Pennsylvania Press.) of the River Valley rose to power after the Dynasty. While some direct information about the Shang Dynasty comes from Shang-era inscriptions on bronze artifacts, most comes from oracle bones  turtle shells, cattle scapulae, or other bones, which bear glyphs that form the first significant corpus of recorded Chinese characters. Iron is found from the Dynasty, but its use is minimal. Chinese literature dating to the 6th century BC attests a knowledge of iron smelting, yet bronze continues to occupy the seat of significance in the archaeological and historical record for some time after this.(Barnard, N.: Bronze Casting and Bronze Alloys in Ancient China, p. 14.  The Australian National University and Monumenta Serica, 1961.)  Historian W. C. White argues that iron did not supplant bronze at any period before the end of the Zhou dynasty (256 BC) and that bronze vessels make up the majority of metal vessels all the way through the Later Han period, or to 221.(White, W. C.: Bronze Culture of Ancient China, p. 208.  University of Toronto Press, 1956.)The Chinese bronze artifacts generally are either utilitarian, like spear points or adze heads, or ritualistic, like the numerous large sacrificial tripods known as dings in Chinese.  However, even some of the most utilitarian objects bear the markings of more sacred items.  The Chinese inscribed all kinds of bronze items with three main motif types:  demons, symbolic animals, and abstract symbols.(Erdberg, E.: Ancient Chinese Bronzes, p. 20.  Siebenbad-Verlag, 1993.)  Some large bronzes also bear inscriptions that have helped historians and archaeologists piece together the history of China, especially during the Zhou Dynasty (1046-256 BC).The bronzes of the Western Zhou Dynasty document large portions of history not found in the extant texts that were often composed by persons of varying rank and possibly even social class. Further, the medium of cast bronze lends the record they preserve a permanence not  enjoyed by manuscripts.(Shaughnessy, E. L.:  Sources of Western Zhou History, pp. xvxvi.  University of California Press, 1982.)  These inscriptions can commonly be subdivided into four parts:  a reference to the date and place, the naming of the event commemorated, the list of gifts given to the artisan in exchange for the bronze, and a dedication.(Shaughnessy, E. L. Sources of Western Zhou History, pp. 7683.  University of California Press, 1982.)  The relative points of reference these vessels provide have enabled historians to place most of the vessels within a certain time frame of the Western Zhou period, allowing them to trace the evolution of the vessels and the events they record.(Shaughnessy, E. L. Sources of Western Zhou History, p. 107)KoreanThe Gojoseon period on the peninsula is usually said to be 1000 BC, but estimates range from the 15th to 8th centuries BC. Although the Korean Bronze Age culture derives from the Liaoning and Manchuria, it exhibits unique typology and styles, especially in ritual objects.(http://daegu.museum.go.kr/museum/english/body_02/body02_1_03.htm)The pottery period is named after the Korean name for undecorated or plain cooking and storage vessels that form a large part of the pottery assemblage over the entire length of the period, but especially 850-550 BC. The Mumun period is known for the origins of intensive agriculture and complex societies in both the Korean Peninsula and the Japanese Archipelago. The Middle Mumun pottery period culture of the southern Peninsula gradually adopted bronze production (c. 700600? BC) after a period when Liaoning-style bronze daggers and other bronze artifacts were exchanged as far as the interior part of the Southern Peninsula (c. 900700 BC). The bronze daggers lent prestige and authority to the personages who wielded and were buried with them in high-status megalithic burials at south-coastal centres such as the site. Bronze was an important element in ceremonies and as for mortuary offerings until 100.South Asia South Asia Timeline :Dates are approximate, consult particular article for detailsImageSize  width:800 height:50PlotArea  width:720 height:25 left:65 bottom:20AlignBars  justifyColors      id:age value:rgb(0.95,0.85,0.5) #     id:filler value:gray(0.8) # background bar    id:black value:blackPeriod      from:-3300 till:-300TimeAxis    orientation:horizontalScaleMajor  unit:year increment:500 start:-3300ScaleMinor  unit:year increment:100 start:-3300PlotData   align:center textcolor:black fontsize:8 mark:(line,black) width:15 shift:(0,-5)  bar:India color:age  from: -3000 till: -1550 shift:(0,7) text:Age India  from: -3000 till: -2700 text:Early Indus  from: -2700 till: -1900 text:Harappan  from: -1900 till: -1550 text:Late HarappaIndus ValleyThe Bronze Age on the subcontinent began around 3300 BC with the beginning of the Indus Valley civilization. Inhabitants of the Indus Valley, the Harappans, developed new techniques in metallurgy and produced copper, bronze, lead and tin. The Indian Bronze Age was followed by the Iron Age Period. The Harappan culture, which dates from 1700 BC to 1300 BC, overlapped the transition from the Bronze Age to the Iron Age; thus it is difficult to date this transition accurately.Southeast AsiaDating back to the Age, the first bronze drums, called the Son drums, have been uncovered in and around the River Delta regions of Vietnam and Southern China. These relate to the prehistoric Son Culture of Vietnam. In Chiang, Thailand, (Asia) bronze artifacts have been discovered dating to 2100 BC.() In Nyaunggan, Burma bronze tools have been excavated along with ceramics and stone artifacts. Dating is still currently broad (3500500 BC).()EuropeEuropean Timeline :A few examples of named Bronze Age cultures in Europe in roughly relative order. The chosen cultures overlapped in time and the indicated periods do not correspond to their estimated extends.ImageSize  width:800 height:105PlotArea  width:720 height:75 left:65 bottom:20AlignBars  justifyColors      id:time value:rgb(0.7,0.7,1) #     id:period value:rgb(1,0.7,0.5) #     id:age value:rgb(0.95,0.85,0.5) #     id:era value:rgb(1,0.85,0.5) #     id:eon value:rgb(1,0.85,0.7) #     id:filler value:gray(0.8) # background bar    id:black value:blackPeriod      from:-3300 till:-300TimeAxis    orientation:horizontalScaleMajor  unit:year increment:500 start:-3300ScaleMinor  unit:year increment:100 start:-3300PlotData   align:center textcolor:black fontsize:8 mark:(line,black) width:15 shift:(0,-5)  bar:Europe color:era   from: -3200 till: -600 shift:(0,7) text:Age Europe  from: -3200 till: -2850 text:Aegean Bronze  from: -2850 till: -2500 text:Corded Ware  from: -2500 till: -2150 text:Beaker  from: -2150 till: -1600 text:Unetice   from: -1600 till: -1250 text:Tumulus  from: -1250 till: -750 text:Urnfield  from: -1250 till: -600 shift:(40,0) text:Lusatian  bar:Britain color:era  from: -2700 till: -700 shift:(0,7) text:Age Britain  from: -2700 till: -2500 text:Mount Pleasant  from: -2500 till: -1900 text:Beaker  from: -1900 till: -1500 text:Bedd Branwen  from: -1500 till: -1300 text:Acton Park  from: -1300 till: -1200 shift:(0,5)text:Knighton Heath  from: -1200 till: -850 text:Urnfield  from: -850 till: -700 text:Ewart Park  bar:Scand. color:era   from: -1700 till: -500 shift:(0,7) text:Bronze Age  from: -1700 till: -1500 text:Phase I  from: -1500 till: -1300 text:Phase II  from: -1300 till: -1100 text:Phase III  from: -1100 till: -900 text:Phase IV  from: -900 till: -700 text:Phase V  from: -700 till: -500 text:Phase VIAegeanThe Aegean Bronze Age begins around 3200 BC,(http://www.britishmuseum.org/explore/cultures/europe/ancient_greece.aspx) when civilizations first established a far-ranging trade network.  This network imported tin and charcoal to Cyprus, where copper was mined and alloyed with the tin to produce bronze. Bronze objects were then exported far and wide, and supported the trade. Isotopic analysis of tin in some Mediterranean bronze artifacts point to the fact that they may have originated from Britain.(Carl Waldman, Catherine Mason. Encyclopedia of European peoples: Volume 1. 2006. Page 524.)Knowledge of navigation was well developed at this time, and reached a peak of skill not exceeded (except perhaps by Polynesian sailors) until 1730 when the invention of the chronometer enabled the precise determination of longitude.The civilization based in Knossos appears to have coordinated and defended its Bronze Age trade. Illyrians are also believed to have roots in the early Bronze Age. Ancient empires valued goods in contrast to foods, leading to famine.(Lancaster, H. O. (1990). Expectations of life: A study in the demography, statistics, and history of world mortality. New York: Springer-Verlag. Page 228.) This may have arisen because money was concentrated in the hands of a few people, rather than due to a lack of modern accounting methods.Aegean CollapseBronze Age collapse theories have described aspects of the end of the Age in this region. At the end of the Bronze Age in the Aegean region, the Mycenaean administration of the regional trade empire followed the decline of Minoan primacy.(Drews, R. (1993). The end of the Bronze Age: Changes in warfare and the catastrophe ca. 1200 B.C. Princeton, N.J: Princeton University Pres) Several Minoan client states lost much of their population to famine and/or pestilence. This would indicate that the trade network may have failed, preventing the trade that would previously have relieved such famines and prevented illness caused by malnutrition. It is also known that in this era the breadbasket of the Minoan empire, the area north of the Sea, also suddenly lost much of its population, and thus probably some cultivation.The Aegean Collapse has been attributed to the exhaustion of the Cyprus forests causing the end of the bronze trade.(Cities on the Sea., Swiny, S., Hohlfelder, R. L., & Swiny, H. W. (1998). Res maritimae: Cyprus and the eastern Mediterranean from prehistory to late antiquity : proceedings of the Second International Symposium Cities on the Sea, Nicosia, Cyprus, October 1822, 1994. Atlanta, Ga: Scholars Press.)(Creevey, B. (1994). The forest resources of Bronze Age Cyprus)(A. Bernard Knapp, Steve O. Held and Sturt W. Manning. The prehistory of Cyprus: Problems and prospects.) These forests are known to have existed into later times, and experiments have shown that charcoal production on the scale necessary for the bronze production of the late Bronze Age would have exhausted them in less than fifty years.Aegean Collapse has also been attributed to the fact that as iron tools became more common, the main justification for the tin trade ended, and that trade network ceased to function as it did formerly.(Lockard, Craig A. (2009). Societies, Networks, and Transitions: To 600. Wadsworth Pub Co. Page 96.) The colonies of the Minoan empire then suffered drought, famine, war, or some combination of those three, and had no access to the distant resources of an empire by which they could easily recover.The eruption occurred around the Aegean Collapse,  north of Crete. Speculation include a tsunami from Thera (more commonly known today as Santorini) destroyed Cretan cities. A tsunami may have destroyed the Cretan navy in its home harbour, which then lost crucial naval battles; so that in the LMIB/LMII event (c. 1450 BC) the cities of Crete burned and the civilization took over Knossos. If the eruption occurred in the late 17th century BC (as most chronologists now think) then its immediate effects belong to the Middle to Late Bronze Age transition, and not to the end of the Late Bronze Age; but it could have triggered the instability that led to the collapse first of Knossos and then of Bronze Age society overall. One such theory looks to the role of Cretan expertise in administering the empire, post-Thera. If this expertise was concentrated in Crete, then the Mycenaeans may have made political and commercial mistakes in administering the Cretan empire.Archaeological findings, including some on the island of Thera, suggest that the centre of Minoan Civilization at the time of the eruption was actually on Thera rather than on Crete. According to this theory, the catastrophic loss of the political, administrative and economic centre by the eruption as well as the damage wrought by the tsunami to the coastal towns and villages of Crete precipitated the decline of the Minoans. A weakened political entity with a reduced economic and military capability and fabled riches would have then been more vulnerable to human predators. Indeed, the Santorini Eruption is usually dated to c. 1630 BC, while the Mycenaean Greeks first enter the historical record a few decades later, c. 1600 BC. Thus, the later Mycenaean assaults on Crete (c.1450 BC) and Troy (c.1250 BC) are revealed as mere continuations of the steady encroachments of the Greeks upon the weakened Minoan world.Central EuropeIn Europe, the early Bronze Age culture (18001600 BC) includes numerous smaller groups like the Straubing, Adlerberg and Hatvan cultures. Some very rich burials, such as the one located at Leubingen with grave gifts crafted from gold, point to an increase of social stratification already present in the Unetice culture. All in all, cemeteries of this period are rare and of small size. The Unetice culture is followed by the middle Bronze Age (16001200 BC) culture, which is characterised by inhumation burials in tumuli (barrows). In the eastern Hungarian Krs tributaries, the early Bronze Age first saw the introduction of the culture, followed by the Ottomany and cultures.The late Bronze Age Urnfield culture, (1300700 BC) is characterized by cremation burials. It includes the culture in eastern Germany and Poland (1300500 BC) that continues into the Age. The Central European Bronze Age is followed by the Iron Age culture (700450 BC).Important sites include:* Biskupin (Poland)* Nebra (Germany)* Vrble (Slovakia)* Zug-Sumpf, Zug, SwitzerlandThe Bronze Age in Central Europe has been described in the chronological schema of German prehistorian Paul Reinecke. He described Bronze A1 (Bz A1) period (23002000 BC : triangular daggers, flat axes, stone wrist-guards, flint arrowheads) and Bronze A2 (Bz A2) period (19501700 BC : daggers with metal hilt, flanged axes, halberds, pins with perforated spherical heads, solid bracelets) and phases Hallstatt A and B (Ha A and B).South EuropeThe culture (also called Italian Bronze Age) is a technology complex of central and southern Italy spanning the Chalcolithic and Bronze Age proper. The Camuni were an ancient people of uncertain origin (according to the Elder, they were Euganei; according to Strabo, they were Rhaetians) who lived in Camonica - in what is now northern Lombardy - during the Age, although human groups of hunters, shepherds and farmers are known to have lived in the area since the Neolithic.Located in Sardinia and Corsica, the civilization lasted from the early Bronze Age (18th century BC) to the 2nd century AD, when the islands were already Romanized. They take their name from the characteristic nuragic towers, which evolved from the pre-existing megalithic culture, which built dolmens and menhirs. The nuraghe towers are unanimously considered the best preserved and largest megalithic remains in Europe. Their effective use is still debated: some scholars considered them as monumental tombs, others as Houses of the Giants, other as fortresses, ovens for metal fusion, prisons or, finally, temples for a solar cult.The Terramare was a Proto-Indo-European civilization which lived in the area of what is now Padana (northern Italy) before the arrival of the Celts, as well as in other parts of Europe. They lived in villages constituted of wooden houses: they had a square shape, built on the  mainland but generally near a stream, with roads that crossed each other at angles. The whole complex denoted the nature of a fortified settlement. The Terramare were widespread in the Pianura Padana (specially along the Panaro river, between Modena and Bologna) and in the rest of Europe. The civilization developed in the Middle and Recent Bronze Age, between the 17th and the 13th centuries BC.The culture developed in Istria during the Mid-Bronze Age. It lasted for more than a millennium, from the 15th century BC until the Roman conquest in the 3rd century BC. It takes its name from the fortified boroughs (Castellieri, Friulian cjastelir) which characterized the culture.The culture developed from the mid-Bronze Age (13th century BC) till the Iron Age in the Padana, in what is are now western Lombardy, eastern Piedmont and Ticino. It takes its name from the township of Canegrate where, in the 20th century, some fifty tombs with ceramics and metal objects were found.rior population who had descended to Padana from the Swiss Alps passes and the Ticino.The culture developed starting from the late Bronze Age in the plain. It takes its name from Golasecca, a locality next to the Ticino where, in the early 19th century, abbot Giovanni Battista Giani excavated its first findings (some fifty tombs with ceramics and metal objects). Remains of the Golasecca culture span an area of c. 20,000 square kilometers south to the Alps, between the Po, Sesia and Serio rivers, dating from the 9th to the 4th century BC.West EuropeAtlantic Bronze AgeThe Bronze Age is a cultural complex of the period of approximately 1300700 BC that includes different cultures in Portugal, Andalusia, Galicia and the British Isles. It is marked by economic and cultural exchange. Commercial contacts extend to Denmark and the Mediterranean. The Atlantic Bronze Age was defined by a number of distinct regional centres of metal production, unified by a regular maritime exchange of some of their products.Great BritainIn Britain, the Bronze Age is considered to have been the period from around 2100 to 750 BC. Migration brought new people to the islands from the continent. Recent tooth enamel isotope research on bodies found in early Bronze Age graves around Stonehenge indicate that at least some of the migrants came from the area of modern Switzerland. The culture displayed different behaviours from the earlier Neolithic people, and cultural change was significant. Integration is thought to have been peaceful, as many of the early henge sites were seemingly adopted by the newcomers. The rich culture developed in southern Britain at this time. Additionally, the climate was deteriorating; where once the weather was warm and dry it became much wetter as the Bronze Age continued, forcing the population away from easily defended sites in the hills and into the fertile valleys. Large livestock farms developed in the lowlands and appear to have contributed to economic growth and inspired increasing forest clearances. The culture began to emerge in the second half of the Middle Bronze Age (c. 14001100 BC) to exploit these conditions. Devon and Cornwall were major sources of tin for much of western Europe and copper was extracted from sites such as the Orme mine in northern Wales. Social groups appear to have been tribal but with growing complexity and hierarchies becoming apparent.The burial of dead (which until this period had usually been communal) became more individual. For example, whereas in the Neolithic a large cairn or barrow was used to house the dead, the Early Bronze Age saw people buried in individual barrows (also commonly known and marked on modern British Survey maps as tumuli), or sometimes in cists covered with cairns.The greatest quantities of bronze objects found in England were discovered in Cambridgeshire, where the most important finds were recovered in Isleham (more than 6500 pieces).(Hall and Coles, p. 8188.)Alloying of copper with zinc or tin to make brass or bronze was practised soon after the discovery of copper itself. One copper mine at Orme in North Wales, extended to a depth of 70 meters.() At Edge in Cheshire, carbon dates have established mining at around 2280 to 1890 BC (at 95% probability).() The earliest identified metalworking site (Sigwells, Somerset) is much later, dated by Globular Urn style pottery to approximately the 12th century BC. The identifiable sherds from over 500 mould fragments included a perfect fit of the hilt of a sword in the Wilburton style held in Somerset County Museum.()IrelandThe Age in Ireland commenced around 2000 BC, when copper was alloyed with tin and used to manufacture Ballybeg type flat axes and associated metalwork. The preceding period is known as the Age and is characterised by the production of axes, daggers, halberds and awls in copper. The period is divided into three phases: Bronze Age (20001500 BC), Bronze Age (15001200 BC), and Bronze Age (1200  c. 500 BC). Ireland is also known for a relatively large number of Early Bronze Age burials.One of the characteristic types of artifact of the Early Bronze Age in Ireland is the flat axe. There are five main types of flat axes: Ravel (c. 2200 BC), Ballybeg (c. 2000 BC), Killaha (c. 2000 BC), Ballyvalley (c. 20001600 BC), Derryniggin (c. 1600 BC), and a number of metal ingots in the shape of axes.(Waddell; Eogan.)North EuropeThe Bronze Age in Northern Europe spans the entire millennium BC (culture, culture, culture, culture, culture) in Northern Europe lasting until ca. 600 BC. The Northern Bronze Age was a period and a Bronze Age culture in Scandinavian pre-history, c. 1700-500 BC, with sites that reached as far east as Estonia. Succeeding the Late Neolithic culture, its ethnic and linguistic affinities are unknown in the absence of written sources. It is followed by the Iron Age.Even though Northern European Bronze Age cultures were fairly late and came in existence via trade, sites present rich and well-preserved objects made of wool, wood and imported Central European bronze and gold. Many rock carvings depict ships, and the large stone burial monuments known as stone ships suggest that shipping played an important role. Thousands of rock carvings depict ships, most probably representing sewn plank built canoes for warfare, fishing and trade. These may have a history as far back as the neolithic period and continue in to the Pre-Roman Iron Age, as shown by the boat. There are many mounds and rock carving sites from the period. Numerous artifacts of bronze and gold are found. No written language existed in the Nordic countries during the Bronze Age. The rock carvings have been dated through comparison with depicted artifacts.AmericasThe Moche civilization of America independently discovered and developed bronze smelting.(http://www.lablaa.org/blaavirtual/publicacionesbanrep/bolmuseo/1996/jldi41/jldi01a.htm El bronce y el horizonte medio) Bronze technology was developed further by the Incas and used widely both for utilitarian objects and sculpture.()  Later appearance of limited bronze smelting in West Mexico (see in pre-Columbian Mesoamerica) suggests either contact of that region with Andean cultures or separate discovery of the technology.Outside the Bronze AgeJapanThe period lasted until 500 BC and, after the end of the period, the Japanese experienced the introduction of bronze and iron simultaneously. Chinese technologies were adopted in the Korean peninsula and spread to the Japanese. Iron was mainly used for agricultural and other tools; whereas, ritual and ceremonial artifacts were mainly made of bronze.AfricaAlthough North Africa was influenced to certain extent by European Bronze Age cultures (for examples, traces of the beaker tradition are found in Morocco), Africa did not develop its own metallurgy until the Phoenician colonization (ca. 1100 BC) of North Africa and remained attached to the Neolithic way of life. The civilization of the Ancient Egypt, whose influence did not cover the rest of Africa, was rather an exception from this rule as regarding the whole range of ancient cultures of Africa.In Sub-Saharan Africa, inhabitants at Termit, in eastern Niger became the first iron smelting people in West Africa and among the first in the world around 1500 BC. Iron and copper working then continued to spread southward through the continent, reaching the Cape around AD 200. The widespread use of iron revolutionized the Bantu-speaking farming communities who adopted it, driving out and absorbing the rock tool using hunter-gatherer societies they encountered as they expanded to farm wider areas of savannah. The technologically superior Bantu-speakers spread across southern Africa and became wealthy and powerful, producing iron for tools and weapons in large, industrial quantities.In the region of the Ar Mountains in Niger we have the development of independent copper smelting between 30002500 BC. The process was not in a developed state, indication smelting was not foreign. It became mature about the 1500 BC.(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_ferrous_metallurgy#Sub-Saharan_Africa)See also*ingot*table of the principal old world prehistoric cultures*Bronze Age migrations (Ancient Near East)*Namazga V and AltyndepeSeafaring*bronze age boat  the earliest known seagoing plank-built vessel*Boats*Bay hoard  see also MuseumNotesReferences*Figueiredo, Elin (2010) Smelting and Recycling Evidences from the Late Bronze Age habitat site of Baioes, Journal of Archaeological Science, Volume 37, Issue 7, p. 16231634*Eogan, George (1983) The hoards of the Irish later Bronze Age, Dublin : University College, 331p., ISBN 0-901120-77-4*Hall, David and Coles, John (1994) Fenland survey : an essay in landscape and persistence, Archaeological report 1, London : English Heritage, 170 p., ISBN 1-85074-477-7*Pernicka, E., Eibner, C., ztunah, ., Wagener, G.A. (2003) Early Bronze Age Metallurgy in the Northeast Aegean, In: Wagner, G.A., Pernicka, E. and Uerpmann, H-P. (eds), Troia and the Troad : scientific approaches, Natural science in archaeology, Berlin; London : Springer, ISBN 3-540-43711-8, p. 143172*Waddell, John (1998) The prehistoric archaeology of Ireland, Galway University Press,  433 p., ISBN 1-901421-10-4*Siklosy et al. (2009): Bronze Age volcanic event recorded in stalagmites by combined isotope and trace element studies. Rapid Communications in Mass Spectrometry, 23/6, 801-808.  http://www3.interscience.wiley.com/journal/122202090/abstract* Roberts, B.W., Thornton, C.P. and Pigott, V.C. 2009. Development of Metallurgy in Eurasia. Antiquity 83, 112-122.Additional reading* * * * External links*Web index Bronze Age in Europe*Ancient tin: old question and a new answer*Bronze Age Experimental Archeology and Museum Reproductions*Umha Aois - Reconstructed Bronze Age metal casting*Umha Aois - ancient bronze casting videoclip*Reconstructing the Danish Trundholm Sun Chariot*Ancient bronze idol 13 cent B.C.: Northern Russia *Hypothetical reconstruction of a Lusatian culture settlement, raised using only bronze age tools - Wola Radziszowska (near Cracow) - Poland*Aegean and Balkan Prehistory articles, site-reports and bibliography database concerning the Aegean, Balkans and Western Anatolia*Downloadable article: Evidence that a West-East admixed population lived in the Tarim Basin as early as the early Bronze Age Li et al. BMC Biology 2010, 8:15.Seafaring*Divers unearth Bronze Age hoard off the coast of Devon*Moor Sands finds, including a remarkably well preserved and complete sword that has parallels with material from the Seine basin of northern Franceaf:Bronstydperkals:Bronzezeitde Bronzede BronceS-tibo:dobaan aremdel bronzebronzovyr Efyddda:Bronzealderde:Bronzezeitet:Pronksiaeg del Bronceeo:BronzepokoAroYugdu bronzefy:Brnstiiddo Broncegan:dobaPerungguis:Bronslddel bronzoza ShabaAenealaikmetsamiusli:Broonstiedhu:Bronzkorml:Gangsade l Bronze my:nl:Bronstijdnds-nl:Bronstiedja:no:Bronsealderennn:Bronsealderendel Bronzedl bronznds:Bronzetietbrzudo BronzeBronzuluie bronzitd brunzuAgedobadobadobafi:Pronssikausisv:Bronsldernng Tansong Pulath:aasyryi  ngfiu-vro:Pronksiaigvls:Brounstydhan Bronsezh-yue:omioszh:
4635
Bombardier_Inc.
 homepage          www.bombardier.comBombardier Inc. () is a Canadian conglomerate, founded by Bombardier as LAuto-Neige Bombardier Limite in 1942, at Valcourt in the Townships, Quebec. Over the years it has been a large manufacturer of regional aircraft, jets, transportation equipment, recreational equipment and a financial services provider. Bombardier was a Global 500 conglomerate company.(Fortune Global 500  Bombardier Inc. Company Snapshot 2007) Its headquarters are in Montreal, Quebec, Canada.(Aerospace Directory. Bombardier Inc. Retrieved on December 4, 2010. Bombardier Inc. Corporate Headquarters 800 Ren-Lvesque Boulevard West Montral, Qubec Canada H3B 1Y8. Address in French: 800, boul. Ren-Lvesque Boulevard Ouest Montral (Qubec) H3B 1Y8 Canada.)Historythumb|Bombardier was a mechanic who dreamed of building a vehicle that could float on snow. In 1937, he designed and produced his first snowmobile in his small repair shop in Valcourt, Quebec.Bombardiers technological breakthrough in the design of bush vehicles came in the mid-1930s when he developed a drive system that revolutionized travel in snow and swampy conditions. In 1937, Bombardier sold 12 snowmobilesnamed the B7 and, in 1942, created lAuto-Neige Bombardier Limite company.The first snowmobiles were large, multi-passenger vehicles designed to help people get around during the long winter months. Snowmobiles were used in rural Quebec to take children to school, carry freight, deliver mail, and as ambulances. His invention filled a very particular need in the region and soon business was booming. In 1941, Armand opened a large new factory in Valcourt. Then a major setback hit the growing business: the Second World War was well underway and the Canadian government issued wartime rationing regulations. Bombardier customers had to prove that snowmobiles were essential to their livelihood in order to buy one. To keep his business going, Armand switched gears and developed vehicles for the military. After the war, Bombardier experienced another setback in his snowmobile business. In 1948, the Quebec government passed a law requiring all highways and local roads to be cleared of snow; the Bombardier companys sales fell by nearly half in one year. Armand Bombardier therefore decided to diversify his business, first by producing tracked snowplows sized specifically  for use on municipal sidewalks (replacing horse-drawn devices), then by making all-terrain vehicles for the mining, oil and forestry industries.Of note, the machines had removable front skis that could be replaced with front wheels for use on paved or hard surfaces, thus providing greater utility to his large snowmobiles. Production of these machines evolved over time.  During 1951, the wooden bodies were replaced with sheet steel and these vehicles were powered by Chrysler flathead six-cylinder engines and 3-speed manual transmissions. In the 1960s, V-8 engines began to appear and during the 1969/70 production years, the standard round porthole-style windows were replaced with larger rectangular windows which allowed more interior light and made them feel less claustrophobic.  Following these changes came the switchover to more reliable Chrysler Industrial 318 engines with the automatic Loadflite transmissions. Production of these machines continued into the mid-1970s.Bombardier dreamed of developing a fast, lightweight snowmobile that could carry one or two people. In the early 1950s, Armand set aside his dream to focus on developing his companys other tracked vehicles, but by the end of the decade, smaller, more efficient engines had been developed and were starting to come onto the market. Bombardier resumed his efforts to build a miniature snowmobile. He worked alongside his eldest son Germain, who shared his fathers mechanical talents. Armand and Germain developed several prototypes of the lightweight snowmobile and finally, the first Bombardier snowmobile went on sale in 1959.thumb|right|Bombardier BR100+ Groomer, mid engine, hard cab modelThe Ski-doo was originally called the Ski-Dog because Bombardier meant it to be a practical vehicle to replace the dogsled for hunters and trappers. By an accident, a painter misinterpreted the name and painted Ski-Doo on the first prototype.  The public soon discovered that speedy vehicles that could zoom over snow were a lot of fun. Suddenly a new winter sport was born, centred in Quebec. In the first year, Bombardier sold 225 Ski-Doos; four years later, 8,210 were sold. But Armand was reluctant to focus too much on the Ski-Doo and move resources away from his all-terrain vehicles. He vividly remembered his earlier business setbacks that forced him to diversify. Armand slowed down promotion of the Ski-Doo line to prevent it from dominating the other company products but still dominate the entire snowmobile industry.  The snowmobiles produced were of exceptional quality and performance, earning a better reputation than the rival Polaris and Cat brand of motosleds. In 1975 Bombardier completed the purchase of the Moto-Ski company.On February 18, 1964, J. Armand Bombardier died of cancer at age 56. He left behind a thriving business, but also one that had been focused on one person. Armand dominated his company, overseeing all areas of operation. He controlled the small research department, making all the drawings himself. By the time of his death sales of the company had reached C$20 million, which is the equivalent of C$160 million in 2004 dollars. The younger generation took over, led by Armands sons and sons-in-law. The young team reorganized and decentralized the company, adopting modern business tactics. The company adopted the latest technological innovationthe computerto handle inventory, accounts and billing. Distribution networks were improved and increased, and an incentive program was developed for sales staff.In 1967, LAuto-Neige Bombardier Limite was renamed Bombardier Limited and on January 23, 1969, the company went public, listing on the Montreal and Toronto exchanges.AerospaceImage:Delta Bombardier 20071027.jpg|thumb|right|A Bombardier Regional Jet in Delta liveryIn 1986,(Project North Star Restoration Primer  Sec. 3.1 Canadair) Bombardier acquired Canadair after the Canadian government-owned aircraft manufacturing company had recorded the largest corporate loss in Canadian business history. Shortly thereafter, Havilland Canada from Boeing, Brothers and Learjet operations were added. The aerospace arm now accounts for over half of the companys revenue.  Bombardiers most popular aircraft currently include its 8, CRJ100/200/440, and CRJ700/900/1000 lines of airliners. It also manufactures the CL-415 amphibious water-bomber, the Express and the Challenger business jet. Learjet continues to operate as a subsidiary of Bombardier and manufactures jets under the Learjet name.Bombardier also manufactured the Olympic Torch for the Winter Olympics Torch RelayRailway technologyImage:IORE Kiruna.jpg|thumb|left|IORE locomotiveIn 1970, Bombardier acquired the Viennese company Lohner-Rotax, a manufacturer of snowmobile engines and tramways, and became involved with rail business. This section started to gain importance in the mid-1990s in the renaissance of tramways or light-rail transit. Bombardier acquired the assets and designs of Locomotive Company/Locomotive Works, which continued in the locomotive business until 1985. In the Canadian market, they also acquired Siddeley Canadas Bay facilities and UTDC (formerly of Kingston).In 2001, Bombardier  acquired ADtranz (DaimlerChrysler Rail Systems), a manufacturer of trains which were widely used throughout Germany and Great Britain. Bombardier was one of the companies which took over Rails R&D facilities after privatisation (the remainder largely being absorbed into Technology and Alstom).With the acquisition of ADtranz from DaimlerChrysler, Bombardier Transportation emerged as one of the largest manufacturers of railway rolling stock in the world.Financial servicesBombardier Capital (BC) was the Bombardier division in charge of financial services.() From 1973, when it was based in Vermont,() it offered financial services such as lending, leasing, and asset-management throughout the Americas. In 2001, BC restricted its loan activity to existing customers.( The company, which began transitioning some services to Florida in 1997,( ceased taking on new consumer loans in 2001, focusing instead on loans to retailers and gradually downsizing.(() In November 2004, Bombardiers credit evaluation was downgraded by Moodys from moderate credit risk (Baa3) to questionable credit quality (Ba2), a below grade rating which impacted Bombardier Capital, although the companys transportation division was unaffected.( accessdate  2009-02-22) In 2005, Bombardier sold the Inventory Finance Division of BC to Commercial Finance.()( )DivestituresMilitaryBombardier was, until recently, a major Canadian contractor. With the latest restructuring, the company sold off nearly all of its military-related work in Canada. Military Aviation Services was sold to Aerospace and land-based defence products made by Transportation Development Corporation ceased operations as Bombardier moved away from non-aviation defence products.Recreational productsImage:Bombardier old.svg|thumb||right|150px|Old Bombardier sprocket logoOn 27 August 2003  Bombardier, Inc. announced the sale of its BRP (Recreational Products) unit to a group of investors: Capital (50%), Bombardier Family (35%) and Caisse de Dpt & Placements du Qubec (15%) for $875 million.(Bombardier Recreational Products News)As part of the deal, BRP retained rights to the sprocket logo, which they subsequently modified.  Its snowcats and snowmobiles dated back to the origins of the company; current brands are Ski-Doo and Lynx. Bombardier Recreational Products has also become well known for its Sea-Doo watercraft division which also features jet-powered sport boats.  Bombardier also makes ATVs (terrain vehicles).  In 2006, the Bombardier ATV was rebranded as Can-Am. Can-Am is the old name of the line of dirt bikes it produced in the 1980s which used high-tech engines featuring RAVE (Rotax Automatic Variable Exhaust) valving to create peak power at a wider range of RPMs.  The bikes were shelved but technology tweaks re-emerged in the Companys Ski-Doo snowmobiles (beginning with the 1989 model year Ski-Doo Mach 1).  Many of todays snowmobiles produced by the Company feature proprietary engineering by BRPs Rotax brand engine production plant located in Austria.  BRPs Can-Am product is among the high tech recreational vehicles which specifically include the Spyder, a three-wheel roadster with a rear-drive wheel and featuring a vehicle stability system (VSS), anti-lock braking system (ABS) and other safety and electronic vehicle control enhancements as certified by the Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA).Public transport busIn the early 1980s in Ireland, Iompair ireann (now Bus) commissioned a range of single and double decker buses to be designed and produced. The prototypes were devised in Germany and production was carried out in Shannon, Co. Clare, Ireland. A total of 418 single and double deck buses entered service from this facility from 1981 until their withdrawal from service in 2000. Some still are used for training and exist in as Museum exhibition pieces.(Conway, Shane. The Bombardier buses and coaches of CIE. The Classic Irish Buses website, 15 August 2010. Retrieved: 17 August 2010.) Bombardier Museum thumb|right|1951 Bombardier B12 Snow Bus SnowmobileThe Bombardier Museum is a large modern museum in Valcourt, Quebec dedicated to the life of Bombardier and the snowmobile as well as the industry he helped create.  Formally opened in 1971, with substantial renovations in 1990, the museum is professionally curated and features a wide array of Ski-Doos and other industrial designs as well as a selection of related books, booklets and other items of interest to enthusiasts.Also of note at the museum is the original Bombardier garage factory that was the genesis of the organization bearing the name.  The garage was carefully removed from its original location in Valcourt and moved to its present site at the museum, which is located blocks away from the huge, present-day Recreational Products factory.See also* snow cruiser* Iltis* Moto-Ski* Snowcat* coach* grooming* SnowmobilesReferencesFurther reading* Descarries, Eric. Autoneiges Bombardier:  Des patenteux perptuent la tradition.  La Presse, 13 March 2006.* Hadekel, Peter. Silent Partners: Taxpayers and the Bankrolling of Bombardier. Toronto: Key Porter Books Limited, 2004. ISBN 1-55263-626-7.* MacDonald, Larry.The Bombardier Story: Planes, Trains and Snowmobiles. Toronto: J. Wiley & Sons, 2001. ISBN 0-470-83196-0.External links**Bombardier Museum, Official J. Armand Bombardier Museum Website*Northern Tracks, Bombardier Collectors Website*Vintage Snowmobiles, Moto-Ski Snowmobile History*CBC Digital Archives  Bombardier: The Snowmobile Legacy*Yahoo!  Bombardier Inc. Company Profile*V/LineCars.com VLocity 160 Page- Comprehensive information on Bombardiers VLocity 160 type diesel multiple unit train made for V/Line, the passenger rail service operator in the state of Victoria, Australia.ar:bg:ca:Bombardiercs:Bombardierda:Bombardierde:Bombardieres:Bombardiereo:Bombardier(entreprise)ko:id:Bombardierit:Bombardierhe:Inc.nl:Bombardierja:no:Bombardier(przedsibiorstwo)pt:Bombardierru:Bombardiersk:Bombardierfi:Bombardiersv:Bombardierth:zh:
4660
Basque_people
footnotes  The Basques (, , ) as an group, primarily inhabit an area traditionally known as the Basque Country (), a region that is located around the western end of the Pyrenees on the coast of the of Biscay and straddles parts of north-central Spain and south-western France.The Basques are known in the local languages as:*Euskaldunak (Basque speakers, also used loosely to describe all ethnic Basques), euskal herritarrak (natives of the Basque Country) or euskotarrak (natives of the Basque Country, an often mentioned but rarely used neologism) in Basque*Vascos in Spanish*Basques in French*Bascos in GasconEtymology of the word BasqueThe English word Basque comes from French Basque (pronounced ), which itself comes from Gascon Basco (pronounced ) and Spanish Vasco  (pronounced ). These, in turn, come from Latin Vasco (pronounced ), plural Vascones (see History section below). The Latin approximant /w/ generally evolved into the bilabials /b/ and // in Gascon and Spanish, probably under the influence of Basque and Aquitanian, a language related to old Basque and spoken in Gascony in Antiquity (similarly the Latin /w/ evolved into /v/ in French, Italian and other languages). Several coins from the 1st and 2nd centuries BC found in the Basque Country bear the inscription barscunes. The place where they were minted is not certain but is thought to be somewhere near Pamplona in the heartland of the area that historians believe was inhabited by the Vascones. Some scholars have suggested a Celtic etymology based on bhar-s-, meaning summit, point or leaves, according to which barscunes may have meant the mountain people, the tall ones or the proud ones, while others have posited a relationship to a proto-Indo-European root *bar- meaning border, frontier, march.()In Basque, Basques call themselves euskaldunak, singular euskaldun, formed from euskal- (i.e. Basque (language)) and -dun (i.e. one who has); euskaldun literally means a Basque speaker. Not all Basques are Basque-speakers, and not all Basque speakers are Basques; foreigners who have learned Basque can also be called euskaldunak. Therefore the neologism euskotar, plural euskotarrak, was coined in the 19th century to mean an ethnically Basque person whether Basque-speaking or not. These Basque words are all derived from euskara, the Basque name for the Basque language.Alfonso Irigoyen claimed that the word euskara comes from an ancient Basque verb enautsi to say (cf. modern Basque esan) and the suffix -(k)ara (way (of doing something)). Thus euskara would literally mean way of saying, way of speaking. One item of evidence in favour of this hypothesis is found in the Spanish book Compendio Historial, written in 1571 by the Basque writer de Garibay, who records the name of the Basque language as enusquera. It may be however a writing mistake.In the 19th century, the Basque nationalist activist Arana posited an original root euzko which, he thought, came from eguzkiko (of the sun on the assumption of an original solar religion). On the basis of this putative root Arana proposed the name Euzkadi for an independent Basque nation, composed by seven basque historical territories. Aranas neologism Euzkadi, in the regularized spelling Euskadi, is still widely used in both Basque and Spanish, since it is now the official name of the Community of the Basque Country.It has also been suggested that the root of eusk- may be linked to the Aquitanian tribe of the Ausci.HistorySince the Basque language is unrelated to Indo-European, it is often thought that they represent the people or culture who occupied Europe before the spread of Indo-European languages there.It is thought that Basques are a remnant of the early inhabitants of Western Europe, specifically those of the Franco-Cantabrian region. Basque tribes were already mentioned in Roman times by Strabo and Pliny, including the Vascones, the Aquitani, and others. There is enough evidence to support that at that time and later they spoke old varieties of the Basque language (see: language).In the Early Middle Ages (up to 910th centuries) the territory between the Ebro and Garonne rivers was known as Vasconia, a blur ethnic area and polity struggling to fend off the pressure of the Iberian Visigothic kingdom and Muslim rule on the south and the Frankish push on the north. A Basque presence is cited on the southern banks of the Loire river too (78th centuries). By the turn of the millennium, after Muslim invasions and Frankish expansion under Charlemagne, the territory of Vasconia (to become Gascony) fragmented into different feudal regions, for example, the viscountcies of Soule and Labourd out of former tribal systems and minor realms (of Vasconia), while south of the Pyrenees the of Castile, of Pamplona and the Pyrenean counties of Aragon, Sobrarbe, Ribagorza (later merged into the of Aragon), and Pallars arose as the main regional powers with Basque population in the ninth century.The Kingdom of Pamplona (a central Basque realm), later known as Navarre, experienced feudalization and was subjected to the influences of its vaster Aragonese, Castilian and French neighbours, with Castile annexing key western territories of it in the 11th and the twelfth century, so depriving the kingdom of a direct way out to the ocean. Eventually the bulk of the realm would fall to the thrust of Spanish troops from 1512 to 1521 after a civil war. The Navarrese territory north of the Pyrenees remaining out of Spanish rule would end up being formally absorbed to France in 1620.Nevertheless the Basque provinces enjoyed a great deal of self-government until the French Revolution in the North and the civil wars named Wars in the South when the Basques supported heir apparent Carlos and his descendants to the cry of God, Fatherland, King (Charters abolished). Since then, despite the current limited self-governing status of the Basque Autonomous Community and Navarre as settled by the Spanish Constitution, a significant part of Basque society is still attempting higher degrees of self-empowerment (see nationalism), sometimes by acts of violence.GeographyPolitical and administrative divisionsThe Basque region is divided into at least three administrative units, namely the Autonomous Community and Navarre in Spain, and the arrondissement of Bayonne and the cantons of Maulon-Licharre and Tardets-Sorholus in the dpartement of Atlantiques, France.The autonomous community (a concept established in the Constitution of 1978) known as Euskal Autonomia Erkidegoa or EAE in Basque and as Comunidad Autnoma Vasca or CAV in Spanish (in English: Basque Autonomous Community or BAC),() is made up of the three Spanish provinces of lava, Biscay and Gipuzkoa. The corresponding Basque names of these territories are Araba, Bizkaia and Gipuzkoa, and their Spanish names are lava, Vizcaya and Guipzcoa.The BAC only includes three of the seven provinces of the currently called historical territories. It is sometimes referred to simply as the Basque Country (or Euskadi) by writers and public agencies only considering those three western provinces, but also on occasions merely as a convenient abbreviation when this does not lead to confusion in the context. Others reject this usage as inaccurate and are careful to specify the BAC (or an equivalent expression such as the three provinces, up to 1978 referred to as Provincias Vascongadas in Spanish) when referring to this entity or region. Likewise, terms such as the Basque Government for the government of the BAC are commonly though not universally employed. In particular in common usage the French term Pays Basque (Basque Country), in the absence of further qualification, refers either to the whole Basque Country (Euskal Herria in Basque), or not infrequently to the northern (or French) Basque Country specifically.Under Spains present constitution, Navarre (Nafarroa in present-day Basque, Navarra historically in Spanish) constitutes a separate entity, called in present-day Basque Nafarroako Foru Erkidegoa, in Spanish Comunidad Foral de Navarra (the autonomous community of Navarre). The government of this autonomous community is the Government of Navarre. Note that in historical contexts Navarre may refer to a wider area, and that the present-day northern Basque province of Navarre may also be referred to as (part of) Nafarroa, while the term High Navarre (Nafarroa Garaia in Basque, Alta Navarra in Spanish) is also encountered as a way of referring to the territory of the present-day autonomous community.There are three other historic provinces parts of the Basque Country: Labourd, Navarre and Soule (Lapurdi, Nafarroa Beherea and Zuberoa in Basque; Labourd, Basse-Navarre and Soule in French), devoid of official status within Frances present-day political and administrative territorial organization, and only minor political support to the Basque nationalists. A large number of regional and local nationalist and non-nationalist representatives has waged a campaign for years advocating for the creation of a separate Basque dpartement, while these demands have gone unheard by the French administration.Population, main cities and languagesThere are 2,123,000 people living in the Basque Autonomous Community (279,000 in Alava, 1,160,000 in Biscay and 684,000 in Gipuzkoa). The most important cities in this region, which serve as the provinces administrative centers, are Bilbao (in Biscay), Sebastin (in Gipuzkoa) and Vitoria-Gasteiz (in lava). The official languages are Basque and Spanish. Knowledge of Spanish is compulsory according to the Spanish Constitution (article no. 3), and knowledge and usage of Basque is a right according to the Statute of Autonomy (article no. 6), so only knowledge of Spanish is virtually universal. Knowledge of Basque, after declining for many years during Francos dictatorship owing to official persecution, is again on the rise due to favourable official language policies and popular support. Currently about 33 percent of the BACs population speaks Basque.Navarre has a population of 601,000; its administrative capital and main city, also regarded by many nationalist Basques as the Basques historical capital, is Pamplona (Iruea in modern Basque). Although Spanish and Basque are official languages in this autonomous community, Basque language rights are only recognised by current legislation and language policy in the provinces northern region, where most Basque-speaking Navarrese are concentrated.Approximately a quarter of a million people live in the part of claimed Basque Country. Basque-speakers refer to this as Iparralde ( Basque for North), and therefore to the Spanish provinces as Hegoalde (South). Much of this population lives in or near the Bayonne-Anglet-Biarritz (BAB) urban belt on the coast (in Basque these are Baiona, Angelu and Miarritze). The Basque language, which was traditionally spoken by most of the regions population outside the BAB urban zone, is today losing ground to French at a fast rate. Associated with the northern Basque Countrys lack of self-government within the French state is the absence of official status for the Basque language throughout this region.The Basque diasporaLarge numbers of Basques have left the Basque Country for other parts of the world in different historical periods, often for economic or political reasons. Basques are often employed in sheepherding and ranching, maritime fisheries and merchants around the world. Millions of Basque descendants (see American) live in North America (the United States and Mexico; Canada mainly in the provinces of Brunswick and Quebec), Latin America (in all 23 countries), Africa and Australia.de Unamuno said: There are at least two things that clearly can be attributed to Basques: the of Jesus and the of Chile.(La Compaa de Jess y la Repblica de Chile son las dos grandes hazaas del pueblo vascongado, sola decir don Miguel de Unamuno. Miguel de Unamuno used to say The Company of Jesus and the Republic of Chile are the two great achievements of the Basque people. http://www.filosofia.org/hem/194/alf/ez2302a.htm) Louis Thayer Ojeda estimates that during the 17th and 18th centuries fully 45% of all immigrants in Chile were Basques.(William A. Douglass, Jon Bilbao (2005). Amerikanuak: Basques in the New World. of Nevada Press. p.81. ISBN 0874176255) Over 3.5 million Basque descendants live in Chile and were a major influence in the countrys cultural and economic development.A large wave of Basques emigrated to Latin America and substantial numbers settled elsewhere in North (the U.S.) and Latin America, particularly in Argentina, Chile, Colombia, Cuba, Nicaragua, Panama, Uruguay and Venezuela, where Basque place names are to be found, such as New Biscay, now Durango (Mexico), Bay, Jalapa (Guatemala), Aguerreberry or Aguereberry Point in the United States, and the Santander region of Mexico.() Nueva Vizcaya was the first province in the north of the Viceroyalty of New Spain (Mexico) to be explored and settled by the Spanish. It consisted mostly of the area which is today the states of Chihuahua and Durango.In Mexico most Basques are concentrated in the cities of Monterrey, Saltillo, Reynosa, Camargo, and the states of Jalisco, Durango, Len, Tamaulipas, and Coahuila. The Basques were important in the mining industry, many were ranchers and vaqueros (cowboys), and the rest opened small shops in major cities like City, Guadalajara and Puebla. In Guatemala most Basques have been concentrated in Jalapa for six generations now, while some have immigrated to the city of Guatemala.The largest of several important Basque communities in the United States is in the area around Idaho, home to the Basque Museum and Cultural Center, host to a Basque festival every year, as well as a festival for the entire Basque diaspora every five years. Nevada, where the Center for Basque Studies and the Basque Studies Library are located in the University of Nevada, is another significant nucleus of Basque population. In Nevada there is an annual Basque festival that celebrates the dance, cuisine and cultures of the Basque peoples of Spanish, French and Mexican nationalities arrived to Nevada since the late 19th century.California has a major concentration of Basques in the United States, most notably in the Joaquin Valley between Stockton, Fresno and Bakersfield. The city of Bakersfield itself has a large Basque community and the city boasts several Basque restaurants.There also exists a history of Basque culture in California. In Chino, there are two annual Basque festivals that celebrate the dance, cuisine, and culture of the peoples, and the surrounding area of San Bernardino County has many Basque descendants. They are mostly descendants of settlers from Spain and Mexico. These Basques in California are grouped in the ethnic group known as Californios.In Texas along the Mexican-Texan border of the Grande Valley, many people are of Basque heritage or have Basque surnames. Along this area are many ranches given to colonial Spanish settlers from Basque Country to Spain which still exist today. They are mostly descendants of settlers from Spain and Mexico, with a number from other parts of Hispanic America. These Basques in south Texas are grouped in the ethnic group known as Tejanos.Basques of European Spanish-French and Latin American nationalities also settled throughout the western U.S. in states like Mexico, Arizona, Utah, Colorado, Wyoming, Montana, Oregon, and state.CultureLanguageThe identifying language of the Basques is called Basque or Euskara, spoken today by 25%-30%() of the regions population. An idea of the central place of the ethnic terms in Basque nationalist politicians is given by the fact that, in Basque, Basques identify themselves by the term euskaldun and their country as Euskal Herria, literally Basque speaker and Country of the Basque Language respectively. The language has been made a political issue by official Spanish and French policies restricting its use either historically or currently; however, this has not stopped the teaching, speaking, writing, and cultivating of this increasingly vibrant minority language. It is important to remember that the sense of Basque identity tied to the local language does not exist in isolation. It is juxtaposed with an equally strong sense of national identity tied with the use of the Spanish and languages among other Basques. As with many European states, a regional identity, be it linguistically derived or otherwise, is not mutually exclusive with the broader national one.As a result of state language promotion, school policies, the impact of mass media, and the effects of migration, today virtually all Basques (except for some children below school age) speak the official language of their state (Spanish or French). Therefore, there are extremely few Basque monoglots: essentially all Basque speakers are bilingual on both sides of the border. This reality, coupled with the fact that Spanish or French is also typically the first language of citizens from other regions (that often feel no need to learn Basque), maintains the dominance of the state tongues of both France and Spain. Recent Basque Government policies aim to change this pattern, as they are viewed as potential threats against mainstream usage of the minority tongue.(X. Aierdi Urraza, Routes to linguistic and cultural integration for immigrants in the Basque Autonomous Community)The Basque language is thought to be a genetic isolate. Thus Basque contrasts with other European languages, almost all of which belong to the broad language family. Another peculiarity of Basque is that it has been spoken continuously in situ, in and around its present territorial location, for longer than other modern European languages, which have all been introduced in historical or prehistorical times through population migrations or other processes of cultural transmission.(TRASK, Robert Lawrence: History of Basque. New York/London: Routledge, 1996. ISBN 0-415-13116-2)However, popular stereotypes characterizing Basque as the oldest language in Europe and unique among the worlds languages may be misunderstood and lead to erroneous assumptions.(J.C. Moreno Cabrera, Misconceptions about Basque) Over the centuries, Basque has remained in continuous contact with neighboring western European languages with which it has come to share numerous lexical properties and typological features; it is therefore misleading to exaggerate the outlandish character of Basque. Basque is also a modern language, and is established as a written and printed one used in present-day forms of publication and communication, as well as a language spoken and used in a very wide range of social and cultural contexts, styles, and registers.Land and inheritanceBasques have a close attachment to their home (etxe(a) house, home), especially when this consists of the traditional self-sufficient, family-run farm or baserri(a). Home in this context is synonymous with family roots. Old baserri names, themselves typically expressing short-range geographical orientations or other locally meaningful identifying features, have transmuted into modern surnames, thereby providing even Basques whose families may have left the land generations ago with an important link to their rural family origins: Bengoetxea the house of further down, Goikoetxea the house above, Landaburu top of the field, Errekondo next to the stream, Elizalde by the church, Mendizabal wide hill, Usetxe house of birds Ibarretxe house in the valley, Etxeberria the new house, and so on.(MITXELENA, Koldo, Apellidos vascos (fifth edition), San Sebastin: Txertoa, 1997.)A widespread belief that Basque society was originally matriarchal seems to conflict with the clearly patrilinear character of known family inheritance structures. There have been attempts to reconcile these points by assuming that the latter represents an innovation. In any case, the social position of women in both traditional and modern Basque society is somewhat better than in neighbouring cultures, and women have a substantial influence in decisions about the domestic economy. In the past, some women participated in collective magical ceremonies, and were key participants in a rich folklore, today largely forgotten.In contrast to surrounding regions, ancient Basque inheritance patterns, recognised in the fueros, favour survival of the unity of inherited land holdings which generally fall to a single male heir, usually the oldest son. This system forced the other siblings to find other sources of sustenance, and before the advent of industrialisation resulted in the emigration of many rural Basques to Spain, France or the Americas. This system, harsh by modern standards, was no doubt responsible for sending out into the world a great many enterprising personalities of Basque origin, from Spanish conquistadors such as de Aguirre, Francisco Vasquez de Coronado, to saints of the Catholic Church such as Xavier.Cuisinecuisine is at the heart of Basque culture, influenced by the neighboring communities and the excellent produce from the sea and the land. A twentieth-century feature of Basque culture is the phenomenon of gastronomical societies (called txoko in Basque), food clubs where men gather to cook and enjoy their own food. Until recently, women were only allowed one day in the year. Cider houses (Sagardotegiak) are popular restaurants in Gipuzkoa open for a few months while the cider is in season.Cultural productionDespite ETA and the crisis of heavy industries, the Basque economic condition has recovered remarkably in recent years, emerging from the Franco regime with a revitalized language and culture. The Basque language is expanding geographically led by large increases in the major urban centers of Pamplona, Bilbao, and Bayonne, where only a few decades ago the Basque language had all but disappeared.MusicReligionTraditionally Basques have been mostly Catholics. In the 19th century and well into the 20th, Basques as a group remained notably devout and churchgoing. In recent years church attendance has fallen off, as in most of Western Europe. The region has been a source of missionaries like Xavier and Garicots. Loyola, founder of the of Jesus, was a Basque. 17th C. California Franciscan Lasun was born in Vitoria. Lasun was the successor to Franciscan Padre Serra and founded 9 of the 21 extant Missions along the coast.A sprout of Protestantism in the continental Basque Country produced the first translation of the new Testament into Basque by Leizarraga. After the king of Navarre converted to Catholicism to be king of France, Protestantism almost disappeared.Bayonne held a Jewish community composed mainly of Jews fleeing from the Spanish and Inquisitions. There were also important Jewish and Muslim communities in Navarre before the Castilian invasion of 1512-21.Nowadays only slightly more than 50% of Basques profess some kind of belief in God, while the rest are either agnostic or atheist. The number of religious skeptics increases noticeably for the younger generations, while the older ones are more religious.()Pre-Christian religion and mythologyFile:Amboto.jpg|thumb|Anboto mountain is one of sites where Mari was believed to dwellChristianisation of the Basque Country has been the topic of some discussion. There are broadly speaking two views. According to one, Christianity arrived in the Basque Country during the 4th and 5th century but according to the other, it did not take place until the 12th and 13th century. The main issue lies in the different interpretations of what is considered Christianisation. Early traces of Christianity can be found in the major urban areas from the 4th century onwards, a bishopric from 589 in Pamplona and three hermit cave concentrations (two in lava, one in Navarre) were in use from the 6th century onwards. In this sense, Christianity arrived early.Pre-Christian belief seems to have focused on a goddess called Mari. A number of place-names contain her name and would suggest these places were related to worship of her such as Mari who appears to have been related to the weather. According to one tradition, she traveled every seven years between a cave on Mount Anboto and one on another mountain (the stories vary); the weather would be wet when she was in Anboto, dry when she was in Aloa, or Supelegor, or Gorbea. One of her names, Mari Urraca possibly ties here to a historical Navarrese princess of the 11th and 12th century, with other legends giving her a brother or cousin who was a Roman Catholic priest. So far the discussions about whether the name Mari is original and just happened to coincide closely with the Christian name Mara or if Mari is an early Basque attempt to give a Christian veneer to pagan worship have remained speculative.Maris consort is Sugaar. This chthonic couple seem to bear the superior ethical power and also the power of creation and destruction. Its said that when they gathered in the high caves of the sacred peaks, they engendered the storms. These meetings typically happened on Friday nights, the day of historical akelarre or coven. Mari was said to reside in Mount Anboto; periodically she crossed the skies as a bright light to reach her other home at mount Txindoki.Legends also speak of many and abundant genies, like jentilak (equivalent to giants), lamiak (equivalent to nymphs), mairuak (builders of the cromlechs or stone circles, literally Moors), iratxoak (imps), sorginak (witches, priestess of Mari), and so on. Basajaun is a Basque version of the Woodwose. There is a trickster named Martin Txiki (St Martin the Lesser).It has been shown that some of these stories have entered Basque culture in recent centuries or as part of Roman superstition. It is unclear whether neolithic stone structures called dolmens have a religious significance or were built to house animals or resting shepherds. Some of the dolmens and cromlechs are burial sites serving as well as border markers.The jentilak (Giants), on the other hand, are a legendary people which explains the disappearance of a people of Age culture that used to live in the high lands and with no knowledge of the iron. Many legends about them tell that they were bigger and taller, with a great force, but were displaced by the ferrons, or workers of ironworks foundries, until their total fade-out. They were pagans, but one of them, Olentzero, accepted Christianity and became a sort of Basque Claus. They gave name to several toponyms, as Jentilbaratza.SocietyHistorically, Basque society can be described as being somewhat at odds with Roman and later Western European societal norms.Strabos account of the north of Spain in his Geographica makes a mention of a sort of woman-rulenot at all a mark of civilization (Hadington 1992), a first mention of thefor the periodunusual position of women. Women could inherit and control property as well as officiate in churches. Combined with the issue of lingering pagan beliefs, this enraged the leaders of the Inquisition, perhaps leading to one of the largest witch hunt in the Basque town of Logroo in 1610.(Hadingham 1992. Note that Logroo is not a Basque town, but it was the see of the diocesis covering Zugarramurdi in 1610. The Inquisition rarely acted against witches, devoting most of its attention to Juidaizers, Moriscos and Protestants.)This preference for female dominance existed well into the twentieth century: ...matrilineal inheritance laws, and agricultural work performed by women continued in Basque country until the early twentieth century. For more than a century, scholars have widely discussed the high status of Basque women in law codes, as well as their positions as judges, inheritors, and arbitrators through ante-Roman, medieval, and modern times. The system of laws governing succession in the French Basque region reflected total equality between the sexes. Up until the eve of the French Revolution, the Basque woman was truly the mistress of the house, hereditary guardian, and head of the lineage.(Gimbutas, M. The Living Goddesses University of California Press: 2001)Although the of Navarre did adopt feudalism, most Basques also possessed unusual social institutions different from those of feudal Europe. Some aspects of this include the elizate tradition where local house-owners met in front of the church to elect a representative to send to the juntas and Generales (such as the Juntas Generales de Vizcaya or Guipzcoa) which administered much larger areas. Another example was the fact that in the medieval period most land was owned by the farmers, not the Church or a king.((Collins, R. The Basques Blackwell: 1986)Sports in the Basque CountryPilotaThe great family of ball games has its unique offspring among Basque ball games, known generically as pilota (Spanish: pelota). Some variants have been exported to the United States and Macau under the name of Alai.Rural sportsin the Bilbao estuary.File:20060122 barrenak gora.jpg|thumb|250px|Barrenatzaileak in Barakaldo.There are several sports derived by Basques from everyday chores. Heavy workers were challenged and bets placed upon them. Examples are:*estropadak rowing regattas: from fishermen activities.*sokatira: tug-of-war.*harri jasoketa: stone-lifting, from quarry works.*aizkolaritza and trontzalaritza: wood-chopping and log sawing.*sega jokoa: cutting grass with a scythe.*Giza-abere probak: stone block pulling, from construction works:**probak with teams of oxen.**asto probak with donkeys.**zaldi probak with horses.**gizon probak with human teams.*txinga eramatea: carrying of weights, one in each hand, representing milk canisters.*aharai topaketa: ram fights.*harri zulaketa competitions: drilling stone blocks with a metal bar, only in the former mining areas of West Biscay.*Basque sheepdog trials competitions.Bull runs and bullock gamesThe encierro (bull run) in Pamplonas fiestas Sanfermines started as a transport of bulls to the ring. These encierros, as well as other bull and bullock related activities are not exclusive to Pamplona but are traditional in many towns and villages of the Basque country.FootballThe largest symbol of Basque identity in football is Bilbao. While there are other clubs within the Spanish Basque country, such as Sociedad, Bilbaos cantera policy has meant the club refuses to sign any non-Basque players.() Osasuna, from the neighbouring autonomous community of Navarre, is the only club in Liga that has a Basque name (osasuna means health).Rugby Unionunion is a popular sport among French Basques, with major clubs Olympique and Bayonnais traditional powerhouses in the premier division of French Rugby (the 14). Biarritz regularly play Cup matches, especially knockout matches, at Anoeta in San Sebastian. Games between the Basque clubs and Catalan club Perpignan are always hard fought.Professional cyclingCycling is popular and the Euskaltel-Euskadi professional cycling team participates in the UCI World Tour division. Known for their orange tops and hill-climbing ability, their fans are famous for lining the most famous Pyrenean climbs in the Tour de France, in support of their compatriots.Each April the week-long of the Basque Country showcases the beautiful rolling Basque countryside.PoliticsWhile there is no independent Basque state, Spains autonomous community of the Basque Country, made up of the provinces of lava (Araba), Vizcaya (Bizkaia) and Guipzcoa (Gipuzkoa), is primarily a historical consequence and an answer to the wide autonomy claim of the residents.Navarre has a separate statute of autonomy, also based on the historical medieval charters. Until recently, Basque only survived in the Northern part of Navarre in the areas designated as Basque speaking or mixed in Navarrese law. Questions of political, linguistic and ethnic allegiance and identity are highly complex in Navarre. Politically some Basque nationalists would like to integrate with the Autonomous Basque Community but this currently is not the view of the majority of the people of Navarre.The Basque Country today does not exist as a formal political entity and is officially simply part of the French department of Atlantiques, centered in Barn. In recent years the number of mayors of the region supporting the creation of a separate Basque department has grown to 63,87%. So far, their attempts have been unsuccessful.Political conflictsLanguageBoth Spanish and French governments have, at times, tried to suppress Basque linguistic and cultural identity. The French Republics, the epitome of the nation-state, have a long history of attempting the complete cultural absorption of ethnic minority groups. Spain has, at most points in its history, granted some degree of linguistic, cultural, and even political autonomy to its Basques, but under the regime of Francisco Franco, the Spanish government reversed the advances of Basque nationalism, as it had fought in the opposite side of the Civil War: cultural activity in Basque was limited to folkloric issues and the Catholic Church.Today, the Basque Country within Spain enjoys an extensive cultural and political autonomy. The majority of schools under the jurisdiction of the education system use Basque as the primary medium of teaching. However, the situation is more delicate in the North, where lack of autonomy and monolingual public schooling in French exert great pressure on the Basque language.However, in Navarre, Basque has been declared an endangered language, since the conservative government of del Pueblo Navarro opposes Basque nationalism and symbols of Basqueness, highlighting Navarres own autonomy.(Resolution of the General Assembly of the European Bureau for Lesser Used Languages, 13 September 2003 (Helsinki), on the situation of the Basque language in the Autonomous Community of Navarre. Reported in MERCATOR Butlleti 55: Speakers of a regional or minority language should have the right to use their language in private and public life. Contrary to these principles, local authorities from Irua/Pamplona (capital city of the Autonomous Community of Navarre in Spain) have been implementing a series of reforms to the Autonomous Community legislation limiting the use of the Basque language. Basque is the only endangered language in the Autonomous Community of Navarre...)Basque is also spoken by immigrants in the major cities of Spain and France, in Australia, in many parts of America, and in the States, especially in Nevada, Idaho and California.(TRASK, Robert Lawrence (1997), The history of Basque, Routledge, p. 1.)Political status and violenceSince its articulation by Sabino Arana in the late 19th century, the more radical currents of nationalism have demanded the right of self-determination and even independence. Within the Basque country, that this element of Basque politics is often in balance with the conception of the Basque Country as just another part of the Spanish state, a view more commonly espoused on the right of the political spectrum. In contrast, the desire for greater autonomy and/or independence is particularly common among leftist Basque nationalists. The right of self-determination was asserted by the Parliament in 2002 and 2006.(EITB: Basque parliament adopts resolution on self-determination)Since self-determination is not recognized in the Constitution of 1978, a wide majority of Basques abstained (55%) and some even voted against it (23.5%) in the referendum of December 6 of that year. However, it was approved by clear majority at the Spanish level (87%). The derived autonomous regimes for the (Western) Basque Country was approved in a later referendum but the autonomy of Navarre (amejoramiento del fuero: improvement of the charter) was never subject to a referendum but only approved by the Navarrese Cortes (parliament).Political violenceClassificationAs with their language, the Basques are clearly a distinct ethnic group in their region. They notably regard themselves as culturally and especially linguistically distinct from their surrounding neighbours. Some Basques, especially in Spain, are strongly nationalist, identifying far more firmly as Basques than as citizens of any existing state. Others are not, feeling as much Basque as Spanish.(Euskobarmetro series, Evolucin de la identidad nacional subjetiva de los vascos, 1981-2006. As Basque as Spanish shows 33% of the citizens of the Basque Autonomous Community in late 2006.) Many Basques regard designation as an ethnic minority as incomplete, favouring instead the definition as a nation.In modern times, as a European people living in a highly industrialized area, cultural differences from the rest of Europe are inevitably blurred, although a conscious cultural identity as a people or nation remains very strong, as does an identification with their homeland, even among many Basques who have emigrated to other parts of Spain or France, or to other parts of the world.The strongest distinction between the Basques and their traditional neighbours is linguistic. Surrounded by Romance-language speakers, the Basques traditionally spoke (and many still speak) a language that was not only non-Romance but non-Indo-European. Although the evidence is open to question, the prevailing belief among Basques, and forming part of their national identity, is that their language has continuity with the people who were in this region not merely in pre-Roman times, but in pre-Celtic times, quite possibly before the great invasions of Europe by Asian tribes.GeneticsAlthough they are genetically distinctive in some ways, the Basques are still very typically West European in terms of their Y-DNA and mtDNA sequences, and in terms of some other genetic loci. These same sequences are widespread throughout the western half of Europe, especially along the western fringe of the continent.(Atlas of the Human Journey - The Genographic Project)(()Studies of the Y-chromosome found that on their direct male lineages modern Basques have a common ancestry with other Western Europeans.()() The similarity includes the predominance in their male populations of Y-chromosome Haplogroup R1b, now considered to have been spread through Europe from southwest Asia in the Neolithic period or later, between 4,000 to 8,000 years ago.()()(B. Arredi, E.S. Poloni and C. Tyler-Smith, The Peopling of Europe, in M. Crawford (ed.) Anthropological Genetics: Theory, Methods and Applications (Cambridge University Press 2007))However that study done by Balaresque and others.(2009) had many biases and more recent studies have proven that Subclades of R1b1b2 might have originated on Western Europe during the Holocene before the Neolithic Expansion. According to Myres and others.(2010): The coalescent estimate for the Y-STR network tree of 245 M269*+L23(xM412) chromosomes is 10 2701680 years Before Present (BP) Clearly predating the Neolithic Expansion from Anatolia.() Another study done by Cruciani and others. (2010) has also confirmed that there is a clear dichotomy between the Western-Eastern branches of R1b1b2, and many scientist now consider that R1b1b2 might have in fact originated in southeastern Europe in the Upper Paleolithic time, expanding from there to Western Europe and Anatolia. According to Cruciani and others. (2010):The overall frequency pattern of theR1b1b2 sub-haplogroups here analyzed is compatible with several scenarios, including mutation surfing on the wave of advance of an expanding population and/or local bottlenecks and re-expansion from refuge areas. Preliminary time expansion estimates for haplogroups R1b1b2g (8.3ky; 95%CIs 5.810.9ky) and R1b1b2h (7.4ky; 95%CIs 5.310.2ky), based on 7STRs analyzed on 24 and 27 males respectively, are compatible with both Neolithic and post-glacial expansion/s within Europe. The majority (58.7%) of R1b1b2 chromosomes from Europe were found to be ancestral for both U106 and U152 (paragroup R1b1b2*) and showed a frequency cline from western to eastern Europe. Further studies are needed to refine the R1b1b2 phylogeny and fully disclose the micro-evolutionary events underlying the present frequency distribution of R1b1b2 sub-haplogroups.()In regards to the presence of R1b1b2(R-M269) in Basque and other Western Europeans a more recent study states:A recent network analysis of the R-M269 Y chromosome lineage has purportedly corroborated Neolithic expansion from Anatolia, the site of diffusion of agriculture. However, the data are still controversial and the analyses so far performed are prone to a number of biases. In the present study we show that the addition of a single marker, DYSA7.2, dramatically changes the shape of the R-M269 network into a topology showing a clear Western-Eastern dichotomy not consistent with a radial diffusion of people from the Middle East. We have also assessed other Y-chromosome haplogroups proposed to be markers of the Neolithic diffusion of farmers and compared their intra-lineage variationdefined by short tandem repeats (STRs)in Anatolia and in Sardinia, the only Western population where these lineages are present at appreciable frequencies and where there is substantial archaeological and genetic evidence of pre-Neolithic human occupation. The data indicate that Sardinia does not contain a subset of the variability present in Anatolia and that the shared variability between these populations is best explained by an earlier, pre-Neolithic dispersal of haplogroups from a common ancestral gene pool. Overall, these results are consistent with the cultural diffusion and do not support the demic model of agriculture diffusion.()Autosomal genetic studies confirm that Basques have a very close relationship with other Europeans, especially with Spaniards, who have a common genetic identity of over 70% with Basques.()In fact, according to a Europe-wide study, the main components in the European genomes appear to derive from ancestors whose features were similar to those of modern Basques and Easterners, with average values greater than 35% for both these parental populations, regardless of whether molecular information is taken into account or not. The smallest degree of both Basque and Near Eastern admixture is found in Finland, whereas the highest values are, respectively, 80% Basque in Spain and roughly 70% Eastern in the Balkans.( from: )Before the development of modern genetics based on sequencing, Basques were noted as having the highest global apportion of the Rh blood type (35% phenotypically, 60% genetically). Additionally, the Basque population has virtually no B blood type, nor the related AB type. These differences are thought to reflect their long history of isolation, as well as times during which the Basque population contracted, allowing drift to dramatically influence genetic makeup. The history of isolation reflected in gene frequencies has presumably also been key to the retention of the distinctive Basque language. In fact, in accordance with other genetic studies, a recent genetic piece of research from 2007 claims: The Spanish and Basque groups are the furthest away from other continental groups (with more diversity within the same genetic groups) which is consistent with the suggestions that the Iberian peninsula holds the most ancient West European genetic ancestry.Since the Basques speak a non-Indo-European language and have the highest proportion of the negative blood type of all the peoples of the world, they were widely considered to be a genetically isolated population, preserving the genes of European Paleolithic hunter-gatherers, until recent genetic studies found that modern Basques have a common ancestry with other Western Europeans.(A study done in May, 2010 has shown homogeneity of Spanish and French Basques, and confirmed their genomic distinctiveness from other European populations.()NotablesAmong the most notable Basque people are Sebastin Elcano (led the first successful expedition to circumnavigate the globe after Magellan died mid-journey); III of Navarre; and of Loyola and Xavier, founders of the of Jesus.See also*Celtiberians*of Vasconia*people*history of Europe*Alai*Basquisation*Espine*and regionalisms of Spain*Bay, Newfoundland and Labrador*peopleFootnotesReferences* The Basques, the Catalans and Spain, Daniele Conversi, 2000, ISBN 1850652686.* The Basque History of the World, Kurlansky, 1999, ISBN 0802713491.* The Oldest Europeans, J.F. del Giorgio, A.J.Place, 2006, ISBN 9806898001.* Ethnologue report for France for population statistics in France.* Euskal Herria en la Prehistoria, Xabier Pealver Iribarren, 1996, ISBN 84-89077-58-4.* Gimbutas, Marija, The Living Goddesses (Berkeley: of California Press, 2001).**External links*Basque Autonomous Government.als:Baskenar:an:Vascosbe:bs:Baskibg:ca:Bascoscs:Baskovcy:Basgiaidde:Baskenet:Baskides:Vascoeo:Eskojeu:Euskaldunfa:fr:Basquesko:hy:hr:Baskiid:Basqueit:Baschihe:ka:lv:Baskilt:Baskaijbo:skaldunahu:Baszkokmrj:nl:Baskenja:no:Baskeremhr:pl:Baskowiept:Bascosro:Bascirm:Bascsru:fowksk:Baskoviaszl:Baskisr:sh:Baskifi:Baskitkab:Ibaskiyentr:Basklaruk:Basquezh:
4687
Balochistan,_Pakistan
footnotesBalochistan (Balochi, , Brahui: Balocistn) is the largest province (by area) of Pakistan, constituting approximately 44% of the total land mass of Pakistan with an area of 134,051 mi2 or (347,190 km2). According to the 1998 census, Balochistan had a population of roughly 6.6 million.()Forming most of the Balochistan region, the province is neighboured by Iran to the west; Afghanistan and Pakhtunkhwa to the north; and Punjab and Sindh to the east. To the south lies the Sea. The main languages in the province are Balochi, Brahui, Pashto, Sindhi and Urdu.() The provincial capital is Quetta and Gwadar is the developing port city .( Balochistan is rich in mineral resources; it is the second major supplier of natural gas in Pakistan.HistoryForming the eastern portion of the Plateau, the area of Balochistan is the site of the earliest known farming settlements in the pre-Valley Civilization era, the earliest of which was Mehrgarh dated at 6500 BC. Balochistan, like Pakhtunkhwa to its north, was  always an Iranic country. Known in history as the seed of Zoroastrianism, Balochistan, then famous for its lakes, was one of the first places Zoroaster travelled south to, from Bactria in order to seek converts to his religion. And it was here that some of the first proselytes of his religion lived before its spread into western portions of the plateau. Balochistan in Pashto is known as Godar which was hellenized by the Greeks in to Gedrosia due to the fact that the Greeks derived the names of these Iranian lands from the Bactrian language. The Balochi people referred to their own land as Moka or Maka, a word which later became Makran. The word Balochistan is derived from the language and was originally termed to mean ignorant. However, with the spread of the language, the name Balochistan seems to have stuck. Balochistan was seemingly always sparsely populated by various tribes of Iranic origin for centuries following the decline of the nearby Harappa-Mohenjo-daro civilization to the east. The spread of the Balochi language led to the eventual decline in the numbers of Brahui, the original Arachosian tribes of the region.File:Picbaloochi.jpg|thumb|230px|A Baloch shepherd, from a 1900 photoThe Baloch are an people closely related to the Persians, the Medes, the Pashtuns and the Kurds, all of whom populate portions of the plateau.(M. Longworth Dames, Balochi Folklore, Folklore, Vol. 13, No. 3 (Sep. 29, 1902), pp. 252-274) They are considered to be an Iranic group that has absorbed some Semitic genes and cultural traits. The northern point of Balochistan known in Pashto as Dzaranga was known as Drangiana to the Greeks and came to be known to the Persians as Saka. The Persian epic of Shahnama does record the Baloch in the Qazvin-Zanjan region of old Iran in the 6th century AD, when they were engaged in battle by the Persian king I Anoshervan, The Shahnama also records its heroes, Rustom and Sohrab, as being Saka (and not ethnic Persians) making Balochistan (instead of Pars) their origin. With time, Baloch tribes linguistically absorbed all the local people in Makran, southern Sistan and the Barahui country, becoming a sizeable group to rival in size the other Iranic group in the region, the Pashtuns.The large district and tribe of Belijan/Beluchan still exist in northwest Zagros, stretching from just east of Sivas, south toward  Aleppo. The current inhabitants and the tribe identify themselves as Kurdsthe cultural and linguistic cousins of the modern Baloch.In the 7th century, the region was divided into two parts: the south was made part of the Province of the Empire and the north became part of the Persian province Sistan. In early 644, the Islamic Caliph, Umar, sent Suhail ibn Adi from Busra to conquer the Kerman region of Iran. He was then made governor of that region. From Kerman, he conquered the western Balochistan region, near the Persian frontiers.(Ibn Aseer, Vol. 3, p. 17) South-western Balochistan was conquered during the campaign in Sistan the same year.During the reign of Uthman in 652, Balochistan was reconquered during the counter-revolt in Kerman, under the command of Majasha Ibn Masood. This was first time western Balochistan became directly controlled by the Caliphate and paid taxes on agriculture.(al-Buldan, p. 384 incomplete citation, needs edition statement to identify the page) In those days western Balochistan was included in the dominion of Kerman. In 654, Abdulrehman ibn Samrah, governor of Sistan, sent an Islamic army to crush a revolt in Zaranj, which is now in southern Afghanistan. After conquering Zaranj, a column of the army pushed north, conquering Kabul and Ghazni, in the Kush mountain range, while another column moved through North-western Balochistan and conquered the area up to the ancient city of Dawar and Qandabil (Bolan).(Tabqat ibn Saad, Vol. 8, p. 471) By 654, the whole of what is now the Balochistan province of Pakistan was controlled by the Caliphate, except for the well-defended mountain town of QaiQan which is now Kalat,  place in Pakistan. However, this town was later conquered during the reign of Caliph Ali.(al-Buldan, p. 386 incomplete citation, needs edition statement to identify the page) Abdulrehman ibn Samrah made Zaranj his provincial capital and remained governor of these conquered areas from 654 to 656, until Uthman was murdered.During the Caliphate of Ali, a region of Balochistan, Makran, again revolted. Due to war in the Islamic empire, Ali was unable to deal with these areas until 660, when he sent a large force, under the command of Haris ibn Marah Abdi, towards Makran and Sind. Haris ibn Marah Abdi arrived in Makran and conquered it by force, and then moved northward to north-eastern Balochistan and reconquered Qandabil (Bolan). Finally, he moved south and conquered Kalat after a fierce battle.(Rashidun Caliphate and Hind, by Qazi Azher Mubarek Puri, published by Takhliqat , Lahore Pakistan) In 663, during the reign of Umayyad Caliph I, Muslims lost control of North-eastern Balochistan and Kalat when Haris ibn Marah and large part of his army died in battle against a revolt in Kalat.(Tarikh al Khulfa, Vol. 1, pp. 214-215, 229) Muslim forces later regained control of the area during Umayyad reign. It also remained a part of the Abbasid Caliphate.In the 15th century, Chakar Khan Rind became the first king of Balochistan. Subsequently, Balochistan was dominated by the Timurids, who controlled all of Persia and Afghanistan. The Empire also controlled some parts of the area. When Nadir Shah won the allegiance of the rulers of Balochistan, he ceded Kalhora, one of the Sindh territories of Sibi-Kachi to the Khan of Kalat.(Dawn.com)(Iranica.com)(Panhwar.org) The successor of Nadir Shah and founder of the Afghan Empire, Shah Durrani, also won the allegiance of that areas rulers. Most of the area would eventually revert to local Baloch control, however, parts of the northern regions would continue to be dominated by Pashtun tribes.During the period of the Raj, there were four States in Balochistan: Makran, Kharan, Las Bela and Kalat. In 1876, Sir Sandeman made a treaty with the Khan of Kalat and brought his territories (including Kharan, Makran, and Bela) under British suzerainty. After the Afghan War was ended by the of Gandamak in May 1879, the Afghan Emir ceded the districts of Quetta, Pishin, Harnai, and Chotiali to the British. In 1883, the British took control of the Pass, southeast of Quetta, from the of Kalat. In 1887, some of the areas of Balochistan were declared British territory. In 1893, Sir Durand negotiated an agreement with the Amir of Afghanistan, Rahman Khan, to fix the Line running from Chitral to Balochistan as the boundary between the of Afghanistan and the British.Two devastating earthquakes occurred in Balochistan during the British colonial rule: The Balochistan Earthquake, which devastated Quetta, and the Balochistan Earthquake with its epicentre in the Makran region.After independence from the British, Balochistan has not experienced much development. Due to historical poverty as result of its geographic location and royalties formula which benefits only a few tribal leaders, it has developed at a much slower rate than other parts of Pakistan.Since Pakistans independence, Baloch nationalist groups and the Provincial government have been in conflict, the conflict.Geography and climateBalochistan is located at the south-eastern edge of the plateau. It strategically bridges the East and Asia to Asia and Asia, and forms the closest oceanic frontage for the land-locked countries of Central Asia.File:Astola Island.jpg|thumb|left|IslandIn terms of geographical size and area, it is the largest of Pakistans four provinces at 347,190 km (134,051 mi), which composes approximately 44% of the total land area of Pakistan. The density is very low due to the mountainous terrain and scarcity of water. The southern region is known as Makran. The central region is known as Kalat.The Mountains dominate the northeast corner and the Pass is a natural route into Afghanistan towards Kandahar, used as a passageway during the British campaigns to Afghanistan.(Bolan Pass - Encyclopdia Britannica Eleventh Edition) Much of the province south of the Quetta region is sparse desert terrain with pockets of towns mostly near rivers and streams.File:Hanna Lake, Quetta.JPG|thumb|left|Lake on 29 January 2004The capital, Quetta, is located in the most densely populated district in the northeast of the province. It is situated in a river valley near the border with Afghanistan, with a road to Kandahar in the northwest.Very cold winters and hot summers characterise the climate of the upper highlands. Winters of the lower highlands vary from extremely cold in Ziarat, Quetta, Kalat, Muslim Baagh and Khanozai the northern districts to mild conditions closer to the Makran coast. Summers are hot and dry, especially the arid zones of Chaghai and Kharan districts. The plain areas are also very hot in summer with temperatures rising as high as .The highest record breaking temperature of  has been recorded in Sibi, it was on 26 May 2010.(Pakmet.com.pk) Previously,  was recorded in Sibi. Other hot areas includes, Turbat, and Dalbandin. Winters are mild on the plains with the temperature never falling below the freezing point. The desert climate is characterised by hot and very arid conditions. Occasionally strong windstorms make these areas very inhospitable.DemographicsAs of the 1998 census, Balochistan had a population of 8 million inhabitants, representing approximately 5% of the Pakistani population.( Official estimates of Balochistans population grew from approximately 7.45 million in 2003( to 7.8 million in 2005.(Pakistan Balochistan Economic Report: From Periphery to Core (In Two Volumes) - Volume II: Full Report. The World Bank. May 2008. The Balochistan population totalled 4.5 million in 1981/82 and 7.8 million in 2004/05... NIPS estimates that Balochistans population growth will slow down to 1.3 percent by 2025...)According to the 2008 Pakistan Statistical Year Book, households whose primary language is Balochi represent 40% of Balochistans population while 20% of households speak Brahvi,and up to 25% speaks Pashtu making Balochi, Brahui and Pashtu the three dominant languages in the region. Other languages include, Sindhi, Punjabi, and Saraiki.() Balochi-speaking people are concentrated in the sparsely populated west, east, south and southeast; Brahui speakers dominate in the centre of the province, while the Pashtuns are the majority in the north. The Kalat and Mastung areas speak Brahui. Quetta, the capital of the province, is largely populated with Pashtun people (actually more than 2 million afghan refugees settled  in Quetta and the surrounding area) as prior to recent surge of migration  various other Afghan refugee called as Afghani Khorasani tribes also migrated in 1960s decade like Nasar, Khilji, Kharoti, Andar, Sulemankhel Tokhai, Sulemankhel, Mullakhel, Barech, Hazara, Tajik etc to Balochistan especially Quetta and other Pashtoon dominated areas.(See Pawanda Regulations 1952) In the District, the majority of the population speaks Balochi, or Lasi. Baloch tribes of Sibi Naseerabad widely speak Sindhi due to a Hindu communitys hold over the trade and local market. A large number of approximately over 4 million Afghan refugees moved to Quetta and other cities of Balochistan after the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979. Near the Kalat region and other parts of the province there are significant numbers of Baloch Brahui speakers. Along the coast there are various Makrani Balochi speakers who predominates. A large number of refugees can also be found in the province, including Pashtuns, Hazaras and Tajiks. Many Sindhi farmers have moved to the more arable lands in the east.Society and cultureBalochistani culture is primarily tribal, deeply patriarchal and conservative. Baloch society is dominated by tribal chieftains called Mirs, Sardars and Nawabs, who are the ruling elite of Balochistan and have been criticized for blocking the educational development and empowerment of the common baloch people.GovernmentIn common with the other provinces of Pakistan, Balochistan has a parliamentary form of government. The ceremonial head of the province is the Governor, who is appointed by the of Pakistan on the advice of the provincial Chief Minister. The chief executive of the province is the Chief Minister who is normally the leader of the largest party or alliance in the provincial assembly. The unicameral Assembly of Balochistan comprises 65 seats of which 4% are reserved for non-Muslims and 16% for women only. The judicial branch of government is carried out by the High Court, based in Quetta, and headed by a Chief Justice. For administrative purposes, the province is subdivided into 30 districts:()EconomyFile:Makran1.jpg|thumb|Coastal HighwayBalochistans share of the national economy has historically ranged between 3.7% to 4.9%.() Since 1972, Balochistans economy has grown in size by 2.7 times.(Siterresources.worldbank.org) The economy of the province is largely based upon the production of natural gas, coal and minerals. Outside Quetta, the infrastructure of the province is gradually developing but still lags far behind other parts of Pakistan. Tourism remains limited but has increased due to the exotic appeal of the province. Limited farming in the east as well as fishing along the Sea coastline are other forms of income and sustenance for the local populations. Due to the tribal lifestyle of many Baloch and Brahui, animal husbandry is important, as are trading bazaars found throughout the province.Beach.jpg|thumb|left|Fishing boats in Gwadar East Bay with the Koh-e-Mehdi Hills in the backgroundThough the province remains largely underdeveloped, there are currently several major development projects in progress in Balochistan, including the construction of a new deep sea port at the strategically important town of Gwadar.() The port is projected to be the hub of an energy and trade corridor to and from China and the Central Asian republics.Further west is the Dam() multipurpose project, on the River,  west of Turbat in the Division. It will provide dependable irrigation supplies for the development of agriculture and add more than 35,000 km of arable land. There is also Chinese involvement in the nearby Saindak gold and copper mining project.One of the worlds largest copper deposits (and its matrix-associated residual gold) have been found at Diq in the District of Balochistan. Reko Diq is a giant mining project in Chaghi. The main license (EL5) is held jointly by the Government of Balochistan (25%), Antofagasta Minerals (37.5%) and Barrick Gold (37.5%). The deposits at Reko Diq are hoped to be even bigger than those of Sarcheshmeh in Iran and Escondida in Chile (presently, the second and the third largest proven deposits of copper in the world).BHP Billiton, the worlds largest copper mining company, began the project in cooperation with the Australian firm Tethyan, entering into a joint venture with the Balochistan government. The potential annual copper production has been estimated to be 900,000 to 2.2 million tons. The deposits seem to be largely of porphyry rock nature.GalleryFile:Buzi Pass.jpg|Princes of Hope along the N10Image:Astola1.jpg|An enchanting rock formation at AstolaFile:Quetta Railway Station - 40311.jpg|Railway StationFile:Near Hanna Lake.jpg|Panoramic view near Hanna Lake, QuettaFile:Chiltan quettq .jpg|Koh-i-Chiltan in winterSee also*Balochistan*in Balochistan, Pakistan*(Afghanistan)*honour killings*leopard*people*people*of Balochistan, Pakistan*Jamot*of cities in Balochistan*people*and Baluchestan Province (Iran)ReferencesFurther reading*External links***()az:Blucistan()bg:Oriental(Pkistn)(Pakistan)(Pakistan)provintses:Baluchistn(Pakistan) (Pakistan)Bhalcastin()(Pakistan)(Pakistan)(Pakistanas)(Pakisztn)(Pakistan)(provincie)ja:(Pakistan)nn:Balutsjistanpa:pnb:(prowincja w Pakistanie)(Paquisto)()(Pakistan)(prowincyjo we Pakistae)(Pakistan)fi:Balochistansv:Baluchistan()()Eyaleti, Pakistan()ur:(Pakistan)Pakistanzh:
4859
Bodmin_Moor
Bodmin Moor ((http://homepage.univie.ac.at/albert.bock/files/placenames.pdf)) is a granite moorland in northeastern Cornwall, England, United Kingdom. It is  in size, and originally dates from the Carboniferous period of geological history. Bodmin Moor is one of five granite plutons in Cornwall that make up part of the batholith(http://petrology.oxfordjournals.org/cgi/content/abstract/27/3/571 Charoy, B. (1986) Genesis of the Cornubian Batholith (South West England): the example of the Carnmenellis Pluton in: Journal of Petrology; 1986 Oxford: OUP) (see also of Cornwall).The name Bodmin Moor is relatively recent, being an Survey invention of 1813. It was formerly known as Fowey Moor after the Fowey which rises within it.(; p. 72)GeographyDramatic granite tors rise from the rolling moorland: the best known are Willy, the highest point in Cornwall at ,(GENUKI: Cornwall) and Tor at . To the south-east Kilmar Tor and Hill are the most prominent hills. Considerable areas of the moor are poorly drained and form marshes (in hot summers these can dry out). The rest of the moor is mostly rough pasture or overgrown with heather and other low vegetation.The Moor contains about 500 holdings with around 10,000 beef cows, 55,000 breeding ewes and 1,000 horses and ponies.(The Bodmin Moor Pages ~ The History) Most of the moor is a of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI) and has been officially designated an of Outstanding Natural Beauty (AONB), as part of Cornwall AONB.(http://www.cornwall-aonb.gov.uk/documents/12_bodmin_character.pdf) Rivers and inland watersBodmin Moor is the source of several of Cornwalls rivers: they are mentioned here anti-clockwise from the south. The Fowey rises at a height of  and flows through Lostwithiel and into the Fowey estuary.(Cornwall Rivers Project|Geography | Fowey and Lerryn)  The Tiddy rises near Pensilva and flows southeast to its confluence with the Lynher (the Lynher flows generally south-east until it joins the Hamoaze near Plymouth). The River Inny rises near Davidstow and flows southeast to its confluence with the River Tamar. The Camel rises on Hendraburnick Down and flows for approximately  before joining the sea at Padstow.(Cornwall Rivers Project | Geography | Camel and Allen) The River Camel and its tributary the Lank River are an important habitat for the otter and both have been proposed as Special Areas of Conservation (SAC)(The Rivers of Bodmin Moor - The Bodmin Moor Pages) The De Lank River rises near Roughtor and flows along an irregular course before joining the Camel south of Wenford. The River Warleggan rises near Temple and flows south to join the Fowey.On the southern slopes of the moor lies Pool. It is Cornwalls only natural inland lake and is glacial in origin. In the 20th century three reservoirs have been constructed on the moor; these are Lake, Lake and Crowdy reservoirs which supply water for a large part of the countys population. Various species of waterfowl are resident around these waters.(Bere, Rennie (1982) The Nature of Cornwall. Buckingham: Barracuda Books, pp. 63-67)File:FoweyLooeRiversMapCornwallUK.gif|Rivers south of Bodmin MoorFile:MapRiversSoutheastCornwallUK.gif|Rivers southeast of Bodmin moorFile:MapOfRiverCamelCornwallUK.jpg|Rivers northwest of Bodmin MoorParishesNeot Church.jpg|thumb|right|upright|Church in St NeotThe parishes on the moor are as follows: History and antiquities Prehistoric times Image:King arthurs hall.JPG|thumb|right|Arthurs Hall10,000 years ago, in the Mesolithic period, hunter-gatherers wandered the moor when it was wooded and had a temperate climate. There are several documented cases of flint scatters being discovered by archaeologists, indicating that these hunter gatherers practised knapping in the region.(Tilley, C. (1996) The Power of Rocks: landscape and topography on Bodmin Moor, in: World Archaeology; 28, p. 165) During the Neolithic era, from about 4,500 to 2,300 BC, people began clearing trees and farming the land. It was also in this era that the production of various megalithic monuments began, predominantly long cairns (three of which have currently been identified, at Louden, Catshole and Bearah) and circles (sixteen of which have been identified). It was also likely that the naturally forming tors were also viewed in a similar manner to the manmade ceremonial sites.(Tilley, C. (1996) The Power of Rocks: landscape and topography on Bodmin Moor, in: World Archaeology; 28, pp. 151-176)In the following Age, the creation of monuments increased dramatically, with the production of over 300 further cairns, and more stone circles and stone rows.( More than 200 Age settlements with enclosures and field patterns have been recorded.(channel4.com - Time Team - Bodmin Moor, Cornwall - text only) and many prehistoric stone barrows and circles lie scattered across the moor.  In a programme shown in 2007 4s Team investigated a 500 metre cairn and the site of a Bronze Age village on the slopes of Tor.()Arthurs Hall thought to be a late Neolithic or early Age ceremonial site can be found to the east of Breward on the moor.(Secret Cornwall; Bodmin Moor and its environs) Medieval and modern times Where practicable areas of the moor were used for pasture by herdsmen from the parishes surrounding the moor. Granite boulders were also taken from the moor and used for stone posts and to a certain extent for building (such material is known as moorstone).(Clifton-Taylor, A. Building materials in: Pevsner, N. (1970) Cornwall. 2nd ed. Penguin Books, p. 29-34) Granite quarrying only became reasonably productive when gunpowder became available.The moor gave its name (Foweymore) to one of the medieval districts called stannaries which administered tin mining: the boundaries of these were never defined precisely. Until the establishment of a turnpike road through the moor (the present A30) in the 1770s the size of the moorland area made travel within Cornwall very difficult.Its Cornish name, Goen Bren, is first recorded in the 12th century.(Weatherhill, Craig (2009) A Concise Dictionary of Cornish Place-names. Westport, co. Mayo: Evertype; p. 6)Monuments and ruinsRoughtor was the site of a medieval chapel of St Michael and is now designated as a memorial to the 43rd Wessex Division of the British Army. In 1844 on Bodmin Moor the body of 18 year old Charlotte Dymond was discovered. Local labourer Matthew Weeks was accused of the murder and at noon on 12 August 1844 he was led from Gaol and hanged. The murder site now has a monument erected from public money and the grave is at  Davidstow churchyard.(The Murder of Charlotte Dymond)Legends and traditionsPool is identified by some people with the lake in which, according to Arthurian legend, Sir Bedivere threw Excalibur to Lady of the Lake.(Cornish Archaeology; No 34, 1995) Another legend relating to the pool concerns Tregeagle.The of Bodmin has been reported many times but never identified with certainty.See also*of topics related to Cornwall*Willy effectReferencesImage:The Cheesewring.jpg|The Cheesewring, a granite tor on the southern edge of Bodmin Moor|thumb* Weatherhill, Craig (1995) Cornish Place Names & Language. Wilmslow: Sigma Leisure ISBN 1850584621External links* Cornwall AONBBodminMoorBodminMoordi BodminBrennMoorMoorMoor
4887
British_Army
identification_symbol_4_labelThe British Army is the land warfare branch of Her Majestys Armed Forces in the Kingdom. It came into being with the unification of the of England and Scotland into the of Great Britain in 1707. The new British Army incorporated Regiments that had already existed in England and Scotland and was administered by the Office from London. It has been managed by the Ministry of Defence since 1964.As of mid 2011 the British Army employs 110,210 regulars (which includes the 3,860 of Gurkhas) and 33,100 territorials for a combined component strength of 143,310 soldiers. In addition there are 121,800 regular reserves of the British Army.(Table 2 - Strength of UK Armed Forces1 - full time trained and untrained personnel)(Table 2.15 Strength of the Reserve Forces1, at 1 April each year) The full-time element of the British Army has also been referred to as the Regular Army since the creation of the reservist Force in 1908. The British Army is deployed in many of the worlds war zones as part of both Expeditionary Forces and in Nations Peacekeeping forces. The British Army is currently deployed in Kosovo, Cyprus, Germany, Afghanistan and many other places.All members of the Army swear (or affirm) allegiance to the monarch as commander-in-chief. However the Bill of Rights of 1689 requires Parliamentary consent for the Crown to maintain a standing army in peacetime. Parliament therefore annually approves the continued existence of the Army.In contrast to the Navy, Marines and Air Force, the British Army does not include Royal in its title. Many of the Armys constituent Regiments and Corps have been granted the Royal prefix and have members of the Royal Family occupying senior positions within some regiments.The professional head of the British Army is the Chief of the General Staff, currently General Sir Peter Wall KCB CBE ADC Gen. History File:Duke-of-Marlborough-signing-Despatch-Blenheim-Bavaria-1704.jpg|thumb|The Duke of Marlborough was one of the first generals in the British Army, fighting campaigns in the of the Spanish Succession.The British Army came into being with the merger of the Army and the Army, following the unification of the of England and the of Scotland, as the of Great Britain in 1707. The new British Army incorporated existing English and Scottish regiments, and was controlled from London.(The Union of the Parliaments 1707 and Teaching Scotland, accessed 2 September 2010)From the time of the end of the Years War in 1763, Great Britain and its successor the United Kingdom has been one of the leading military and economic powers of the world.()Early British EmpireThe Empire expanded in this time to include colonies, protectorates, and Dominions throughout the Americas, Africa, Asia and Australasia. Although the Navy is widely regarded as having been vital for the rise of the Empire, and British dominance of the world, the British Army played an important role in the colonisation of India and other regions.(Mallinson, p. 104) Typical tasks included garrisoning the colonies, capturing strategically important territories, and participating in actions to pacify colonial borders, provide support to allied governments, suppress Britains rivals, and protect against foreign powers and hostile natives.File:Benjamin West 005.jpg|thumb|left|The death of General Wolfe during the of the Plains of Abraham; the campaigns of the and Indian War resulted in British control of modern Canada.British troops also helped capture strategically important territories, allowing their empire to expand throughout the globe. The army also involved itself in numerous wars meant to pacify the borders, or to prop-up friendly governments, and thereby keep other, competitive, empires away from the British Empires borders. Among these actions were the Years War,(Mallinson, p. 106) the Revolutionary War,(Mallinson, p. 129) the Wars,(Mallinson, p. 165) the First and Opium Wars,(Mallinson, p. 102) the Rebellion,() the Zealand land wars,() the Rebellion of 1857,(Mallinson, p. 210) the First and Boer Wars,(Mallinson, p. 257) the raids,() the War of Independence,(Mallinson, p. 282) its serial interventions into Afghanistan (which were meant to maintain a friendly state between British India and the Empire),(Mallinson, p. 203) and the War (to keep the Russian Empire at a safe distance by coming to Turkeys aid).(Mallinson, p. 195)As had its predecessor, the Army, the British Army fought Spain, France, and the Netherlands for supremacy in America and the Indies. With native and provincial assistance, the Army conquered France in the Years War( and subsequently suppressed a Native American uprising in War.(Pontiacs War Baltimore County Public Schools) The British Army suffered defeat in the War of Independence, losing the Colonies but holding on to Canada.(Mallinson, p. 110)File:Sadler, Battle of Waterloo.jpg|thumb|230px|The Duke of Wellingtons triumph over Napoleon Bonaparte at the of WaterlooThe British Army was heavily involved in the Wars in which the army served in multiple campaigns across Europe (including continuous deployment in the War), the Caribbean, Africa and later in North America. The war between the British and the French Empire of Bonaparte stretched around the world and at its peak, in 1813, the regular army contained over 250,000 men. A British Army under the of Wellington defeated Napoleons last campaign at the of Waterloo in 1815.(Mallinson, p. 177)The English had been involved, both politically and militarily, in Ireland since being given the of Ireland by the pope in 1171. English republican dictator, Cromwells campaign was characterised by its uncompromising treatment of the Irish towns (most notably Drogheda) that had supported the Royalists during the English Civil War. The English Army (and subsequently the British Army) stayed in Ireland primarily to suppress numerous Irish revolts and campaigns for independence. It was faced with the prospect of battling Anglo-Irish and Ulster Scots peoples in Ireland, who alongside their other Irish groups had raised their own volunteer army and threatened to emulate the American colonists if their conditions were not met. The British Army found itself fighting Irish rebels, both Protestant and Catholic, primarily in Ulster and Leinster (Wolfe Tones Irishmen) in the 1798 rebellion.(The 1798 Irish Rebellion BBC)File:The defense of Rorkes Drift.jpg|left|thumb|The of Rorkes Drift in 1879 saw a small British force repel an overwhelming attack by Zulu forces; eleven Crosses were awarded for the defence.In addition to battling the armies of other European Empires (and of its former colonies, the States, in the War of 1812),() in the battle for global supremacy, the British Army fought the Chinese in the First and Opium Wars,( and the Rebellion,( Mori tribes in the first of the Zealand Wars,( Nawab Shiraj-ud-Daulas forces and East India Company mutineers in the Sepoy Rebellion of 1857,( the Boers in the First and Boer Wars,( Irish Fenians in Canada during the raids( and Irish separatists in the War.(Following William and Marys accession to the throne, England involved itself in the of the Grand Alliance primarily to prevent a French invasion restoring Marys father, James II.(Miller, p. 144) Following the 1707 union of England and Scotland, and the 1801 creation of the Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland, British foreign policy, on the continent, was to contain expansion by its competitor powers such as France and Spain. The territorial ambitions of the French led to the of the Spanish Succession(Mallinson, p. 50) and the Wars.( Russian activity led to the War.( After 1745 recruits were increasingly drawn from Scotland; by the mid-1760s between one fifth and one third of officers were from Scotland.(The Oxford Illustrated History of the British Army (1994) p. 103)The vastly increasing demands of imperial expansion, and the inadequacies and inefficiencies of the underfunded, post-Napoleonic Wars British Army, and of the Militia, Yeomanry, and Volunteer Force, led to the Cardwell and Reforms of the late 19th century, which gave the British Army its modern shape, and redefined its system.() The Reforms of 1907, formally created the Force as the Armys volunteer reserve component.(Cassidy, p. 79)World WarsFile:El Alamein 1942 - British infantry.jpg|thumb|left|The Battle of El Alamein reversed German ambitions in North Africa, and is often cited as one of the turning points of the World War.File:British Mark I male tank Somme 25 September 1916.jpg|right|thumb|British I tank during the World War. Note the guidance wheels behind the main body which were later scrapped as they were unnecessary. Armoured vehicles of this time still required much infantry and artillery support and still do to a lesser extent today. Photo by Ernest Brooks.Great Britains dominance of the world had been challenged by numerous other powers, notably Germany. The UK was allied with France (by the Cordiale) and Russia, and when the World War broke out in 1914, the British Army sent the British Expeditionary Force to France and Belgium to prevent Germany from occupying these countries.(Ensor, pp. 525526) The War would be the most devastating in British military history, with near 800,000 men killed and over 2 million wounded. In the early part of the war, the professional force of the BEF was virtually destroyed and, by turns, a volunteer (and then conscripted) force replaced it. Major battles included the of the Somme.(Mallinson, p. 310) Advances in technology saw advent of the tank,() with the creation of the Tank Regiment, and advances in aircraft design, with the creation of the Flying Corps, which were to be decisive in future battles.() warfare dominated strategy on the Western Front, and the use of chemical and poison gases added to the devastation.()The World War broke out in 1939 with the German invasion of Poland.(Mallinson, p. 335) British assurances to the Polish led the British Empire to declare war on Germany. Again an Expeditionary Force was sent to France,( only to be hastily evacuated as the German forces swept through the Low Countries and across France in 1940.(Mallinson, p. 342) Only the Dunkirk evacuation saved the entire Expeditionary Force from capture.( Later, however, the British would have spectacular success defeating the Italians and Germans at the Battle of El Alamein in Africa,(Taylor (1976), p. 157) and in the D-Day invasion of Normandy with the help of American, Canadian, Australian and New Zealand forces.() Almost half of the Allied soldiers on D-day were British.() In the Far East, the British army battled the Japanese in Burma.(Taylor (1976), p. 210) The Second World War saw the British army develop its Air Service, Commando units and the Parachute Regiment.(Mallinson, p. 371)Postcolonial eraFile:Argentine POWs guarded by 2 Para.jpg|thumb|right|Soldiers from the Parachute Regiment guard Argentine of war during the War.After the end of the Second World War, the British Army was significantly reduced in size, although Service continued until 1960.(Mallinson, p. 384) This period also saw the process of Decolonisation commence with the end of the Raj, and the independence of other colonies in Africa and Asia. Accordingly the armys strength was further reduced, in recognition of Britains reduced role in world affairs, outlined in the Defence White Paper.(Merged regiments and new brigading  many famous units to lose separate identity, The Times, 25 July 1957) This was despite major actions in Korea in 1950( and Suez in 1956.(Mallinson, p. 407) A large force of British troops also remained in Germany, facing the threat of Soviet invasion.(Mallinson, p. 440) The Army of the Rhine was the Germany garrison formation, with the main fighting force being I (BR) Corps. The War saw significant technological advances in warfare and the Army saw more technologically advanced weapons systems come into service.(Mallinson, p. 442)Despite the decline of the Empire, the Army was still deployed around the world, fighting colonial wars in Aden,(Mallinson, p. 401) Cyprus,( Kenya( and Malaya.(Mallinson, p. 402) In 1982 the British Army, alongside the Marines, helped to recapture the Islands during the Falklands conflict against Argentina.()In the three decades following 1969, the Army was heavily deployed in Ireland, to support the Ulster Constabulary (later the Service of Northern Ireland) in their conflict with republican paramilitary groups, called Banner.(Mallinson, p. 411) The locally-recruited Defence Regiment was formed, later becoming the Royal Irish Regiment in 1992. Over 700 soldiers were killed during the Troubles. Following the IRA ceasefires between 1994 and 1996 and since 1997, demilitarisation has taken place as part of the peace process, reducing the military presence from 30,000 to 5,000 troops.(Army ending its operation in NI BBC News, 31 July 2007) On 25 June 2007, the Second Battalion Princess of Waless Royal Regiment vacated the Army complex at Bessbrook Mill in Armagh. This is part of the normalisation programme in Northern Ireland in response to the IRAs declared end to its activities.(Troops pull out of Bessbrook Operation Banner News, 25 June 2007) Recent and current conflicts  Gulf War The ending of the War saw a significant cut in manpower, as outlined in the for Change review.(Defence (Options for Change) Hansard, 25 July 1990) Despite this, the Army has been deployed in an increasingly global role, and contributed 50,000 troops to the coalition force that fought Iraq in the War.(50,000 troops in Gulf illness scare The Guardian, 11 June 2004) British forces were put in control of Kuwait after it was liberated.47 British Military personnel died during the Gulf War.() Balkans conflicts The British Army was deployed to Yugoslavia in 1992; initially this force formed part of the Nations Protection Force.(Mallinson, p. 446) In 1995 command was transferred to IFOR and then to SFOR.(Mallinson, p. 447) Currently troops are under the command of EUFOR. Over 10,000 troops were sent. In 1999 British forces under the command of SFOR were sent to Kosovo during the conflict there. Command was subsequently transferred to KFOR.(Mallinson, p. 448) Between early 1993 and June 2010, 72 British military personnel died on operations in the former Yugoslavian countries of Bosnia, Kosovo and Macedonia.(Operations in the Balkans: British Fatalities Defence factsheet) Afghanistan soldiers in Afghanistan.In 2001 the United Kingdom, as a part of Enduring Freedom with the United States, invaded Afghanistan to topple the Taliban.(Mallinson, p. 452) The 3rd Division were deployed in Kabul, to assist in the liberation of the troubled capital. The Royal Marines Commando Brigade (part of the Navy but including a number of Army units), also swept the mountains.(Operations in Afghanistan: Chronology of Events, September 2001  December 2002 Defence factsheet) The British Army is today concentrating on fighting Taliban forces and bringing security to Helmand province. Approximately 9,000 British troops (including marines, airmen and sailors) are currently in Afghanistan, making it the second largest force after the US. Around 500 extra British troops were deployed in 2009, bringing the British Army deployment total up to 9,500 (excluding Special Forces).(UK sends 500 more to Afghanistan BBC News, 15 October 2009) Between 2001 and June 2011 a total of 362 British military personnel have died on operations mainly in Afghanistan.(Operations in Afghanistan: British Fatalities Defence factsheet) Iraq War Rover Defender 110 patrol vehicles.jpg|thumb|right|British soldiers in IraqIn 2003, the United Kingdom was a major contributor to the United States-led invasion of Iraq. There was major disagreement amongst the domestic populace but the House of Commons voted for the conflict, sending a force that would reach 46,000 army personnel to the region.(Operations in Iraq: Facts and figures Defence factsheet) The British Army controlled the southern regions of Iraq and maintained a peace-keeping presence in the city of Basra until their withdrawal on April 30, 2009. 179 British Military personnel have died on operations in Iraq.(Operations in Iraq: British Fatalities Defence factsheet) All of the remaining British troops were fully withdrawn from Iraq after the Iraqi government refused to extend their mandate.() Northern Ireland Although having permanent garrisons there, the British Army was initially deployed in a peacekeeping role  codenamed Operation Banner  in Ireland in the wake of Unionist attacks on Nationalist communities in Derry(Bloomfield, K Stormont in Crisis (Belfast 1994) p 114) and Belfast(PRONI: Cabinet conclusions file CAB/4/1460) and to prevent further Loyalist attacks on Catholic communities, under Banner between 1969 and 2007 in support of the Ulster Constabulary (RUC) and its successor, the Service of Northern Ireland (PSNI).() There has been a steady reduction in the number of troops deployed in Northern Ireland since the Friday Agreement was signed in 1998.(Army dismantles NI post BBC News, 31 July 2000) In 2005, after the Irish Republican Army announced an end to its armed conflict in Northern Ireland, the British Army dismantled posts and withdrew many troops, and restored troop levels to that of a peace-time garrison.(Army To Dismantle Tower Block Post Skyscrapernews, 2 August 2005)Operation Banner ended at midnight on 31 July 2007, bringing to an end some 38 years of continuous deployment, making it the longest in the British Armys history.() An internal British Army document released in 2007 stated that the British Army had failed to defeat the IRA but had made it impossible for them to win through the use of violence. Operation Helvetic replaced Operation Banner in 2007 maintaining fewer servicemen in a much more benign environment.(() From 1971 to 1997 a total of 763 British Military personnel were killed during the troubles.(Remembrance Day: Where they fell BBC News, 13 November 2010) The British Armed Forces killed over 300 people.() A total of 303 RUC officers were killed in the same time period. In March 2009, two soldiers and a Police Officer were killed in separate dissident republican attacks in Northern Ireland.(Policeman shot dead in N Ireland BBC News, 10 March 2009) Current deployments  High intensity operations  Low intensity operations  Permanent overseas postings  Formation and structure The structure of the British Army is complex, due to the different origins of its various constituent parts. It is broadly split into the Regular Army (full-time Officers/soldiers and units) and the Territorial Army (Spare-time Officers/soldiers and units).In terms of its military structure, it has two parallel organisations, one administrative and one operational.Administrative* Regiments and Corps. These are listed below (in the template to the right), ranging from the Cavalry to the Physical Training Corps and the Logistic Corps. Uniquely and somewhat confusingly, the Infantry, which is not a corps but a collection of separate regiments, is administered by Divisions of infantry  Division, Division, Division and so on.(Heyman, p.105)Operational* The major operational command is Land Forces (following the amalgamation of Land Command and Headquarters Adjutant General).(HQ Land Forces on the move Drumbeat, June 2008) It is split into divisions and subordinate units ranging from regiments to squadrons.* Divisions both operational (1 Div. based in Herford in Germany and 3 Div. based in Bulford)(Heyman, p. 92) and regional divisions (effectively districts) administrating all military units, both Regular and TA, within a geographical area (2 Div. based in Edinburgh, 4 Div. based in Aldershot and 5 Div. based in Shrewsbury).(Heyman, p. 93)** Brigades, both fighting and in a non fighting regional capacity within HQ LF (for example,, 43 (Wessex) Brigade based in Bulford). Structure of unitsThe standard operational units are structured as follows, although various units have their own structure, conventions, names and sizes:()Corps are made up of two or more divisions, but now are rarely deployed as a purely national formation due to the size of the British Army.(In place of a Battalion, a task-specific Battlegroup may be formed. A battlegroup is grown around the core of either an armoured regiment or infantry battalion, and has other units added or removed from it as necessary for its purpose. It results in a mixed formation of armour, infantry, artillery, engineers and support units, typically consisting of between 600 and 700 soldiers under the command of a Lieutenant Colonel.(A number of elements of the British Army use alternative terms for battalion, company and platoon. These include the Armoured Corps, of Royal Engineers, Logistic Corps, and the Corps of Signals who use regiment (battalion), squadron (company) and troop (platoon). The Artillery are unique in using the term regiment in place of both corps and battalion, they also replace company with battery and platoon with troop.( Divisions The British Army currently has 5 divisions with two (1st Armoured Division and 3rd Infantry Division) being at continual operational readiness for deployment.(Heyman, pp. 9293) Aviation components The British Army operates alongside the Air Force as part of a Joint Force, but the army also has its own Army Air Corps. Military helicopters of all three services are commanded by Helicopter Command, a joint 2 star headquarters operating under HQ Land Forces.(Joint Helicopter Command Strategic Defence Review) Special forces File:uk-sas.svg|150px|right|thumb|altSAS winged dagger/flaming sword cap badge with Who Dares Wins motto|The SAS Badge.The British Army contributes two of the three forces formations within the Kingdom Special Forces Command; the Air Service Regiment and the Reconnaissance Regiment.() The most famous formation is the Air Service Regiment. The SAS comprises one regular Regiment and two Territorial Army Regiments.()The regular Regiment, 22 SAS, has its headquarters and depot located in Hereford and consists of five squadrons: A, B, D, G and Reserve with a training wing.(Fremont-Barnes, p. 62) The two reserve SAS Regiments; 21 SAS and 23 SAS have a more limited role, to provide depth to the UKSF group through the provision of Individual and collective augmentation to the regular component of UKSF and standalone elements up to task group (Regimental) level focused on support and influence (S&I) operations to assist conflict stabilisation.()The Reconnaissance Regiment (SRR) which was formed in 2005, from existing assets, undertakes close reconnaissance and special surveillance tasks.( Formed around 1st Battalion the Parachute Regiment, with attached Marines and Regiment assets, the Forces Support Group are under the Operational Control of Director Special Forces to provide operational manoeuvre support to the elements of United Kingdom Special Forces.() Overseas Territories military units Numerous military units were raised historically in British territories, including self-governing and Crown colonies, and protectorates. Few of these have appeared on the Army List, and their relationship to the British Army has been ambiguous. Whereas Dominions, such as Canada and Australia, raised their own armies, the defence of Crown possessions (like the Channel Islands), and colonies (now called Overseas Territories) was, and is, the responsibility of the UK (due to their status as territories of Britain, not British protectorates).Current Overseas Territories Regiments* Regiment* Regiment* Islands Defence ForceImage:Bermuda Regiment Warrant Officers.jpg|Two Bermuda Regiment Warrant Officers.File:Bermuda Regiment PNCO Cadre Promotion Parade.jpg|Bermuda Regiment PNCO Cadre Promotion Parade in No. 3 (Summer) Dress.File:Queens birthday.JPG|Royal Gibraltar Regiment on parade on the occasion of the Queens birthday parade on June 2007. Royal Navy and RAF ground units The other armed services have their own infantry units which are not part of the British Army. The Marines are amphibious infantry forming part of the Naval Service, and the Air Force has the Regiment used for airfield defence, force protection duties and Forward Air Control.() Equipment File:Challenger II.jpg|100px|right|thumb|II battle tank.File:Warrior Infantry Fighting Vehicle.jpg|right|100px|thumb|IFV.File:Westland apache wah-64d longbow zj206 arp.jpg|right|thumb|100px|Apache helicopterrifle 1996.jpg|thumb|100px|L85A1 Rifle (now replaced by the L85A2).InfantryThe basic infantry weapon of the British Army is the L85A2 assault rifle, sometimes equipped with an L17A2 underbarrel grenade launcher and with several variants such as the L86A2, the Light Support Weapon (LSW) and the L22A2 carbine variant, issued to tank crews. Support fire is provided by the Minimi light machine gun and the L7 General Purpose Machine Gun (GPMG); indirect fire by 51 and 81 mm mortars. Sniper rifles used include the L118A1 7.62 mm, the L115A3 and the AW50F, all produced by International. Some units use the L82A1 .50 calibre Barrett sniper rifle. More recently the L128A1 (Benelli M4) combat shotgun has been adopted, and is intended for close quarters combat in Afghanistan.()()ArmourThe British Armys battle tank is 2.(Challenger 2 BA Systems) Other armoured vehicles include Supacat Jackal MWMIK and the Iveco Panther CLV.() The Infantry Fighting Vehicle is the primary personnel carrier, although many variants of the Vehicle Reconnaissance (tracked) are used, as well as the APC and series now being re-engined and uparmoured and returned to front line service as Bulldog.() The British Army commonly uses the Rover Wolf and Rover Defender.()ArtilleryThe Army uses three main artillery systems: the Multi Launch Rocket System (MLRS), AS-90 and L118. The MLRS was first used operationally in Granby and has a range of .(GMLRS British Army) The AS-90 is a 155 mm self-propelled gun.() The L118 Light Gun is a 105 mm towed gun used primarily in support of 16 Air Assault Brigade, 19 Light Brigade and 3 Commando Brigade (Marines).(105 mm Light Gun BAe Systems) The Rapier FSC Missile System is the Armys primary battlefield air defence system, widely deployed since the War() and the Starstreak HVM (High Velocity Missile) is a surface-to-air weapon, launched either by a single soldier or from a vehicle-mounted launcher.(Starstreak II sighted Janes)Army AviationThe Army Air Corps (AAC) provide direct aviation support for the Army, although the RAF also assist in this role. The primary attack helicopter is the WAH-64 Apache, a license-built, modified version of the Apache that will replace the Westland Lynx AH7 in the anti-tank role.() The 212 is used as a specialist utility and transport helicopter, with a crew of two and a transport capacity of 12 troops.() The Gazelle helicopter is a light helicopter, primarily used for battlefield reconnaissance and control of artillery and aircraft.(Gazelle British Army) The Eurocopter AS 365N Dauphin is used for Special Operations Aviation() and the Islander is a light aircraft used for airborne reconnaissance and command.() Recruitment The Army mainly recruits within the United Kingdom; it normally has a recruitment target of around 12,000 soldiers per year.(Army recruitment increases by 9% BBC News, 18 August 2006)Low unemployment in Britain has resulted in the Army having difficulty in meeting its target. In the early years of the 21st century there has been a marked increase in the number of recruits from other (mostly Commonwealth) countries. In 2006 overseas recruitment, mostly in Commonwealth countries, generated more than 6,000 soldiers from 54 nations; together with the 3,000 Gurkhas, 10% of the British Army is a foreign national.(Britains child army New Statesman, 5 February 2007)The Ministry of Defence now caps the number of recruits from Commonwealth countries, although this will not affect the Gurkhas. If the trend continues 10% of the army will be from Commonwealth countries before 2012. The cap is in place as some fear the armys British character is being diluted, and employing too many could make the army seen as employing mercenaries.()The minimum recruitment age is 16 years (after the end of GCSEs), although soldiers may not serve on operations below 18 years; the maximum recruitment age was raised in January 2007 from 26 to 33 years. The normal term of engagement is 22 years, and, once enlisted, soldiers are not normally permitted to leave until they have served at least 4 years.()There has been a strong and continuing tradition of recruiting from Ireland including what is now the of Ireland.()()()() Over 200,000 Irish soldiers fought in the First World War.()() More than 60,000 Irishmen from what was then the Free State() (now the Republic of Ireland) and 38,000 from Ireland served in the Second World War,(The Oxford companion to Irish history, Sean J. Connolly, p. 505) all volunteered. Oath of allegiance File:Queens.guard.buck.palace.arp.jpg|thumb|right|Troops of the Guards on guard at Palace. Various army regiments supply troops to guard the Royal residences.All soldiers must take an oath of allegiance upon joining the Army, a process known as attestation. Those who believe in God, and wish to swear by Him, use the following words:crown and dignity against all enemies and will observe and obey all orders of Her Majesty, her heirs and successors and of the generals and officers set over me.()Others replace the words swear by Almighty God with solemnly, sincerely and truly declare and affirm.() Training establishments File:Oldcollegesandhurst2.jpg|thumb|right|The Military Academy Sandhurst is the home of British Army officer training* Military Academy Sandhurst (RMAS) is the officer training establishment. All officers, regular and reserve, attend RMAS at some point in their training.* School of Artillery (RSA) trains the Artillery.* School of Military Engineering (RSME) trains the Corps of Engineers as well as personnel from across the Armed Forces and other Government Departments in a variety of general engineering and specialist skills.* Training Regiments:** ATR Bassingbourn** ATR Winchester** ATC Pirbright* Training Centres:** ITC Catterick** Infantry Battle School, Brecon** Support Weapons School, Warminster* Foundation College (Harrogate)* training centres* Defence Sixth Form College Flags and ensigns File:British Army Ensign01.svg|thumb|right|200px|Ensign for general use by the Logistic CorpsFile:British Army Ensign00.svg|thumb|left|200px|Ensign flown by the Logistic Corps from vessels commanded by commissioned officersFile:Royal Engineers Ensign.png|thumb|left|200px|Ensign of the Corps of EngineersFile:Royal Corps Transport Vessel, Arezzo.jpg|thumb|200px|right|An Army landing craft of the Logistic CorpsThe British Army does not have its own specific ensign for the whole Army, unlike the Royal Navy, which uses the Ensign, and the RAF, which uses the Air Force Ensign. Instead, the Army has different flags and ensigns, some for the entire army and many for the different regiments and corps. The official flag of the Army as a whole is the Flag, flown in a ratio of 3:5. A non-ceremonial flag also exists, which is used at recruiting events, military events and exhibitions. It also flies from the Ministry of Defence building in Whitehall.()Whilst at war, the Union Flag is always used, and this flag represents the Army on The Cenotaph at Whitehall, London (the UKs memorial to its war dead).()The British Army has throughout its history operated ships, ports and a myriad of boats. Boats, Craft and Ports are still operated by the Army and ensigns exists for vessels commanded by the Army. The Logistic Corps operates a large fleet of vessels from its base at Marchwood near Southampton.()The Engineers has had fleets since the introduction of diving in 1838 and was granted an ensign following the foundation of the Engineers Submarine Mining Service in 1871, where it operated mine laying ships, before transfer of the trade to the Navy. The Corps maintains a Ensign defaced by the crest of the of Ordnance from where the Corps developed, which it flys from its fleet and shore establishments that routinely operate boats.()Each Guards and line regiment (excluding Rifles and Gurkha Rifles (RGR)) also has its own flags, known as Coloursnormally a Regimental Colour and a Queens Colour. The design of different Regimental Colours. vary but typically the colour has the Regiments badge in the centre. The RGR carry the Truncheon in place of Colours.() Ranks, specialisms and insignia Every regiment and corps has its own distinctive insignia, such as badge, beret, recognition flash and belt.Throughout the army there are many official specialisms. They do not affect rank, but they do affect pay bands. Tommy Atkins and other nicknames A long established nickname for a British soldier has been Atkins or Tommy for short. The origins are obscure but most probably derive from a specimen army form circulated by the Adjutant-General Sir Harry Calvert to all units in 1815 where the blanks had been filled in with the particulars of a Private Thomas Atkins, No 6 Company, 23rd Regiment of Foot. German soldiers in both World Wars would usually refer to their British opponents as Tommys. Present-day British soldiers are often referred to as Toms or just Tom. The British Army magazine Soldier has a regular cartoon strip, Tom, featuring the everyday life of a British soldier. Outside of the services, soldiers are generally known as squaddies by the British popular press, and the general public.(Songs for squaddies: the war musical Lads in Their Hundreds The Guardian, 19 May 2010)Another nickname which applies only to soldiers in Scottish regiments is Jock, derived from the fact that in Scotland the common Christian name John is often changed to Jock in the vernacular.Welsh soldiers are occasionally referred to as Taffy or just Taff. This may only apply to those from the Taff-Ely Valley in South Wales, where a large portion of men, left unemployed from the decline of the coal industry in the area, enlisted during WW I and WW II. Alternatively, it is derived from the supposed Welsh pronunciation of Dafydd(The Concise Oxford Dictionary ISBN 978-0-19-861131-8)the vernacular form of Dave or Davey, the patron Saint of Wales being Saint David.(Collins English Dictionary ISBN 0-00-716334-7)Irish soldiers are referred to as Paddy or Mick.Junior officers in the army are sometimes known as Ruperts by the ranks. This nickname is believed either to be derived from the childrens comic book character Bear who epitomises traditional public school values or from the preponderance of that particular forename amongst young men from a public school background.(Beevor, Anthony, Inside the British Army, ISBN 0-00-71134658) See also * Ministry of Defence* Redcoat* Army (United Kingdom)* ArmyNET* Volunteer Army* military history* Navy* Air Force* Kingdom Special Forces* equipment of the British Army* Army Uniform* orientation and military service* Cadet Force (ACF)* Jankers (army punishments)* campaign medals References and notes  Sources*******Further Reading* External links * British Army Website* British Army Reserve Support* British Army Sports, Museums & Associations Website* UK Defence Statistics 2008* British Army/Navy/RAF Website* British Army Friends Reunited* Discussion of British Soldier Letters From Rev. War (Article)* Extensive information about the British Army, Royal Navy and the RAF* British Army Quick Facts* Find Army Friends  Army ReunionsbritnicarmdaArmyArmyBritnicode terre britanniquena BreataineBhreatannachArmyDarat BritainArmyja:ArmyArmyBritnicoBritanicAirmyArmykopenska vojskaarmeijaarmnzh:
4910
Beryl
The mineral beryl is a beryllium aluminium cyclosilicate with the formula Be3Al2(SiO3)6. The hexagonal crystals of beryl may be very small or range to several meters in size. Terminated crystals are relatively rare. Pure beryl is colorless, but it is frequently tinted by impurities; possible colors are green, blue, yellow, red, and white.EtymologyThe name beryl is derived (via Latin: beryllus, French: beryl, and English: beril) from Greek  beryllos which referred to a precious blue-green color-of-sea-water stone( and originated from Prakrit veruliya () and Pali veuriya (); veiru () or, viar (), to become pale; ultimately from Sanskrit  vaidurya-, which is of Dravidian origin, maybe from the name of Belur.(Beryl, Online Etymology Dictionary. Retrieved on 2011-04-19.) The term was later adopted for the mineral beryl more exclusively.( The Late Latin word berillus was abbreviated as brill- which produced the Italian word brillare meaning shine, the French word brille meaning shine and the English word brilliance.(the oracle :: bssm encyclopaedia. Soul-hunter.com. Retrieved on 2011-04-19.)DepositsBeryl of various colors is found most commonly in granitic pegmatites, but also occurs in mica schists in the Ural Mountains, and limestone in Colombia. Beryl is often associated with tin and tungsten ore bodies. Beryl is found in Europe in Norway, Austria, Germany, Sweden (especially morganite), and Ireland, as well as Brazil, Colombia, Madagascar, Mozambique, Russia, Africa, the States, and Zambia. U.S. beryl locations are in California, Colorado, Connecticut, Idaho, Maine, Hampshire, Carolina, Dakota and Utah.Englands pegmatites have produced some of the largest beryls found, including one massive crystal from the Quarry in Maine with dimensions 5.5 m by 1.2 m (18 ft by 4 ft) with a mass of around 18 metric tons; it is New Hampshires state mineral. As of 1999, the largest known crystal of any mineral in the world is a crystal of beryl from Madagascar, 18 meters long and 3.5 meters in diameter.(G. Cressey and I. F. Mercer, Crystals, London, Natural History Museum, 1999)VarietiesAquamarine and maxixeAquamarine (from , water of the sea) is a blue or turquoise variety of beryl. It occurs at most localities which yield ordinary beryl, some of the finest coming from Russia. The gem-gravel placer deposits of Lanka contain aquamarine. Clear yellow beryl, such as that occurring in Brazil, is sometimes called aquamarine chrysolite. When corundum presents the bluish tint of typical aquamarine, it is often termed Oriental aquamarine. The deep blue version of aquamarine is called maxixe. Its color fades to white when exposed to sunlight or is subjected to heat treatment, though the color returns with irradiation. The pale blue color of aquamarine is attributed to Fe2+. The Fe3+ ions produce golden-yellow color, and when both Fe2+ and Fe3+ are present, the color is a darker blue as in maxixe. Decoloration of maxixe by light or heat thus may be due to the charge transfer Fe3+ and Fe2+.()()()() Dark-blue maxixe color can be produced in green, pink or yellow beryl by irradiating it with high-energy particles (rays, neutrons or even X-rays).() In the States, aquamarines can be found at the summit of Mt. Antero in the Range in central Colorado. In Wyoming, aquamarine has been discovered in the Horn Mountains, near River Pass. In Brazil, there are mines in the states of Gerais, Santo, and Bahia, and minorly in Grande do Norte. The Mines of Colombia, Zambia, Madagascar, Malawi, Tanzania and Kenya also produce aquamarine.The largest aquamarine of gemstone quality ever mined was found in Marambaia, Minas Gerais, Brazil, in 1910. It weighed over 110 kg, and its dimensions were  long and  in diameter.()EmeraldEmerald refers to green beryl, colored by trace amounts of chromium and sometimes vanadium.(() The word emerald comes (via English: Emeraude, imported from French: smeraude and Latin: Esmaraldus) from Latin smaragdus from Greek smaragdos   (green gem), its original source being a Semitic word izmargad () or the Sanskrit word, marakata (), meaning green.() Most emeralds are highly included, so their brittleness (resistance to breakage) is classified as generally poor. Emeralds in antiquity were mined by the Egyptians and in Austria, as well as Swat in northern Pakistan.() A rare type of emerald known as a trapiche emerald is occasionally found in the mines of Colombia. A trapiche emerald exhibits a star pattern; it has raylike spokes of dark carbon impurities that give the emerald a six-pointed radial pattern. It is named for the trapiche, a grinding wheel used to process sugarcane in the region. Colombian emeralds are generally the most prized due to their transparency and fire. Some of the most rare emeralds come from three main emerald mining areas in Colombia: Muzo, Coscuez, and Chivor. Fine emeralds are also found in other countries, such as Zambia, Brazil, Zimbabwe, Madagascar, Pakistan, India, Afghanistan and Russia. In the US, emeralds can be found in North Carolina. In 1998, emeralds were discovered in the Yukon.Emerald is a rare and valuable gemstone and, as such, it has provided the incentive for developing synthetic emeralds. Both hydrothermal() and flux-growth synthetics have been produced. The first commercially successful emerald synthesis process was that of Carroll Chatham.(Gemology Project) The other large producer of flux emeralds was Pierre Gilson Sr., which has been on the market since 1964. Gilsons emeralds are usually grown on natural colorless beryl seeds which become coated on both sides. Growth occurs at the rate of 1 mm per month, a typical seven-month growth run producing emerald crystals of 7 mm of thickness.(Nassau, K., 1980, Gems Made By Man, Gemological Institute of America, ISBN 0873110161) The green color of emeralds is attributed to presence of Cr3+ ions.(((Golden beryl and heliodorGolden beryl can range in colors from pale yellow to a brilliant gold. Unlike emerald, golden beryl has very few flaws. The term golden beryl is sometimes synonymous with heliodor (from Greek hlios   sun + dron   gift) but golden beryl refers to pure yellow or golden yellow shades, while heliodor refers to the greenish-yellow shades. The golden yellow color is attributed to Fe3+ ions.(( Both golden beryl and heliodor are used as gems. Probably the largest cut golden beryl is the flawless 2054 carat stone on display in the Hall of Gems, D.C.()GosheniteColorless beryl is called goshenite. The name originates from Massachusetts where it was originally discovered. Since all these color varieties are caused by impurities and pure beryl is colorless, it might be tempting to assume that goshenite is the purest variety of beryl. However, there are several elements that can act as inhibitors to color in beryl and so this assumption may not always be true. The name goshenite has been said to be on its way to extinction and yet it is still commonly used in the gemstone markets. Goshenite is found to some extent in almost all beryl localities. In the past, goshenite was used for manufacturing eyeglasses and lenses owing to its transparency. Nowadays, it is most commonly used for gemstone purposes and also considered as a source of beryllium.()()The gem value of goshenite is relatively low. However, goshenite can be colored yellow, green, pink, blue and in intermediate colors by irradiating it with high-energy particles. The resulting color depends on the content of Ca, Sc, Ti, V, Fe, and Co impurities.(MorganiteMorganite, also known as pink beryl, rose beryl, pink emerald, and cesian (or caesian) beryl, is a rare light pink to rose-colored gem-quality variety of beryl. Orange/yellow varieties of morganite can also be found, and color banding is common. It can be routinely heat treated to remove patches of yellow and is occasionally treated by irradiation to improve its color. The pink color of morganite is attributed to Mn2+ ions.( Pink beryl of fine color and good sizes was first discovered on an island on the coast of Madagascar in 1910.() It was also known, with other gemstone minerals, such as tourmaline and kunzite, at California. In December 1910, the New York Academy of Sciences named the pink variety of beryl morganite after financier P. Morgan.( On October 7, 1989, one of the largest gem morganite specimens ever uncovered, eventually called The Rose of Maine, was found at the Bennett Quarry in Buckfield, Maine, USA.() The crystal, originally somewhat orange in hue, was  long and about  across, and weighed (along with its matrix) just over 50 lbs (23 kg).(The Rose of Maine, image, The Rose of Maine at the site of its discovery)Red berylRed beryl (also known as red emerald or scarlet emerald) is a red variety of beryl. It was first described in 1904 for an occurrence, its type locality, at Maynards Claim (Pismire Knolls), Thomas Range, Juab County, Utah.(MinDat  Red beryl)(Carl Ege, Utah Geological Survey) The old synonym bixbite is deprecated from the CIBJO, because of the risk of confusion with the mineral bixbyite (also named after the mineralogist Bixby). The dark red color is attributed to Mn3+ ions.(Red beryl is very rare and has only been reported from a handful of locations including: Wah Mountains, County, Utah; Paramount Canyon, County, New Mexico; Round Mountain, County, New Mexico;(Mindat Red Beryl Page) and Juab County, Utah. The greatest concentration of gem-grade red beryl comes from the Violet Claim in the Wah Wah Mountains of mid-western Utah, discovered in 1958 by Lamar Hodges, of Utah, while he was prospecting for uranium.() Prices for top quality natural red beryl can be as high as $10,000 per carat for faceted stones. Red beryl has been known to be confused with pezzottaite, also known as raspberry beryl or raspberyl, a gemstone that has been found in Madagascar and now Afghanistan  although cut gems of the two varieties can be distinguished from their difference in index.(Bixbite  The Gemstone List) While gem beryls are ordinarily found in pegmatites and certain metamorphic rocks, red beryl occurs in topaz-bearing rhyolites. It formed by crystallizing under low pressure and high temperature from a pneumatolitic phase along fractures or within near-surface cavities of the rhyolite. Associated minerals include bixbyite, quartz, orthoclase, topaz, spessartine, pseudobrookite and hematite.()See also* of mineralsNotesReferences* Hurlbut, Cornelius S.; Klein, Cornelis, 1985, Manual of Mineralogy, 20th ed., John Wiley and Sons, New York ISBN 0-471-80580-7* Sinkankas, John, 1994, Emerald & Other Beryls, Geoscience Press, ISBN 0-8019-7114-4External links( )be:()bs:Berilbg:(mineral)cs:Berylda:Berylde:Beryllel:es:Beriloeu:Berilofa:fr:Brylgl:Berilohr:Berilio:Beriloit:Berillohe:la:Berylluslv:Berilslt:Berilashu:Berillml:my:nl:Berilja:no:Beryllnds:Beryll(minera)pt:Beriloro:Berilru:sah:simple:Berylsk:Berylsl:Berilsr:sh:Berilfi:Beryllisv:Beryllta:th:tr:Beriluk:wo:Berilzh:
4911
Basel
File:Theater Kaiseraugst.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Raurica.File:Nuremberg chronicles - BASILEA.png|thumb|300px|1493 woodcut of the City of Basel, from the Chronicle.Basel  or Basle   (, )(In the national languages of Switzerland the city is also known as Ble  (French), Basilea  (Italian) and Basilea  (Romansh)) is Switzerlands third most populous city with about 166,000 inhabitants.(Basel Population, July 2010)  Located where the Swiss, French and German borders meet, Basel also has suburbs in France and Germany. With 830,000 inhabitants in the tri-national agglomeration as of 2004, Basel is Switzerlands second-largest urban area.()Located in northwest Switzerland on the river Rhine, Basel functions as a major industrial centre for the chemical and industry. The Basel region, culturally extending into German Baden-Wrttemberg and French Alsace, reflects the heritage of its three states in the modern Latin name: Regio TriRhena. It has the oldest university of the Swiss Confederation (1460). Basel is German-speaking. The local variant of the German dialects is called German.Basel is among the most important cultural centres of Switzerland. The city comprises a large number of theatres and many museums, including the Museum of Fine Arts, the worlds oldest art collection accessible to the public. In addition the Basel was chosen in 1999 as the best stage for German-language performances and in 2009 & 2010 as Opera of the Year by German Opera Magazine Opernwelt.(Basel: culture pure basel-virtuell.ch. Retrieved on 2010-03-24)HistoryEarly historyDuring the days of the Empire, the settlement of Raurica was founded 10 or 20 kilometres upstream of present Basel, and a castle was built on the hill overlooking the river where the Basel Mnster now stands. But even older Celtic settlements (including a fort) have been discovered recently in the area predating the Roman castle. The citys position on the Rhine long emphasised its importance: Basel for many centuries possessed the only bridge over the river between Constance and the sea.The town of Basel was called Basilea or Basilia in Latin (from Greek Basileia,  meaning kingship) and this name is documented from 374 AD.(The Encyclopedia Americana, Grolier Incorporated 1999, p.308,)Since the donation of the Abbey Moutier-Grandvalto and all its possessions to Bishop Adalbero II in 999 till the Reformation, Basel was ruled by prince-bishops (see Bishop of Basel,(The New Encyclopaedia Britannica, Encyclopaedia Britannica, 1993, p.659) whose memory is preserved in the crosier shown on the Basel coat-of-arms  see above).Prince-Bishopric of BaselIn 1019 the construction of the cathedral of Basel (known locally as the Mnster) began under German Emperor Heinrich II.(Franz Kugler, Schriften und Studien zur Kunstgeschichte, 1853, p. 486)In 12251226 the Bridge over the Rhine was constructed by Bishop Heinrich von Thun and lesser Basel (Kleinbasel) founded as a beachhead to protect the bridge.In 1356 the Basel earthquake destroyed much of the city along with a number of castles in the vicinity. The city offered courts to nobles as an alternative to rebuilding their castles, in exchange for the nobles military protection of the city.In 1412 (or earlier) the well-known guesthouse Zum Goldenen Sternen was established.Basel became the focal point of western Christendom during the 15th century Council of Basel (14311449), including the 1439 election of antipope Felix V.In 1459 Pope Pius II endowed the of Basel where such notables as Erasmus of Rotterdam and Paracelsus later taught. At the same time the new craft of printing was introduced to Basel by apprentices of Gutenberg.The Schwabe publishing house was founded in 1488 by Johannes Petri and is the oldest publishing house still in business. Froben also operated his printing house in Basel and was notable for publishing works by Erasmus.(Josef Nadler, Literaturgeschichte der deutschen Schweiz, Grethlein 1932) In 1495, Basel was incorporated in the Upper Rhenish Circle; the Bishop of Basel was added to the Bench of the Ecclesiastical Princes. In 1500 the construction of the Mnster was finished.As a member state in the Swiss ConfederacyIn 1501 Basel joined the Swiss Confederation as its eleventh canton,(Karl Strupp, Wrterbuch Des Vlkerrechts, De Gruyter 1960, p.225) separating de facto  from the Roman Empire, and began the construction of the city council building. The bishops seat remained in Basel until 1529, when the city became Protestant under Oecolampadius. The bishops crook was however retained as the citys coat of arms.  The first edition of Christianae religionis institutio (of the Christian Religion  Calvins great exposition of Calvinist doctrine) was published at Basel in March 1536.(Geoffrey Rudolph Elton, Harold Fullard, Henry Clifford Darby, Charles Loch Mowat, New Cambridge Modern History, 1990, p. 113)In 1543 humani corporis fabrica, the first book on human anatomy, was published and printed in Basel by Vesalius (15141564).(The Illustrations from the Works of Andreas Vesalius of Brussels, Courier Dover Publications 1973, p.30)There are indications Meyer, author of the influential 16th century arts text Kunst des Fechten (The Art of Fencing) came from Basel. In 1662 the Amerbaschsches Kabinett was established in Basel as the first public museum of art. Its collection became the core of the later Basel Museum of Art.Modern historyIn 1792 the Republic of Rauracia, a revolutionary client republic, was created. It lasted until 1793.(Heinrich Zschokke, Emil Zschokke, The History of Switzerland, for the Swiss People, S. Low, Son & Co. 1855, p.253) After three years of political agitation and a short civil war in 1833 the disadvantaged countryside seceded from the Canton of Basel, forming the half canton of Basel-Landschaft.(Heinrich Trler, Marcel Godet, Victor Attinger, Historisch-biographisches Lexikon der Schweiz, 1934, p.307)On July 3, 1874 Switzerlands first zoo (the Basel) opened its doors in the south of the city towards Binningen.Basel as international meeting placeBasel has often been the site of peace negotiations and other international meetings. The of Basel (1499) ended the War. Two years later Basel joined the Swiss Confederation. The of Basel in 1795 between the French Republic and Prussia and Spain ended the Coalition against France during the Revolutionary Wars. In more recent times, the Zionist Organization held its first congress in Basel on September 3, 1897. Because of the Wars, the International held an extraordinary congress at Basel in 1912. In 1989, the Convention was opened for signature with the aim of preventing the export of waste from wealthy to developing nations for disposal.GeographyBasel has an area, , of .  Of this area,  or 4.0% is used for agricultural purposes, while  or 3.7% is forested.   Of the rest of the land,  or 86.4% is settled (buildings or roads),  or 6.1% is either rivers or lakes.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office-Land Use Statistics 2009 data  accessed 25 March 2010)Of the built up area, industrial buildings made up 10.2% of the total area while housing and buildings made up 40.7% and transportation infrastructure made up 24.0%.  Power and water infrastructure as well as other special developed areas made up 2.7% of the area while parks, green belts and sports fields made up 8.9%.  Out of the forested land, all of the forested land area is covered with heavy forests.  Of the agricultural land, 2.5% is used for growing crops and 1.3% is pastures.  All the water in the municipality is flowing water.(Coat of armsThe blazon of the municipal of arms is In Silber ein schwarzer Baselstab.(Flags of the World.com accessed 18-April-2011)ClimateBasel has an average of 121.4 days of rain or snow per year and on average receives  of precipitation.  The wettest month is June during which time Basel receives an average of  of rain or snow.  During this month there is precipitation for an average of 10.9 days.  The month with the most days of precipitation is May, with an average of 12.6, but with only  of rain or snow.  The driest month of the year is February with an average of  of precipitation over 9.4 days.(, the Basel/Binningen weather station elevation is 316 meters above sea level.)dateAugust 2010TransportationBasels airport is set up for airfreight; heavy goods reach the city and the heart of Europe from the North Sea by ship along the Rhine. The main European routes for the highway and railway transportation of freight cross in Basel. The outstanding location benefits logistics corporations, which operate globally from Basel. Trading firms are traditionally well represented in the Basel Region.PortFile:Rhine Rhein Basel 2006 871.JPG|thumb|200px|The Rhine in BaselBasel has Switzerlands only cargo port, through which goods pass along the navigable stretches of the Rhine and connect to ocean-going ships at the port of Rotterdam.Air transportBasel-Mulhouse-Freiburg is operated jointly by two countries, France and Switzerland. Contrary to popular belief, the airport is located completely on French soil. The airport itself is split into two architecturally independent sectors, one half serving the French side and the other half serving the Swiss side; prior to Schengen there was a customs point at the middle of the airport so that people could emigrate to the other side of the airport.RailwayBahnhof Trainstation Switzerland.jpg|thumb|350px|Basel Bahnhof SBB, self proclaimed worlds first international train station.Basel has long held an important place as a rail hub. Three railway stations  those of the German, French and Swiss networks  lie within the city (although the Swiss (Basel SBB) and French (Ble SNCF) stations are actually in the same complex, separated by Customs and Immigration facilities). Badischer Bahnhof is on the opposite side of the city. Basels local rail services are supplied by the Regional S-Bahn. The largest goods railway complex of the country  is located just outside the city, spanning the municipalities of Muttenz and Pratteln. The new highspeed ICE railway line from Karlsruhe to Basel was completed in 2008 while phase I of the TGV-Est line, opened in June 2007, has reduced travel time from Basel to Paris to 3 hours. RoadsBasel is located on the A3 motorway.Within the city limits, five bridges connect greater and lesser Basel, from upstream to downstream:* Schwarzwaldbrcke (built 1972)* Wettsteinbrcke (current structure built 1998, original bridge built 1879)* Mittlere Brcke (current structure built 1905, original bridge built 1225 as the first bridge to cross the Rhine River)* Johanniterbrcke (built 1967)* Dreirosenbrcke (built 2004, original bridge built 1935)FerriesA somewhat anachronistic yet still widely used system of ferry boats links the two shores. There are four ferries, each situated approximately midway between two bridges. Each is attached by a cable to a block that rides along another cable spanning the river at a height of 20 or 30 metres. To cross the river, the ferryman orients the boat around 45 from the current so that the current pushes the boat across the river. This form of transportation is therefore completely hydraulically driven, requiring no outside energy source.http://www.faehri.chPublic transportBasel has an extensive public transportation network serving the city and connecting to surrounding suburbs, including a large tram network. The green-colored local trams and buses are operated by the BVB (Basler Verkehrs-Betriebe). The yellow-colored buses and trams are operated by the BLT Transport, and connect areas in the nearby half-canton of Baselland to central Basel. The trams are powered by lines, and the bus fleet consists of conventional fuel-powered vehicles. (Most buses are natural gas powered) The BVB also shares commuter bus lines in cooperation with transit authorities in the neighboring Alsace region in France and Baden region in Germany. The Regional S-Bahn, the commuter rail network connecting to suburbs surrounding the city, is jointly operated by SBB, SNCF and DB.Border crossingsBasel is located at the meeting point of France, Germany and Switzerland and has numerous road and rail crossings between Switzerland and the other two countries. With Switzerland joining the Area on December 12, 2008, immigration checks were no longer carried out at the crossings. However, Switzerland did not join the EU customs regime and customs checks are still conducted at or near the crossings.France-Switzerland (from east to west)*Road crossings (with French road name continuation)**Kohlenstrasse (Avenue de Ble, Huningue). This crossing replaces the former crossing Hningerstrasse further east.**Elssserstrasse (Avenue de Ble, Saint-Louis)**Autobahn A3 (autoroute, Saint-Louis)**Basel-Mulhouse-Freiburg  pedestrian walkway between the French and Swiss sections on Level 3 (departures) of airport.**Burgfelderstrasse (Rue du 1er Mars, Saint Louis)*Railway crossing**SBB railway stationGermany-Switzerland (clockwise, from north to south)*Road crossings (with German road name continuation)**Hiltalingerstrasse (Zollstrae, am Rhein). A tram line extension to Weil am Rhein is currently under construction along this road. Due to open December 2012.(www.tram8.info)**Autobahn A2 (Autobahn A5, am Rhein)**Freiburgerstrasse (Baslerstrae, am Rhein)**Weilstrasse, Riehen (Haupstrae, am Rhein)**Lrracherstrasse, Riehen (Baslerstrae, Stetten, Lrrach)**Inzlingerstrasse, Riehen (Riehenstrae, Inzlingen)**Grenzacherstrasse (Hrnle, Grenzach-Wyhlen)*Railway crossing**Between Basel SBB and Badischer Bahnhof  Basel Badischer Bahnhof, and all other railway property and stations on the right bank of the Rhine belong to DB and are classed as German customs territory. Immigration and customs checks are conducted at the platform exit tunnel for passengers leaving trains here.Additionally there are many footpaths and cycle tracks crossing the border between Basel and Germany.basel.jpg|center|thumb|750px|A panoramic view of Basel, looking North from the Mnster tower over Kleinbasel (smaller Basel). The blue tower in the centre is Switzerlands tallest building, the Messeturm; the bridge on the extreme right is the Wettsteinbrcke, Basels second oldest bridge but recently replaced by a new structure. The first bridge on the left is the Mittlere Brcke (Middle or Central Bridge), the oldest bridge in Basel.DemographicsBasel has a population (lcon) of .  , 32.3% of the population are resident foreign nationals.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Superweb database - Gemeinde Statistics 1981-2008  accessed 19 June 2010)  Over the last 10 years (19992009 ) the population has changed at a rate of -0.3%.  It has changed at a rate of 3.2% due to migration and at a rate of -3% due to births and deaths.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office accessed 18-April-2011)Most of the population () speaks German (129,592 or 77.8%), with Italian being second most common (9,049 or 5.4%) and French being third (4,280 or 2.6%).  There are 202 people who speak Romansh.(Of the population in the municipality 58,560 or about 35.2% were born in Basel and lived there in 2000.  There were 1,396 or 0.8% who were born in the same canton, while 44,874 or 26.9% were born somewhere else in Switzerland, and 53,774 or 32.3% were born outside of Switzerland.(In  there were 898 live births to Swiss citizens and 621 births to non-Swiss citizens, and in same time span there were 1,732 deaths of Swiss citizens and 175 non-Swiss citizen deaths.  Ignoring immigration and emigration, the population of Swiss citizens decreased by 834 while the foreign population increased by 446.  There were 207 Swiss men and 271 Swiss women who emigrated from Switzerland.  At the same time, there were 1756 non-Swiss men and 1655 non-Swiss women who immigrated from another country to Switzerland.  The total Swiss population change in 2008 (from all sources, including moves across municipal borders) was an increase of 278 and the non-Swiss population increased by 1138 people.  This represents a growth rate of 0.9%.(, there were 70,502 people who were single and never married in the municipality.  There were 70,517 married individuals, 12,435 widows or widowers and 13,104 individuals who are divorced.(STAT-TAB Datenwrfel fr Thema 40.3 - 2000   accessed 2 February 2011) the average number of residents per living room was 0.59 which is about equal to the cantonal average of 0.58 per room.(  In this case, a room is defined as space of a housing unit of at least  as normal bedrooms, dining rooms, living rooms, kitchens and habitable cellars and attics.()  About 10.5% of the total households were owner occupied, or in other words did not pay rent (though they may have a mortgage or a rent-to-own agreement).(Urban Audit Glossary pg 17), there were 86,371 private households in the municipality, and an average of 1.8 persons per household.(  There were 44,469 households that consist of only one person and 2,842 households with five or more people.  Out of a total of 88,646 households that answered this question, 50.2% were households made up of just one person and there were 451 adults who lived with their parents.  Of the rest of the households, there are 20,472 married couples without children, 14,554 married couples with children  There were 4,318 single parents with a child or children.  There were 2,107 households that were made up of unrelated people and 2,275 households that were made up of some sort of institution or another collective housing.( there were 5,747 single family homes (or 30.8% of the total) out of a total of 18,631 inhabited buildings.  There were 7,642 multi-family buildings (41.0%), along with 4,093 multi-purpose buildings that were mostly used for housing (22.0%) and 1,149 other use buildings (commercial or industrial) that also had some housing (6.2%).  Of the single family homes 1090 were built before 1919, while 65 were built between 1990 and 2000.  The greatest number of single family homes (3,474) were built between 1919 and 1945.(Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB - Datenwrfel fr Thema 09.2 - Gebude und Wohnungen  accessed 28 January 2011) there were 96,640 apartments in the municipality.  The most common apartment size was 3 rooms of which there were 35,958.  There were 11,957 single room apartments and 9,702 apartments with five or more rooms.  Of these apartments, a total of 84,675 apartments (87.6% of the total) were permanently occupied, while 7,916 apartments (8.2%) were seasonally occupied and 4,049 apartments (4.2%) were empty.(  , the construction rate of new housing units was 2.6 new units per 1000 residents.( the average price to rent an average apartment in Basel was 1118.60 francs (CHF) per month (US$890, 500, 720 approx. exchange rate from 2003).  The average rate for a one room apartment was 602.27 CHF (US$480, 270, 390), a two room apartment was about 846.52 CHF (US$680, 380, 540), a three room apartment was about 1054.14 CHF (US$840, 470, 670) and a six or more room apartment cost an average of 2185.24 CHF (US$1750, 980, 1400).  The average apartment price in Basel was 100.2% of the national average of 1116 CHF.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office-Rental prices 2003 data  accessed 26 May 2010)  The vacancy rate for the municipality, , was 0.74%.(Historic PopulationThe historical population is given in the following chart:(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Bevlkerungsentwicklung nach Region, 1850-2000  accessed 29 January 2011)Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)ImageSize   width:960 height:210PlotArea    height:150 left:100 bottom:50 right:100AlignBars   justifyDateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:220000TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:40000 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:8000 start:0PlotData  color:yellowgreen width:40   mark:(line,white) align:center  bar:1850 from:start till:27844 text:27,844  bar:1860 from:start till:38692 text:38,692  bar:1870 from:start till:44868 text:44,868  bar:1880 from:start till:61737 text:61,737  bar:1888 from:start till:71131 text:71,131  bar:1900 from:start till:109161 text:109,161  bar:1910 from:start till:132276 text:132,276  bar:1920 from:start till:135976 text:135,976  bar:1930 from:start till:148063 text:148,063  bar:1941 from:start till:162105 text:162,105  bar:1950 from:start till:183543 text:183,543  bar:1960 from:start till:206746 text:206,746  bar:1970 from:start till:212857 text:212,857  bar:1980 from:start till:182143 text:182,143  bar:1990 from:start till:178428 text:178,428  bar:2000 from:start till:166558 text:166,558EconomyFile:Messeturm Basel.jpg|thumb|200px|Messeturm, Basel had an unemployment rate of 4.2%.  , there were 18 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 9 businesses involved in this sector.  34,645 people were employed in the secondary sector and there were 1,176 businesses in this sector.  120,130 people were employed in the tertiary sector, with 8,908 businesses in this sector.(  There were 82,449 residents of the municipality who were employed in some capacity, of which females made up 46.2% of the workforce. the total number of equivalent jobs was 130,988.  The number of jobs in the primary sector was 13, of which 10 were in agriculture and 4 were in forestry or lumber production.  The number of jobs in the secondary sector was 33,171 of which 24,848 or (74.9%) were in manufacturing, 10 were in mining and 7,313 (22.0%) were in construction.  The number of jobs in the tertiary sector was 97,804.  In the tertiary sector; 12,880 or 13.2% were in the sale or repair of motor vehicles, 11,959 or 12.2% were in the movement and storage of goods, 6,120 or 6.3% were in a hotel or restaurant, 4,186 or 4.3% were in the information industry, 10,752 or 11.0% were the insurance or financial industry, 13,695 or 14.0% were technical professionals or scientists, 6,983 or 7.1% were in education and 16,060 or 16.4% were in health care.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Betriebszhlung: Arbeitssttten nach Gemeinde und NOGA 2008 (Abschnitte), Sektoren 1-3  accessed 28 January 2011), there were 121,842 workers who commuted into the municipality and 19,263 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net importer of workers, with about 6.3 workers entering the municipality for every one leaving.  About 23.9% of the workforce coming into Basel are coming from outside Switzerland, while 1.0% of the locals commute out of Switzerland for work.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Statweb  accessed 24 June 2010)  Of the working population, 49.2% used public transportation to get to work, and 18.7% used a private car.(An annual Federal Swiss fair (Mustermesse) takes place in Kleinbasel on the right bank of the Rhine. Other important trade shows include BaselWorld (watches and jewelry), Basel, Orbit and Cultura.The Swiss industry operates largely from Basel, and Basel also has a large pharmaceutical industry. Novartis,(Chen, Aric. Going to Basel. New York Times. 11 June 2006. Retrieved on 12 January 2010.) Syngenta, Specialty Chemicals,(Welcome to Ciba) Clariant, Hoffmann-La Roche,( Pharmaceutica and Actelion are headquartered there. Pharmaceuticals and specialty chemicals have become the modern focus of the citys industrial production.Banking is extremely important to Basel:* AG maintains central offices in Basel,(UBS AG in Basel, Aeschenvorstadt 1. (PDF version) AG. Retrieved on 2 July 2010.) giving finance a pivotal role in the local economy.* The for International Settlements is located within the city and is the central bankers bank. The bank is controlled by a of directors, which is composed of the elite central bankers of 11 different countries (US, UK, Belgium, Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, Switzerland, the Netherlands and Sweden).:According to the BIS, The choice of Switzerland for the seat of the BIS was a compromise by those countries that established the BIS: Belgium, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom and the United States. When consensus could not be reached on locating the Bank in London, Brussels or Amsterdam, the choice fell on Switzerland. An independent, neutral country, Switzerland offered the BIS less exposure to undue influence from any of the major powers. Within Switzerland, Basel was chosen largely because of its location, with excellent railway connections in all directions, especially important at a time when most international travel was by train.():Created in May 1930, the BIS is owned by its member banks, which are private entities. No agent of the Swiss public authorities may enter the premises without the express consent of the bank. The bank exercises supervision and police power over its premises. The bank enjoys immunity from criminal and administrative jurisdiction, as well as setting recommendations which become standard for the worlds banking system.* Basel is also the location of the Committee on Banking Supervision, which is distinct from the BIS. It usually meets at the BIS premises in Basel. Responsible for the Accords (I and Basel II), this organization fundamentally changed Risk Management within its industry.Basel has Switzerlands second tallest building (Messeturm / 105m) and Switzerlands tallest tower (St. Chrischona TV tower / 250m).International Air Lines, the national airline of Switzerland, is headquartered on the grounds of Basel-Mulhouse-Freiburg in Saint-Louis, Haut-Rhin, France, near Basel.(Facts and figures. Swiss International Air Lines. Retrieved on 13 June 2009.)(Plan interactif. Saint-Louis (Haut-Rhin). Retrieved on 25 September 2009.)(Swiss International Air Lines Basel. Swiss International Air Lines. Retrieved on 24 September 2009.) Prior to the formation of Swiss International Air Lines, the regional airline Crossair was headquartered near Basel.(Location. Crossair. Retrieved on 13 June 2009.)QuartersBasel is subdivided into 19 quarters (Quartiere). The municipalities of Riehen and Bettingen, outside the city limits of Basel, are included in the canton of Basel-City as rural quarters (Landquartiere).ReligionFrom the , 41,916 or 25.2% were Catholic, while 39,180 or 23.5% belonged to the Reformed Church.  Of the rest of the population, there were 4,567 members of an Orthodox church (or about 2.74% of the population), there were 459 individuals (or about 0.28% of the population) who belonged to the Christian Catholic Church, and there were 3,464 individuals (or about 2.08% of the population) who belonged to another Christian church.  There were 1,325 individuals (or about 0.80% of the population) who were Jewish, and 12,368 (or about 7.43% of the population) who were Islamic.  There were 746 individuals who were Buddhist, 947 individuals who were Hindu and 485 individuals who belonged to another church.  52,321 (or about 31.41% of the population) belonged to no church, are agnostic or atheist, and 8,780 individuals (or about 5.27% of the population) did not answer the question.(Main sightsThe red sandstone Mnster, one of the foremost late-Romanesque/early Gothic buildings in the Upper Rhine, was badly damaged in the great earthquake of 1356, rebuilt in the fourteenth and 15th century, extensively reconstructed in the mid-nineteenth century and further restored in the late twentieth century. A memorial to Erasmus lies inside the Mnster. The City Hall from the 16th century is located on the Market Square and is decorated with fine murals on the outer walls and on the walls of the inner court.Basel is also host to an array of buildings by internationally renowned architects. These include the Foundation by Piano, or the Vitra complex in nearby Weil am Rhein, composed of buildings by architects such as Hadid (fire station), Gehry (design museum), Alvaro Siza Vieira (factory building) and Ando (conference centre). Basel also features buildings by Botta (Jean Tinguely Museum and Bank of International settlements) and & de Meuron (whose architectural practice is in Basel, and who are best known as the architects of Modern in London). The city received the Prize in 1996.Heritage sitesBasel features a great number of heritage sites of national significance.()These include the entire Old Town of Basel as well as the following buildings and collections: ;Churches and monasteries: Old Catholic Prediger Church, Bischofshof with church at Rittergasse 1, Domhof at Mnsterplatz 1012, Former Carthusian House of St Margarethental, Catholic Church of St Antonius, Lohnhof (Former Augustinians Collegiate Church), Mission 21, Archive of the evangelischen Missionswerks Basel, Mnster (Cathedral), Reformed Elisabethenkirche, Reformed Johanneskirche, Reformed Leonhardskirche (former Augustinians Abbey), Reformed Martinskirche, Reformed Pauluskirche, Reformed Peterskirche, Reformed St. Albankirche with cloister and cemetrery, Reformed Theodorskirche, Synagoge at Eulerstrasse 2;Secular buildings: Badischer Bahnhof (Train Station) with Fountain, for International Settlements, Blaues Haus (Reichensteinerhof) at Rheinsprung 16, Bruderholzschul House at Fritz-Hauser-Strasse 20, Brunschwiler House at Hebelstrasse 15, Bandesbahnhof SBB (Train Station), Brgerspital, Caf Spitz (Merianflgel), Coop Schweiz Companys Central Archive, Depot of the Archologischen Bodenforschung des Kantons, Former Gallizian Paper Mill and Swiss Museum of Paper, Former Klingental-Kaserne with Klingental Church, Fasnachtsbrunnen (Fountain), Feuerschtzenhaus (Fire Station) at Schtzenmattstrasse 56, Fischmarktbrunnen (fountain), Geltenzunft at Marktplatz 13, Gymnasium (School) am Kohlenberg (St Leonhard), Hauptpost (Main Post Office), House zum Raben at Aeschenvorstadt 15, Hohenfirstenhof at Rittergasse 19, Holsteinerhof at Hebelstrasse 30, Mittlere Rhein Brcke (Mid-Rhine Bridge)  Music Hall at Steinenberg 14, Ramsteinerhof at Rittergasse 7 and 9, Rathaus (Town Hall), Rundhof Building of the Schweizerischen Mustermesse, Safranzunft at Gerbergasse 11, Sandgrube at Riehenstrasse 154, Schlsschen (Manor House) Gundeldingen, Schnes Haus and Schner Hof at Nadelberg 6, Wasgenring Schoolhouse, Seidenhof with painting of Rudolf von Habsburg, Spalenhof at Spalenberg 12, Spiesshof at Heuberg 7, City Walls, Townhouse (formerly Post Office) at Stadthausgasse 13 / Totengsslein 6, Weisses House at Martinsgasse 3, Wildtsches House at Petersplatz 13, House Zum Neuen Singer at Speiserstrasse 98, Wolfgottesacker at Mnchensteinerstrasse 99, Zerkindenhof at Nadelberg 10;Archaeological sites: the Celtic Settlement at Gasfabrik, Mnsterhgel and Old City (Late La Tne and medieval settlement);Museums, archives and collections: Anatomical Museum of the University Basel, Berri-Villen and Museum of Ancient Art and Ludwig Collection, Former Franciscan Barefoot Order Church and Historical Museum, Company Archive of Novartis, House zum Kirschgarten which is part of the Historical Museum, Historic Archive Roche and Industrial Complex Hoffmann-La Roche, Jewish Museum of Switzerland, & Cartoon Museum Basel, Karl Barth-Archive, Kleines Klingental (Lower Klingen Valley) with Museum Klingental, Art Museum with Copperplate Collection, History Museum of Basel and the of Cultures Basel, Museum of Culture and Natural History, Museum of Modern Art Basel with the E. Hoffmann collection, St. Alban-Rheinweg 60, Museum Jean Tinguely Basel, Music Museum, Pharmacy Historical Museum of the Universitt Basel, Poster Collection of the Schule fr Gestaltung (School for Design), Swiss Business Archives, Sculpture Hall,Sports Museum of Switzerland, Archives of the Canton of Basel-Stadt, UBS AG Corporate Archives, University Library with manuscripts and music collection, Zoologischer GartenFile:Museum der Kulturen 2008-03-30.jpg|Natural History MuseumFile:Basler Munster.jpg|Basel MnsterFile:Mittlere Brcke.jpg|Mittlere Rhein Brcke (Mid-Rhine Bridge)File:Basler Kunstmuseum.jpg| Kunstmuseum BaselFile:Haus zum Kirschgarten 2008-03-30.jpg|House zum KirschgartenFile:Basel Barfsserkirche Inneres 11-05-2008.jpg| Former Franciscan Barefoot Order ChurchFile:Basle Bahnhof Trainstation Switzerland.jpg|Basel SBB railway stationFile:Antikenmuseum Basel 2008-03-30.jpg|Berri-Villen and Antikenmuseum BaselFile:BankIntZahlungsausgleich.jpg|Bank for International SettlementsEducationFile:Unibas JF-frontside.jpg|thumb|left|150px|The law and economy faculty of the of BaselFile:Johann von Venningen Bischof Basel.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Inauguration ceremony of the of Basel, 1460Basel hosts Switzerlands oldest university, the of Basel, dating from 1459. Erasmus, Paracelsus, Bernoulli, Euler, Burckhardt, and Nietzsche worked here. More recently, its work in medicine has gained prominence.In 2007, the ETH Zurich (Swiss Federal Institute of Technology Zurich) established the Department of Biosystems Science and Engineering (D-BSSE) in Basel. The creation of the D-BSSE was driven by a Swiss-wide research initiative SystemsX, and was jointly supported by funding from the ETH Zurich, the Swiss Government, the Swiss University Conference (SUC) and private industry.()Basel is renowned for various scientific societies, as the Entomological Society of Basel (Entomologische Gesellschaft Basel, EGB), which celebrated its 100th anniversary in 2005. Basel counts several International Schools, including the International School of Basel, the fr Gestaltung Basel, the Minerva School and the Rhine Academy.In Basel about 57,864 or (34.7%) of the population have completed non-mandatory upper secondary education, and 27,603 or (16.6%) have completed additional higher education (either University or a Fachhochschule).  Of the 27,603 who completed tertiary schooling, 44.4% were Swiss men, 31.1% were Swiss women, 13.9% were non-Swiss men and 10.6% were non-Swiss women.(, there were 5,820 students in Basel who came from another municipality, while 1,116 residents attended schools outside the municipality.(Basel is home to at least 65 libraries.  Some of the largest include; the Universittsbibliothek Basel (main university library), the special libraries of the Universitt Basel, the Allgemein Bibliotheken der GGG Basel, the Library of the Pdagogische Hochschule, the Library of the Hochschule fr Soziale Arbeit and the Library of the Hochschule fr Wirtschaft.  There was a combined total () of 8,443,643 books or other media in the libraries, and in the same year a total  of 1,722,802 items were loaned out.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, list of libraries  accessed 14 May 2010)PoliticsGeo-politically, the city of Basel functions as the capital of the Swiss half-canton of Basel-Stadt, though several of its suburbs form part of the half-canton of Basel-Landschaft or of the canton of Aargau (or of France or Germany).In the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the SP which received 37.1% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the SVP (18.08%), the Green Party (12.97%) and the FDP (10.99%).  In the federal election, a total of 51,012 votes were cast, and the turnout was 51.4%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, Nationalratswahlen 2007: Strke der Parteien und Wahlbeteiligung, nach Gemeinden/Bezirk/Canton  accessed 28 May 2010)EnergyBasel is at the forefront of a national vision to more than halve energy use in Switzerland by 2050. In order to research, develop and commercialise the technologies and techniques required for the country to become a 2000 Watt society, a number of projects have been set up since 2001 in the Basel metropolitan area. These including demonstration buildings constructed to MINERGIE or Passivhaus standards, electricity generation from energy sources,(Geothermal project shakes Basel again) and vehicles using gas, hydrogen and biogas.(The Basel pilot region of the 2000 Watt Society)An hot dry rock geothermal energy project was cancelled in 2009 since it caused seismicity in Basel.Notable people born or resident in Basel*Banchini (born 1946), violinist and conductor.*Barth (18861968), Reformed Protestant theologian.*family**Bernoulli (17001782), mathematician.**James Bernoulli (16541705), mathematician.**Bernoulli (16671748), mathematician.*Birkhuser (19111976), painter.*Burckhardt (18361907), psychiatrist, father of modern psychosurgery.*Burckhardt (18181897), historian, theologian, philosopher.*Florian Burkhardt (born 1974), composer, author.*Calvin (born 1509), minister.*Cohn (born 1927), film producer.*Daetwyler (19071994), alphorn composer.*Derdiyok (born 1988), footballer.*Erasmus (c.14661536), Biblical scholar, humanist, theologian.*Euler (17071783), mathematician.*Federer (born 1981), tennis player.*Foxe (15171587), English Protestant and Marian exile.*Frei (born 1979), footballer.*French (19832007), model and socialite.*Graf (1485-possibly 1530), Renaissance print-maker and artist.*Friedrich Haas (born 1953), Austrian composer.*Emanuel Handmann (17181781), painter.*Peter Hebel (17601826), poet and author.*Hofmann (19062008), chemist, discoverer of LSD.*Imondi (1975), filmmaker*Kai Jerne (19111994), immunologist*Carl Gustav Jung (18751961), psychiatrist.*Munatius Plancus (c.BCc.BC), Basels founder.*Merian (18001858), banker and businessman.*Meyer (c.1537?1571), fencer and author.*Nietzsche (18441900), German philosopher.*Paracelsus (14931541), scientist.*Thurneysen (15311596), alchemist.*Schuon (19071998), religious philosopher.*Sieber (born 1972), singer.*Smith (born 1946), American lutenist.*Vesalius (1446), pioneering anatomist.*Gustav Bertha (Gordon Bell) (born 1969), singer-songwriter.*Yakin (born 1977), footballer.*Eckenstein (18901984), Swiss child rescuer in occupied Belgium during WW I.SportBasel has a reputation in Switzerland as a successful sporting city. The football club Basel continues to be successful and in recognition of this the city was one of the Swiss venues for the 2008 European Championships, as well as Geneva, Zurich and Bern. The championships were jointly hosted by Switzerland and Austria. Old Boys and Basel are the other football teams in Basel.Basel features a large football stadium that has been awarded four stars by UEFA, a modern hockey hall, and an admitted sports hall.A large indoor tennis event takes place in Basel every October. Some of the best ATP-Professionals play every year at the Swiss Indoors, including Switzerlands biggest sporting hero and frequent participant Federer, a Basel native who describes the city as one of the most beautiful cities in the world.CultureSuisse secourant Strasbourg.JPG|thumb|right|200px|Switzerland protecting Strasbourg by BartoldiBasel has a thriving cultural life. (In 1997, it contended to become the Capital of Culture, though the honor went instead to Thessaloniki) Basel is the home of the Cantorum Basiliensis, founded in 1933, a worldwide centre for research on and performance of music from the Medieval through the Baroque eras. Basel presents a busy schedule of plays in addition to being home to the citys opera and ballet companies.  Basel is home to the largest orchestra in Switzerland, the Basel. It is also  the home of the Kammerorchester Basel, which is recording the complete symphonies of van Beethoven for the Sony label led by its music director Antonini. The baroque orchestras La Cetra and Capriccio Basel are also based in Basel. In May 2004, the fifth Festival of Youth Choirs (Europisches Jugendchorfestival, or EJCF) choir festival opened: this Basel tradition started in 1992. Host of this festival is the local Boys Choir.EventsThe carnival of the city of Basel (Basler Fasnacht) is a major cultural event in the year. The carnival is the biggest in Switzerland and attracts large crowds every year, despite the fact that it starts at four in the morning (Morgestraich) and lasts for exactly 72 hours, taking in various parades. Basel is also host to the Tattoo and a number of fairs.MediaZeitung (Baz) is the local newspaper.CuisineThere are a number of culinary specialties originating in Basel, including Lckerli cookies and Mssmogge candies.ZooFile:ZolliAntelopeHouse2.JPG|200px|thumb|left|the Antelope House at BaselBasel is, with nearly 1.7 million visitors per year, the most visited tourist attraction in Basel and the second most visited tourist attraction with a fee in Switzerland.( Zolli beliebt. 20min.ch, published 2009-2-23)Established in 1874, Zoo Basel is Switzerlands oldest and, by animals, largest zoo in Switzerland. Through its history, Zoo Basel has had several breeding successes, such as the first worldwide rhinoceros birth( Erffnung des Panzernashornhauses. Zoo Basel, written 2006-09-26, retrieved 2009-12-3) and flamingo hatch() in a zoo. These and other achievements lead Forbes Travel to rank Zoo Basel as one of the fifteen best zoos in the world in 2008.( Forbes Travel. GetListy, retrieved 2010-3-26)Despite its international fame, Basels population remains attached to Zoo Basel, which is entirely surrounded by the city of Basel.  Evidence of this are the millions of donations money each year, as well as Zoo Basels  in-official name: locals lovingly call their zoo Zolli by which is it known throughout Basel and most of Switzerland.MuseumsFile:Tinguely Museum Basel.jpg|thumb|right|200px|MuseumThe Basel museums cover a broad and diverse spectrum of collections with a marked concentration in the arts. They house numerous holdings of international significance. The over three dozen institutions yield an extraordinarily high density of museums compared to other cities of similar size and draw over one million visitors annually.Constituting an essential component of Basel culture and cultural policy, the museums are the result of closely interwoven private and public collecting activities and promotion of arts and culture going back to the 16th century. The public museum collection was first created back in 1661 and represents the oldest public collection in continuous existence. Since the late 1980s, various private collections have been made accessible to the public in new purpose-built structures that have been recognized as acclaimed examples of avant-garde museum architecture.*Basel und Sammlung Ludwig Ancient cultures of the mediterranean museum()*Raurica Roman open-air museum()*Paper Mill ()()*Foundation (Foundation Beyeler) Beyeler Museum (Fondation Beyeler)*Botanical Garden Basel One of the oldest botanical gardens in the world*& Cartoon Museum Basel ()(accessdate2009-05-05)*Museum ()()*Historical Museum Basel ()()*Basel Modern and contemporary art museum()*Basel Upper Rhenish and paintings, drawings from 1400 to 1600 and 19th- to 21st-century art()*Monteverdi Automuseum()*of Cultures Basel () Large collections on European and non-Europeancultural life()*Museum of Contemporary Art Art from the 1960s up to the present()*Music Museum () of the Basel Historic Museum*History Museum of Basel ()()*Museum der Universitt Basel()*Puppenhausmuseum  a museum houring the largest teddy bear collection in Europe.*Schaulager Modern and contemporary art museum()*Architecture Museum ()()*Museum Life and work of the major Swiss iron sculptor Tinguely()*Design Museum Museum in am Rhein near Basel()See also*German (language)NotesReferences;Notes;Bibliography* * Basel-Stadt | Statistik (in German). Official government website. http://www.statistik-bs.ch/* Gossman, Lionel. Basel in the Age of Burckhardt: A Study in Unseasonable Ideas. Chicago: of Chicago Press, 2000.http://www.press.uchicago.edu/cgi-bin/hfs.cgi/00/13917.ctl ISBN 0-226-30498-1.* Gossman, Lionel. Orpheus Philologus: Bachofen versus Mommsen on the Study of Antiquity. American Philosophical Society, 1983. http://dianepub.wordpress.com/2010/06/30/lionel-gossman-orpheus-philologus-bachofen-versus-mommsen-on-the-study-of-antiquity-american-philosophical-society-transactions-73-5-isbn-142237467x/ ISBN 1-4223-7467-X.* Kearney, Shirley. Basel: A Cultural Experience. Spalentor Verlag, ISBN 10 3-908142-23-7, ISBN 13 978-3-908142-23-2.External links*Official Website*Official Website of the Administration*Official Picture Database of the City of Basel*Official tourism site*Rhine Online: an English language guide to Basel, the Alsace and Baden Wuerrtemberg**EuroAirport Basel Mulhouse Freiburg, Basel-Mulhouse Airport*Overview of museums in Basel or basel museums*Portrait of Basels tramways*Basel Tourism & Hotels*Interview with Theodora Vischer, director of the Schaulager in Basel, Switzerland  af:Baselals:Baselar:frp:Blaast:Basileabn:zh-min-nan:Baselbe-x-old:bo:bs:Baselbr:Baselbg:ca:Basileacv:cs:Basilej(dinas)da:Baselde:Baselet:Basel()es:Basileaeo:Bazeloeu:Basileafa:fr:Blefy:Basel- Baselko:hy:hr:Baselid:Baselie:Baselos:is:Baselit:Basileahe:jv:Baselka:(urbs)lv:Bzelelb:Basellt:Bazelislmo:Basileahu:Bzelmk:mr:na:Basel(Zwitserland)ja:frr:Bselno:Baselnn:Baseloc:Basilands:Baselpl:Bazyleapt:Basileiaro:Baselrm:Basileaqu:Baselru:sq:Baselscn:Basileasimple:Baselsk:Bazilejsl:Baselsr:sh:Baselfi:Baselsv:Baselta:th:tr:Baseluk:ur:vec:Baxieavi:Baselvo:Baselwar:Baselwuu:yi:zh-yue:zh:
4973
Ballarat
 location3  BendigoBallarat ((Retrieved on 19 November 2007. Ballarat.com. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)) is a city in the state of Australia, approximately  west-north-west of the state capital Melbourne situated on the lower plains of the Dividing Range and the River catchment. It is the largest inland centre(Profile of the Electoral Division of Ballarat (Vic)  Australian Electoral Commission. Aec.gov.au (7 October 2010). Retrieved on 18 August 2011.) and third most populous city in the state and the fifth most populated inland city in Australia. The estimated urban area population is 96,000.(Ballarat population nears 100,000 - Local News - News - General - The Courier by Jordan Oliver for The Courier 22 April 2010) It is the administrative centre for the of Ballarat, which encompasses both the urban area and outlying towns spanning an area of . Inhabitants of Ballarat are known as Ballaratians.(K. T. Livingston, Richard Jordan, Gay Sweely (2001) Becoming Australians: the movement towards federation in Ballarat and the nation p.34. Wakefield Press)It was named by Scottish settler Archibald Yuille who established the sheep run called Ballaarat in 1837(Buninyong monument. Ballarat Reform League. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.) with the name derived from local Wathaurong Aboriginal words for the area, balla arat, thought to mean resting place. The present spelling was officially adopted in 1996.Ballarat is one of the most significant era boomtowns in Australia. Gold was discovered at Poverty Point on 18 August 1851, and the district was found to be a rich alluvial field where gold could easily be extracted. News of the finds intensified the gold rush bringing over 10,000 migrants to the city from around the world within a year and transforming it from a station to a major settlement in the newly proclaimed Colony of Victoria. Australias first gold mill was established at Ballarat in 1854.It was the site of the Rebellion, the only armed civil uprising in history, which took place on 3 December 1854 at the Eureka Mining Lead, and the event is controversially identified with the birth of democracy in Australia. Many significant Australian cultural icons are also a legacy of Ballarats gold rush boom. The rebellions symbol, the Flag has become a national symbol and is held at the Fine Art Gallery, Australias oldest and largest regional gallery. Other nationally significant heritage structures include the Botanical Gardens, established 1857, the best example of a regional botanic gardens in Australia(BALLARAT BOTANIC GARDENS | National Trust of Australia (Victoria). Nattrust.com.au. Retrieved on 18 August 2011. ) with the greatest concentration of public statuary( ) including the official Ministers Avenue; the longest running lyric theatre building, Her Majestys, established 1875;(Her Maj: A History of Her Majestys Theatre, Ballarat by Peter Freund with Val Sarah ISBN 978-0-9757483-1-2.) the first municipal observatory, established 1886;(Ballaarat Astronomical Society. Observatory.ballarat.net. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.) and the earliest and longest memorial avenue, the of Honour, established between 1917 and 1919.(Monuments and Memorials within Australia associated with World War One. Monumentaustralia.org.au. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)Proclaimed a city in 1871, its prosperity continued until late in the 19th century, after which its importance relative to both Melbourne and Geelong rapidly faded with the slowing of gold extraction. It has endured as a major regional centre hosting the rowing and kayaking events from the Summer Olympics. It is the commercial capital of the Central Highlands and the largest city in the region of Victoria  a significant tourist destination. Ballarat is known for its history, culture and its well preserved Victorian era heritage. History  Prehistory and European settlement Prior to the settlement of Australia, the Ballarat region was populated by the Wathaurong people, an Australian people.()  The Boro gundidj tribes territory was based along the Yarrowee River.Scottish settlers the Yuille family, Archibald Buchanan Yuille and his brother William Cross Yuille arrived in 1837 and squatted a  sheep run with William Cross building a hut at Black Swamp in 1838. Outsiders originally knew of the settlement as Yuilles Station and Yuilles Swamp. Archibald Yuille named the areaBallaarat which is thought he derived from local Wathaurong Aboriginal words for the area, balla arat. The meaning of this word is not certain, however several translations have been made and it is generally thought to mean resting place. In some dialects, balla means bent elbow which is translated to mean reclining or resting and arat meaning place. 1850s: Gold rush File:Ballarat 1853-54 von guerard.jpg|thumb|Ballarats tent city in the summer of 18531854 oil painting from an original sketch by von Guerard.On 19 August 1851, John Dunlop and James Regan struck gold at Poverty Point with a few ounces but within days of the announcement prospectors rushed the area. As the Victorian gold rush gathered pace, numerous alluvial and deep mining leads sprang up in the Ballarat district. The Ballarat goldfields had gained an international reputation as a rich goldfield and a huge influx of immigrants from around the world included many from Ireland and China gathering in a collection of prospecting towns around the creeks and hills. Several other notable gold fields were established in the wider area including the Berringa, Clunes, Creswick, Talbot and Enfield but the Ballarat district was the most important settlement in the area and the colonys second largest settlement.The first Post Office opened on 1 November 1851.()  Parts of the district were first surveyed by Urquhart as early as October 1851.() By 1852 his plan and wide streets for land sales in the new township of West Ballarat(pg 11. Jacobs, Wendy. Ballarat: A Guide to Buildings and Areas 18511940 Jacob Lewis Vines Conservation Architects and Planners (1981)) contrasted markedly with the existing narrow unplanned streets, tents and gullies of the original East Ballarat settlement.Civil disobedience in Ballarat led to Australias first and only armed civil uprising, the Rebellion (colloquially referred to as the Eureka Stockade) which took place in Ballarat on 3 December 1854. The event, in which 22 miners died, is considered to be a defining moment in Australian history.The city earned the nickname The Golden City in the 1850s(Perkin, Corrie Golden city of Ballarat comes into the picture The Australian 1 September 2009) and during the 1860s prospered greatly on gold mining. Confidence of the citys early citizens in the enduring future of their city is evident in the sheer scale of many of the early public buildings, generous public recreational spaces, and opulence of many of its commercial establishments and private housing. The railway came to the town with the opening of the Geelong-Ballarat line in 1862,() As Ballarat grew, the regions original indigenous inhabitants were quickly expelled to the fringe and by 1867 few at all remained.( Victorian city and decline During the period from the 1870s to the early 20th century Ballarat made a successful transition from a gold rush town to industrial age city.Ballarat was proclaimed a city in 1871. Gong Gong reservoir was built in 1877 to alleviate flooding and to provide a permanent water supply. A direct railway to Melbourne was completed in December 1889.()  Many industries and workshops that had been established as a result of manufacturing and servicing for the deep lead mining industry.Local boosterists at the turn of the century adopted the nickname Athens of Australia, first used to describe the city by the prestigious Irish-Australian jurist and politician of the early 20th century Sir John Madden.(THE ATHENS OF AUSTRALIA, Poverty Bay Herald, Volume XXXVI, Issue 11988, 3 November 1909, p. 7 Papers Past  Poverty Bay Herald  3 November 1909  THE ATHENS OF AUSTRALIA.)(Douglas Pike, Geoffrey Serle : Australian dictionary of biography, Vol. 9, Melbourne University Press, 1983)(Frederic C. (Frederic Chambers) Spurr : Five years under the Southern Cross; experiences and impressions Read the ebook Five years under the Southern Cross; experiences and impressions by Frederic C. (Frederic Chambers) Spurr)(The Argus (Melbourne, Vic. : 18481954), Saturday 23 October 1909. Trove.nla.gov.au (23 October 1909). Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)On 13 May 1901, the Duke of York (later King George V) and his wife, the Duchess of York, travelled by train from Melbourne to Ballarat.(Royal Visit to Ballarat 1901, Jack McLean, Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, August 1994, pp211-233)Following the turn of the century Ballarats growth had all but stopped. World War I dented the citys population further and the general decline led to the gradual loss of first provincial status to Geelong.(Progressive Geelong  Industrial Expansion. Development of the Harbour. Argus, Melbourne 14 October 1921 p 8) In response, local lobbyists continually pushed the Victorian government for decentralisation, the greatest success being the Railways opening the North Workshops in April 1917.()  The Depression proved a further setback for Ballarat, with the closure of many institutions. Since the 20th Century While deep, the depression was also brief, the interwar period proved a period of recovery for Ballarat with a number of major infrastructure projects well underway including a new sewerage system. In 1930, Airport was established. By 1931 Ballarats economy and population was recovering strongly with further diversification of industry although in 1936 Geelong displaced it as the states second largest city.(Geelong Ousts Ballarat. Population Surprises. The Argus (Melbourne) Tuesday 28 April 1936, page 10)  During World War II an expanded Ballarat airport was the base of the RAAF Wireless Air Gunners School as well as the base for USAAF Liberator bomber squadrons.In the Post-war era, Ballarats growth continued, expanding significantly to the northwest and an acute housing shortage was eased with the establishment of an extensive Commission of Victoria estate on the former Ballarat Common (today known as Wendouree West).() The estate was originally planned to contain over 750 prefabricated houses. Whilst planning for the estate began in 1949, main construction occurred between 1951 to 1962. During the 1970s a further 300 houses were constructed. Private housing in the adjacent suburb of Wendouree closely matched and eventually eclipsed this by the mid 1960s. The suburb of greater Wendouree and Wendouree West had evolved as the suburban middle-class heart of the city.By the 1970s, Ballarat began to officially recognise its substantial heritage and the first heritage controls were recommended to ensure its preservation. With the opening of Hill, the city made a rapid shift to become a major cultural tourist destination.The city continued to grow at the national average throughout the late 20th Century and early 21st Century. In 2008 the City of Ballarat released a plan directing that growth of the city over the next 30 years is to be concentrated to the west of the city centre and through the redevelopment of inner city housing blocks, and other under-developed inner-city land in the East that is being redeveloped to create a higher-density housing structure.GeographyBallarat lies at the foothills of the Dividing Range in Central Western Victoria. Also known as the Central Highlands, it is named so because of its gentle hills and lack of any significant mountains that are more common in the eastern sections of the Great Dividing Range. The city lies within a gently undulating section of the midland plains which stretch from Creswick in the north, to Rokewood in the south, and from Lal Lal in the south-east to Pittong in the west. These plains are made up of alluvial sediment and volcanic flows, and contain large areas of rich agricultural soils.(City of Ballarat (Maps, Population & Location  http://www.ballarat.vic.gov.au/Global/Maps/index.aspx) )  A large feature of the city is the man-made Wendouree (formerly Yuilles Swamp), around which many of the inner suburbs are situated. The central city is situated low in the valley of the Yarrowee catchment and surrounded by hills such that the city skyline is visible only from the hills and the lower lying inner eastern suburbs. The reach of the Yarrowee toward Ballarat Central becomes a stormwater drain and is completely covered over as it flows under the CBD.There are numerous densely forested areas around Ballarat and large bodies of water including the White Swan Reservoir and other lakes, rivers and creeks which are used for urban water use and agriculture.City and suburbsBallarat is a primarily low-rise city though apart from the area around Ballarat Airport there are few established height limits for buildings. There are two principal centres within the urban area, the Central Business District (CBD) and Wendouree. The tallest building in urban Ballarat is the seven-storey Henry Bolte wing of the Ballarat Base Hospital (1994).Beyond the central area, urban Ballarat extends into several suburban areas. Settlement patterns around Ballarat consist of small villages and country towns, some with less than a few thousand people.The Central Business District (located in Central) is a large mixed-use office and retail district. Ballarats CBD (along Lydiard, Sturt Streets, Armstrong, Doveton and Dana Streets) along with the historic centre of East Ballarat  Main Street and Bakery Hill has retained stands of commercial and civic buildings of state and national heritage significance. The CBD area is bounded to the north by railway lines, extends to the west to Drummond Street, to the south to Grant street and to the east as far as Princes Street spanning the floodplain of the Yarrowee River. It includes a major retail area.The inner established suburbs were initially laid out around the key mining areas and include Ballarat East, Bakery Hill, Golden Point, Soldiers Hill, Black Hill, Brown Hill, Eureka, Canadian, Mount Pleasant, Redan, Sebastopol and Newington.The post gold rush era has seen a boom in expansion, extending the conurbation north, south and west. To the west, Ballarat has expanded to Alfredton, Delacombe and Wendouree to the north it has expanded to Ballarat North, Nerrina, Invermay and Invermay Park; to the east to Warrenheip and south to Sebastopol, Mount Clear and Mount Helen with the urban area encroaching the large town of Bunninyong.Wendouree is currently the only major suburban activity centre with a large indoor shopping mall  Stockland Shopping Centre (expanded in 2007(http://www.stockland.com.au/assets/shopping-centres_vic/DEV24467_WEN_FlashTower.pdf)) and also has a number of surrounding parks including a strip shopping centre along Howitt Street including the large retail chain Norman. Elsewhere are small suburban hubs with supermarkets such as (supermarkets) and small stretches of shopfronts.Unlike Melbourne, Ballarat does not have a defined growth boundary.()  This has put continuing pressure on the city council to approve development applications for subdivisions outside of the city fringe. In response to lobbying by landholders, the Ballarat West Growth Area Plan, a major land development plan, was prepared and has approved by the city and state government to allow for planned fringe communities consisting of 14,000 new homes and up to 40,000 new residents, effectively doubling the citys urban area by extending the sprawl from Sebastopol, Delacombe and Alfredton west toward Bonshaw, Smythes Creek and Cardigan(http://www.ballarat.vic.gov.au/media/57489/ballarat%20city%20council%20-%20tract%20expert%20evidence.pdf)() with a new suburb to be known as Lucas to be created.(Henderson, Fiona Ballarat west suburb to be named Lucas The Courier 10 Feb 2011)  New activity centres are to be developed at Delacombe and Alfredton.ClimateBallarat has a moderate oceanic climate (climate classification Cfb)()() with four seasons. Its elevation, at 435 metres (1,427 ft) above sea level, causes its mean monthly temperatures to tend on average 3  4 degrees Celsius below those of Melbourne. The mean daily maximum temperature for January is  whilst the mean minimum is  In July, the mean maximum is , with average July minimum is .The mean annual rainfall is 695 millimetres (27.75 in), with August being the wettest month (77 mm/3.0 in). There are an average of 198 rain-free days per year. Like much of Australia, Ballarat experiences cyclical drought and heavy rainfall. Flooding of the Yarrowee catchment occurs occasionally. In 1869 a serious flood of the Yarrowee River put most of the lower section of business district including Bridge and Grenville streets underwater and causing the loss of two lives.(The Great Flood of Ballarat. pg 6. The Maitland Mercury & Hunter River General Advertiser. 23 October 1869) Prolonged drought (an average annual rainfall with falls averaging as low as  per year since 2001) caused Lake Wendouree to dry up completely for the first time in its history between 2006 and 2007. More recently higher rainfall levels have been recorded including  in the 24 hours to 9 am on 14 January 2011,(Commonwealth of Australia 2011, Bureau of Meteorology Ballarat, Victoria January 2011 Daily Weather Observations Bureau of Meteorology 7 Feb 2011) ending a four-day period of flooding rains across much of Victoria and Tasmania,(Millar, Paul and Sexton, Reid Victoria and Tasmania struggle with heavy rain The Courier 14 Jan 2011)(Ballarat region floods as record rains fall The Courier 14 Jan 2011)(Williams, Erin Ballarat region floods as record rains fall The Courier 15 Jan 2011) and contributing to the wettest January on record, with a total of  of rain for the month.((Rayner, Meg Wettest January ever in Ballarat The Courier 20 Jan 2011)Light snowfall typically falls on nearby Mount Buninyong and Mount Warrenheip at least once a year but only in the urban area during heavy winters. Widespread frosts and fog are more common during the cooler months. Snow has been known to fall heavily. Heavy snow seasons occurred in 19001902, 19051907 (with record falls in 1906) and moderate snow seasons during the 1940s and 1980s. The most recent snowfalls to have occurred within the urban area were between 20062008 with falls in November 2006 (light);() July 2007 (moderate);()() June 2008 (light)() and August 2008 (light).()Ballarats highest maximum recorded temperature was  on 7 February 2009 during the southeastern Australia heat wave. This is  above the previous record of , set on 25 January 2003. The lowest ever recorded minimum was  at sunrise on 21 July 1982.(Weatherzone, 2009)dateAugust 2010EnvironmentBallarat has a healthy environment in comparison to Melbourne, however as a growing regional city there are issues including pollution, waterway health and invasive species. Air quality is generally good,() however woodsmoke from fireplaces is a issue in the winter months.() Ballarats waterways have historically been affected by heavy pollution from both mining and industry.()(http://epanote2.epa.vic.gov.au/EPA/media.nsf/ad5006bdf5dcd5c84a256695000c4619/fc59cf3423e7e9d04a2566dd0017d972/$FILE/EPA%20Media%20Release.rtf)  pigeons are also a problem in Ballarat.The Ballarat Environment Network formed in 1993 to provide a voice for environmental and conservation issues in Ballarat and surrounds.( )  Another large lobby group for sustainability in the city is the Ballarat Renewable Energy And Zero Emissions  BREAZE formed in 2006.() The City of Ballarat released an Environment Sustainability Strategy for the city in 2007.(http://www.ballarat.vic.gov.au/media/66766/city%20of%20ballarat%20environment%20sustainability%20strategy.pdf)While there are no national parks in Ballarats proximity, Ballarat is bordered by extensive bushland to the north, south and south west and sensitive wetlands to the east. There are a number of nearby state parks and large reserves including the State Park, Regional Park, Warrenheip Flora Reserve Buninyong Reserve and Burrumbeet park. The region is home to a large koala population with protected areas established in the citys outer southern and eastern settlements.(Williams, Erin. (3 August 2010) VCAT knocks back Mt Helen subdivision  Local News  News  General. The Courier. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)(Implementing the Ballarat Koala Plan of Management through the Ballarat Planning Scheme. (PDF) . Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)Many parts of urban Ballarat have been affected by the introduction of exotic species, particularly introduced flora. Gorse is one such problem which has prompted the formation of an official Ballarat Region Gorse Task Force in 1999 to control.(Biodiversity, Australia State of the Environment Report 2001 (Theme Report): Biodiversity issues and challenges (part 2). Environment.gov.au (13 December 2010). Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)EconomyBallarats major industries include the service industries, tourism and hospitality, manufacturing, education and information technology as well as primary industries including agriculture, mining and renewable energy.As a major service centre for the populous goldfields region, Ballarat has large sectors of employment in retailing, service industries, state and federal government branch offices and agencies and health care.Service industriesBallarat is the main retail economy in the region. Central to the retail district is a mall known as Bridge Mall. There are shopping malls, the largest of which are Central Square Shopping Centre (completed in 1988) opposite the town hall which includes the major department stores of Myer (located within the 1870s Mitchell building) and Target. Additionally the city has each of the major supermarkets, speciality stores and branches of the big four Australian retail banks.Ballarat has become a major education centre with the formation of the University of Ballarat which exports education through a large international students program and throughout Australia through education programs.In recent years, a large technology park, the University of Ballarat Technology Park with communications centre has been established, with tenants including IBM and employing over 1,400 people.()Tourism and hospitalityBallarat attracts 2.2 million visitors a year(City of Ballarat Visitor Services. (PDF) . Retrieved on 18 August 2011.) and the tourism and hospitality industry is a A$480 million a year sector which accounts for around 15% of Ballarats economy and employs around 2,870 people.()A significant tourism industry has grown substantially in Ballarat since the 1960s. Ballarat is most notable for the award-winning museum known as Hill, a recreated 1850s gold mining settlement opened in 1970. Sovereign Hill is Ballarats biggest tourism drawcard and is consistently rated amongst one of the best outdoor museums in the world and continues to expand. Sovereign Hill accounts for over half a million of Ballarats visitors and $40 million in tourism revenue.(Business Ballarat  Sovereign Hill)Several traps and spin-offs have capitalised on Sovereign Hills tourism popularity, most of these have sprung up near the eastern entrance of the Western Freeway between Melbourne and Ballarat. They include Castle (1972), Gold Rush Mini Golf (2002) featuring the Big Miner (2006) one of big things (although the original proposal appeared larger and for the miner to hold the Eureka Flag)(http://www.goldrushgolf.com.au/uploads/GoldrushEditorial_4_web.pdf) at Ballarats eastern entrance.Other tourist attractions include the Centre; The Gold Museum; Ballarat Botanic gardens and Lake Wendouree; the Tramway museum and Ballarat Ghost Tours. A large number of Ballarat hotels, motels and restaurants service the tourism industry. The Ballarat Tourist Association is an industry based non-profit, membership organisation representing the citys tourism industry.Mining and goldGold historically has been one of the main industries of the Ballarat region.(http://www.lglgold.com/data/portal/00000005/content/35824001175418214937.pdf )  Gold mining has continued to the present date with a main mine operating and large deposits remaining deep underground. There are still thought to be large, undiscovered gold reserves around the Ballarat region, with investigations being made by local and national companies to extract potentially as much gold as the Gold Rush days in the mid 1800s.(Ballarat Goldfields  http://www.lglgold.com/data/portal/00000005/content/68910001181645144108.pdf ) Gold invested in Ballarat Goldfields in 2006(Lihir Gold to buy Ballarat for $350m by Jamie Freed for The Age. 18 October 2006) however downscaled its operations in 2009 due to the expense of extraction(200 jobs lost as Lihir Gold quits Ballarat by Mathew Murphy for The Age. 22 July 2009) before selling its stake in 2010 to Castlemaine Goldfields.()Lignite (coal), kaolin (clay) and iron ore have also been mined in the Ballarat region and nearby Lal however many of the resource deposits have since been exhausted.ManufacturingAccording to the 2006 Australian Census, manufacturing is Ballarats third largest employment sector, accounting for 14.8% of all workers.(Ballarat City Council representatives to meet with Federal Minister for Innovation, Industry, Science and Research Thursday, 18 February 2010 )Ballarat attracts investment from several international manufacturers. The Australian headquarters of Incorporated was established in Ballarat in 1979 with the main Ballarat factory producing bars for the Australian market.(Sobey, Emily Mars celebrates 30 years in Ballarat The Courier. 24 Nov 2009)  Foods Limited Australian headquarters was established in Ballarat in 1970 and the company continues to expand its operations.(Company History from mccain.com.au)  The North Workshops is a major manufacturer of public transportation products with current investment from Alstom.(Xtrapolis Train Manufacturing Under Way in Ballarat. Tandlnews.com.au. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)Ballarat also has a large number of home grown companies producing textiles, general industrial engineering, food products, brick and tiles, building components, prefabricated housing components and automotive components.AgricultureThe outskirts of Ballarat are used for agriculture including growing and husbandry. The Ballarat Livestock Selling Centre is the largest cattle exchange in regional Victoria.(http://www.trsn.com.au/SiteFiles/nswtrsncomau/VIC_Ballarat.pdf)()  The Ballarat Agricultural and Pastoral Society formed in 1866 and has run the Ballarat Show annually each November at the Showgrounds since that time.()There are also a number of small forestry operations in Ballarats Canadian Valley around the suburbs of Mt Clear and Mt Helen areas with pine plantations and mills.(http://www.ballarat.vic.gov.au/media/57458/explanatory%20report.pdf)Renewable energyThe Ballarat region has a rapidly growing energy industry, in particular due to its abundant energy, attracting significant investment and generating revenue for local landholders and local councils. The region is also a source of bountiful energy,(Williams, Erin Ballarat region named a geothermal hotspot. 14 Jul 2010) power( and biomass.(Burin, Margaret Biomass not sexy, but more viable than wind farms: bioenergy expert ABC Ballarat. 20 October 2010)(Central Highlands Bioenergy Scoping Study and Biomass Audit. None. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)Through the Wind Farm the Ballarat region produces more than enough energy to power every home in the city, however the electricity produced goes to the national grid. Additional nearby facilities include the first community-owned wind farm in Australia at Wind Project at Leonards Hill(Victorian community goes it alone on wind farm from ABC News) which produces enough electricity to power the town of Daylesford as well as approved proposals for Chepstowe,()(Chepstowe Wind Farm Victoria. Chepstowewindfarm.com.au. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.) Lal Lal,(WestWind Energy  Lal Lal Wind Farm. W-wind.com.au (11 May 2009). Retrieved on 18 August 2011.) Mount Mercer(Mt. Mercer Windfarm. Mt. Mercer Windfarm. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.) and proposed facilities at Mount Egerton and Ballan.(Houston, Cameron Ballarat wind farm approved The Age. 13 April 2007)Ballarat Solar Park opened in 2009 at the Airport site in Mitchell Park is Victorias first ground mounted, flat plate and grid-connected photovoltaic farm. Built by Corporation for Energy is a 14,993 sqm produces the equivalent energy needs of around 150 homes.(Stephens, Kim Solar park goes public The Courier 27 Nov 2009)DemographicsThe 2006 Australian national census indicated that the permanent population of the City of Ballarat was 85,196.() Of this the urban population was measured to be 78,221.() Although surging land and house prices in Melbourne coupled with significant recent public transport upgrades between Melbourne and Ballarat has witnessed a significant growth surge. Ballarats abundance of affordable land and highly established infrastructure have caught the notice of many people and families seeking a family friendly lifestyle. Since 2006 Ballarat has averaged an annual population growth of 1700 and in June 2008 had an estimated resident population of 91,787.() In August 2009 the estimated resident population was 94,000.Whilst most of the citys population can trace their ethnic roots to Anglo-Celtic decendency, 13.6% of the population are born overseas, with New Zealand, Germany, the Netherlands and Italy the most common places of birth outside Australia. More recently the city has welcomed new arrivals from the Asian sub-continent and Africa.Almost 15% of the population is over the age of 65, with over a quarter of the population expected to be over the age of 65 by 2021. The median age in Ballarat is 36 years. 46.8% of the population are married, with almost 35% of the population having never been married.(Ballarat East Electorate Statistical Data  http://home.vicnet.net.au/~ghoward/About%20Ballarat%20East%20Electorate.html)The average income of Ballarat, while lower than Melbourne, is higher than average for regional Victoria. Ballaratians in the 2007/08 financial year earned on average A$38,850 a year(Nolan, Pat Higher income in central Ballarat The Courier 14 Sep 2010) with the highest earners living in the citys inner and northern suburbs and the lowers earners living in the citys southern suburbs.There were 31,959 households in the 2006 census, with 56.5% of the population having access to the internet at home.(Australian Bureau of Statistics  Ballarat Statistical Region http://www.abs.gov.au/AUSSTATS/abs@.nsf/Latestproducts/LGA20570Population/People12002-2006?opendocument&tabnameSummary&prodnoLGA20570&issue2002-2006)42.5% of the population have completed further education after high school, with only 11.1% of the population holding a bachelor degree or greater, well below the national average.ReligionChristianity remains the dominant religion in Ballarat, with over 65% of residents claiming Christian affiliation, slightly above the national average of 64%. Catholics (27.1%), Anglicans (15.0%), Church (11.2%) and Presbyterians (4.0%) remain the largest Christian denominations in Ballarat.Over 21.6% of Ballarat residents claim no religious affiliation. Minority religious groups include Buddhism, Judaism and Islam and total less than 5% of the population.GovernanceIn local government, the Ballarat region is covered by the of Ballarat. The council was created in 1994 as an amalgamation of a number of other municipalities in the region with the council chambers located at the Ballarat Town Hall in central Ballarat. The City is made up of 3 wards, each represented by three councillors elected once every four years by voting.(Electoral Commission profile for Ballarat http://www.vec.vic.gov.au/Government/ballaratprofile.html) The of Ballarat is elected from these councillors by their colleagues for a one year term.In state politics, Ballarat is located in the Legislative Assembly districts of Ballarat East and Ballarat West, with both of these seats currently held by the Labor Party.()In federal politics, Ballarat is located in a single House of Representatives division  the of Ballarat. The Division of Ballarat has been a safe Labor Party seat since 2001,( ) and was the seat of the second Minister of Australia, Deakin.MediaNewspapersBallarat has two local newspapers, both owned by Press Limited,  The Courier is a daily, and the Ballarat News, a free weekly. The latter is distributed almost universally across the city every Wednesday, and containing news of community events, advertisements for local businesses, and a real estate and classifieds section.Radio stationsLocal radio stations include 3BA, Power FM and also several community radio stations. There are also local branches of ABC-run ABC Radio, J and ABC Classic FM.* 102.3 FM  3BA (local classic hits commercial radio station)* 103.1 FM  Power FM 103.1 FM (local top-40 commercial radio station)*  99.9 FM  FM 99.9  formerly known as 3BBB (local community radio station)* 107.1 FM  J (ABC Youth Radio)* 107.9 FM  ABC Local Radio (Government-funded local news, current affairs, light entertainment and talkback)* 621 AM  Radio National (Government-funded, current affairs, arts, science, social interest)* 105.5 FM  Classic FM (Government-funded, classical music station)* 103.9 FM  News Radio 103.9 (Christian community-based religious station)TelevisionTelevision station BTV Channel 6 Ballarat commenced transmission of test patterns on 17 March 1962. Among the many local programs BTV6 produced, the 90 minute live variety program Six Tonight (19711983) hosted by local Ballarat identity Fred Fargher, was one of the few live Australian programs of this type being presented in Australia.In his 1999 book And Now Heres... (Four Decades of Behind the Scenes Fun in Australian Television), Mike McColl Jones fondly remembers local live television variety....and in Ballarat, Victoria, a Tonight show (Six Tonight) was carving its name into Australian television history. The show, hosted by Fred Fargher, ran for 13 years, and managed to attract many of the top name entertainers in the world, simply by offering them a limo ride to this beautiful country centre, a no-pressure spot on the show, and then a great dinner afterwards at one of the citys excellent restaurants. The sheer bravado of the offer enticed some of show business biggest names.Today Ballarat is serviced by numerous free to air High Definition and Standard Definition Digital television services. Two television broadcasting stations are located in the city including WIN, HD and GO! (sub-licensees of Network) and Prime7, 7Two, 7mate (a sub-licensee of Network). These two stations broadcast relayed services throughout regional Victoria. The city also receives Cross Ten, HD and Eleven (sub-licensees of Ten) that is based in Bendigo but operates a local office.Ballarat television maintains a similar schedule to the national television network but maintains local commercials and regional news programming - WIN produces a 30-minute local news bulletin each weeknight from its studios in the city, where bulletins for Albury, Bendigo, Gippsland, Shepparton and Mildura also originate. Southern Cross Ten provides short local news updates from its Canberra studios throughout the day. In addition to commercial television services, Ballarat receives Government ABC (ABC1, ABC2, ABC3, ABC News 24) and SBS (SBS One and Two) television services.On Friday 5 May 2011, Analog television transmissions ceased in most areas of regional Victoria and some border regions including Ballarat and surrounding areas. All local free-to-air television services are now broadcasting in digital transmission only. This was done as part of the Federal Government`s plan for terrestrial television in Australia, where all analogue transmission systems are gradually turned off and replaced with modern DVB-T transmission systems.Subscription television services are provided by Cable, Austar, and SelecTV.EducationFile:University of ballarat city campus.jpg|thumb|The University of Ballarats main campus is set among the heritage buildings and Ballarat Gaol at the School of Mines and Industry, Lydiard Street SthBallarat is home to two universities  the of Ballarat and the Ballarat campus of the Catholic University.The of Ballarat originated as the Ballarat School of Mines, founded in 1870 and once affiliated with the of Melbourne. The university consists of six campuses, three of which are in Ballarattwo in the city (Camp Street and SMB campuses) and the main campus in Mount Helen, approximately 6 kilometres (3.75 mi) southeast of the city at the foot of Buninyong.The Catholic Universitys Ballarat campus began life as the Aquinas Training College run by the Ballarat East Sisters of Mercy in 1909. It is ACUs only rural campus that is located outside of a capital ciy in Australia.Ballarat has four State Government-operated secondary schools of which the academically selective High School (established in 1907) is the oldest and the only state school member of the Associated Schools. The other schools are Sebastopol College, Mount Clear College and Ballarat Secondary College. Secondary College was formed in 1994 by the amalgamation of Ballarat East Secondary College, Wendouree Secondary College and Midlands Secondary College.Two private day and boarding schools in and Clarendon College and Ballarat and Queens Anglican Grammar School provide education from Years 1 to 12. Both of these co-educational schools are classified as academically excellent as the only Ballarat schools to be ranked on the tables of the top 100 Victorian schools based on median VCE scores and percentage of scores of 40 and above. In 2010, Clarendon was placed at number 11 just below Melbourne Grammar and above Geelong Grammar, Scotch College and Haileybury College. Ballarat Grammar was placed at number 59 just below Wesley College and above University High, Ivanhoe Grammar, Geelong Grammar and Tintern.(School Rankings in 2010)The city is well serviced by Catholic schools, with eight primary schools and three secondary colleges which include the all-boys(St Patricks mention in Scotch College article) St Patricks College, the all-girls Loreto College and the co-educational College, which was formed by the amalgamation of St Martins in the Pines, St Pauls Technical School and Sacred Heart College in the 1990s.Ballarat has several public libraries, the largest and most extensive of which is the City of Ballarat Library, run by the Central Highlands Regional Library Corporation and located on Creswick Road. Another library service is provided by the Institute in Sturt Street, which contains a collection of historic, archival and rare reference material.Arts and culture  HeritageBallarat is renowned for its heritage and decorative arts, especially applied to the built environment, combined with the gold rush, this has created a picturesque urban landscape.In 2003 Ballarat was the first of two Australian cities to be registered as a member of the International League of Historical Cities and in 2006 hosted the 10th World League of Historical Cities Congress.(League of Historical Cities Conference 2008. Leaguehistoricalcities-ballarat.com. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)Restoration of historic buildings is encouraged including a low interest council Heritage Loans Scheme.( ) and the prevention of demolition by neglect discouraged by council policies.(Ballarat City Council Plan to Preserve Heritage by Marcus Power for The Courier. 26 Apr 2010)  Since the 1970s,() the local council has become increasingly aware of the economic and social value of heritage preservation.(The Economics of Heritage  The value of heritage to the City of Ballarat from environment.gov.au)  This is in stark contrast to the 1950s and 60s when Ballarat followed Melbourne in encouraging the removal of Victorian buildings, verandahs in particular. Recent restoration projects funded by the Ballarat include the reconstruction of significant cast iron lace verandahs including the Mining Exchange, Art Gallery (2007), Mechanics institute (2005)() on Lydiard Street and in 2010 the restoration of the Town Hall and the long neglected Unicorn Hotel faade on Sturt Street.(Restoration work to start at Unicorn Hotel after permits approved by Marcus Power for The Courier. 27 Mar 2009)Ballarat Citizens for Thoughtful Development formed in 1998 and was incorporated as Ballarat Heritage Watch in 2005 to ensure that the citys architectural heritage is given due consideration in the planning process.()The Botanical Gardens (established in 1858) are recognised as the finest example of a regional botanical gardens in Australia and are home to many heritage listed exotic tree species and feature a modern glasshouse and horticultural centre and the Ministers Avenue which features bronze busts of every past Australian Prime Minister. The gardens are home to the annual Ballarat Begonia Festival.Ballarat is notable for its very wide boulevards. The main street is Sturt Street and is considered among one of the finest main avenues in Australia with over 2 kilometres of central gardens known as the Street Gardens featuring bandstands, fountains, statues, monuments, memorials and lampposts. Ballarat is home to the largest of a collection of several Avenues of Honour in Victoria. The fifteen kilometre (9.3 mi) long Ballarat Avenue of Honour consists of a total of approximately 4,000 trees, mostly deciduous which in many parts arch completely over the road. Each tree has a bronze plaque dedicated to a soldier from the Ballarat region who enlisted during World War I. The Avenue of Honour and the Arch of Victory are on the Heritage Register and are seen by approximately 20,000 visitors each year.The city also has the greatest concentration of public statuary in any Australian city with many parks and streets featuring sculptures and statues dating from the 1860s to the present. Some of the other notable memorials located in the Street Gardens in the middle of Ballarats main boulevard include a bandstand situated in the heart of the city that was funded and built by the City of Ballarat Band in 1913 as a tribute to the bandsmen of the , a fountain dedicated to the early explorers and Wills, and those dedicated to monarchs and those who have played pivotal roles in the development of the city and its rich social fabric. The most recent memorial is dedicated to war hero Sir Albert Coates.(Albert.shtml University of Ballarat Honour Roll. )Ballarat has an extensive array of significant war memorials, the most recent of which is the Australian Prisoner of War Memorial. The most prominent memorial in the city is the Ballarat Victory Arch that spans the old Western Highway on the Western approaches of the city. The archway serves as the focal point for the Avenue of Honour. Other significant individual monuments located along Sturt Street include those dedicated to the Boer War (18991901), the World War II (19391945) cenotaph, and Vietnam (19621972) (located adjacent to the Arch of Victory).Commercial and civic buildingsThe legacy of the wealth generated during Ballarats gold boom is still visible in a large number of fine stone buildings in and around the city, especially in the Lydiard Street area. This precinct contains some of Victorias finest examples of era buildings, many of which are on the Heritage Register or classified by the Trust of Australia.Notable civic buildings include the Town Hall (187072), the former Post Office (1864), the Ballarat Fine Art Gallery (1887), the Mechanics Institute (1860, 1869), the Queen Victoria Wards of the Ballarat Base Hospital (1890s) and the railway station (1862, 1877, 1888).Other historic buildings include the Provincial Hotel (1909), Reids Palace (1886), Craigs Royal Hotel (18621890) and Her Majestys Theatre (1875), the oldest intact and operating lyric theatre in Australia.(The Ballarat Fire Station, located near Bakery Hill, is one of Victorias oldest fire fighting structures; operated by the Ballarat East brigade  it currently only houses fire trucks. The building was designed in 1864 by architect Henry Caselli as brick masonry; with the construction completed in 1911. Heritage Victoria described the buildings as unusual and sophisticated.()  Ballarat is also home to the oldest Jewish synagogue on mainland Australia which is located in Bakery Hill in the Ballarat CBD. The first stone was laid on 25 January 1861, during the Victorian Gold Rush period.(Heritage Victoria  Ballarat Synagogue. (PDF) . Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)Events and festivalsBallarat is home to many annual festivals and events. The oldest large annual event is the Ballarat Agricultural Show (since 1859), currently held each year at the Showgrounds.Lake Wendouree is featured in many including the most prominent, the Begonia Festival (since 1953) and it now attracts over 100,000 visitors from around Australia.(Begonia Festival Enters New Era With Bracks Government Support Minister for Tourism, 15 October 2003) SpringFest (since 2001) now attracts more than 15,000 people from around Victoria(Springfest | An initiative of the Rotary Club of Ballarat. Ballaratspringfest.com.au (1 June 2011). Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)(Nolon, Patrick SpringFest will go on whatever the weather The Courier, 28 October 2010) and features market stalls and activities around the lake.Ballarat Heritage Weekend (since 2006) celebrates the citys heritage with activities such as historic vehicles and displays in and around the CBD and also attracts visitors from around Victoria.(Brown, Emma Heritage Weekend crowds up on last year The Courier. 10 May 2010)Other minor cultural festivals include the Ballarat Writers Festival, Ballarat International Foto Biennialle and the Goldfields Music Festival.EntertainmentBallarat has a lively and well established theatrical community with several local ensembles as well as a number of large performing arts venues. Major performing arts venues include:* Her Majestys Theatre  Seating 940* Post Office Box Theatre (University of Ballarat Arts Academy, Camp Street Campus)  Flexible Seating up to 100* Helen Macpherson Smith Performing Arts Theatre (University of Ballarat, Arts Academy Camp Street Campus)  Seating 200* The 1870 Founders Theatre (University of Ballarat, Mount Helen Campus)  Seating 600* The Courthouse Theatre (University of Ballarat, SMB Campus)  Seating 140* The Victoria Theatre (Sovereign Hill)  Seating 300* Wendouree Centre for Performing Arts (Ballarat Grammar School)  Seating 900* Gay E. Gough Theatre (Mount Clear Secondary College)  Seating 350* Mechanics Institute hall (seating 700) is used from time to time for travelling performances and cinema shows.The Ballarat Civic Hall is a large public building constructed in 1958 as a general purpose venue. Its stripped classical design was heavily criticised during its planning, however it has gained some cultural significance to the city with its cavernous spaces holding many significant events over the years. Civic Hall was closed in 2002 and there have been moves to redevelop it for many years() with some calls to retain the building as a venue.Ballarat has its own symphony orchestra, the Ballarat Symphony Orchestra which was formed in 1987.Some notable theatre organisations in Ballarat include BLOC (Ballarat Light Opera Company) founded in 1959.()Ballarat is also the home to Australias oldest and largest annual performing arts eisteddfod. The South Street Eisteddfod is an all-encompassing performing arts festival and competition event that is conducted over twelve weeks annually.(Royal South Street Society. Southstreet.ballarat.net.au. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)In the 1970s the Ballarat urban area contained no less than 60 hotels. The introduction of gaming machines in the early 1990s has brought about significant change in the city entertainment precincts. By 2006 at least 20 hotels had closed and some of those that remain have been redeveloped as dining and/or gaming venues. Gaming machines have brought significant revenue to the remaining hotels, sports and social clubs which has enabled many to expand and modernise.The city has several dance clubs as well as a highly active live music and jazz scene. Hotels are popular meeting places for young people. The city has many fine restaurants, wine bars and eateries as well as themed restaurants.A large cinema complex consisting of several theatres is located behind the faade of the old Regent cinemas in the heart of the city.Dance parties are popular within the Ballarat area; however, the director of Ballarat Health Services (BHS), Andrew Rowe, has stated that Ballarat is an inappropriate place to hold a rave and has called for the Moorabool Shire Council to forbid raves (such as the one held at Castle) around the immediate Ballarat area.() BTR is an organisation founded in 2006 that has begun hosting dance events in Ballarat.GalleriesThe Fine Art Gallery houses one of Australias oldest and most extensive collections of early Australian works. It is considered to have the best Australian collection outside any capital city in Australia.The University of Ballarat operates the Post Office Gallery in the Wardell designed former Post Office on the corner of Sturt and Lydiard Streets.(UB Site Listing )Sport and recreationBallarat has a number of large parks, sport fields, organised sporting clubs and associations. rules football and cricket are the most popular spectator and participation sports in Ballarat, while basketball, netball, racing and rowing have large followings. There are stadiums, both indoor and outdoor as well as training facilities for most sports.Australian rules football is played at semi-professional and amateur levels with a large number of players at numerous venues, both dedicated such as Stadium and shared with cricket. The North Ballarat Roosters based out of Stadium compete in the Football League and currently have an affiliation with national Football League (AFL) club the North Melbourne Kangaroos. Plans are currently in progression to upgrade Northern Oval (currently known as Eureka Stadium) for hosting regular AFL pre season matches, with an aim to accommodate seating for 20,000 people.(The Courier, 2009) The Football League (founded 1893) is a strong regional league of which there are 3 teams (Ballarat, Lake Wendouree and North Ballarat City) from Ballarat. The Football Club (founded 1860) remains one of the football clubs in the world. A team from Buninyong competes in the regional Highlands Football League.Cricket is also played extensively with three international standard cricket ovals. Ballarats Eastern Oval hosted a game in the Cricket World Cup.Horse racing and racing are popular, with dedicated facilities. The Harness Racing centre is considered to be among the best in Australia. The Ballarat Turf Club schedules around 28 race meetings a year including the Ballarat Cup meeting in mid-November.() Ballarat Harness Racing Club conducts regular meetings at its racetrack in the city.()The Ballarat Greyhound Racing Club holds regular meetings at Sebastopol.()Basketball is played at various levels with the Miners and Ballarat Lady Miners who competing in the East Australian Basketball League and playing out of the Minerdome. The venue hosted basketball games for the Commonwealth Games. Netball is similarly popular, with many netball clubs affiliated with local Australian rules clubs including Wendouree, East Point, Eureka, North Ballarat, Redan, Brown Hill and a the Ballarat Netball Association.Rowing and kayaking is centred around Lake Wendouree and the sport is particularly popular with the schools. The lake hosts the Victorian Schools Rowing Championships as well as the annual Head of the Lake rowing regatta  contested by Ballarat High School, Ballarat and Clarendon College, Ballarat Grammar School, St Patricks College and Loreto College. The city hosted rowing events for the 1956 Olympic Games.Association Football (known locally as soccer) is played mostly at an amateur level, with a competition known as the District Soccer Association (BDSA). The Red Devils play in the FFV State League division Two North-West.Athletics facilities include an international standard athletics track at Llanberris Reserve on York Street Golden Point which is an Athletics Victoria venue and home to local athletics and little athletics clubs.Swimming and sport is facilitated at two Olympic sized pools as well as an indoor 25 metre (82 ft) competition short course pool. The main facility is the Ballarat Aquatic Centre located at Gillies Street Lake Gardens in the citys west.Baseball was first organised in Australia at Ballarat in 1857.() The Ballarat Brewers field three teams in the Baseball Association Winter Division, A Grade, A Reserve and C Grade.Golf is played at four main venues which include the Ballarat Golf Course on Sturt Street in the Easter suburb of Alfredton, home to the Ballarat Golf Club;() the Midlands Golf Course on Heinz Lane in the northern suburb of Invermay Park which is home to the Midlands Golf Club;() the Eureka Golf Course at Elford Street in the eastern suburb of East and in the southern suburb of Buninyong at the Buninyong Golf Course.The Roller Derby League was formed in 2008, and held their first match in 2009. They have two teams who compete in local events, and a combined travelling team, the Rat Pack, who compete in interleague derby competitions.( )Wendouree is a large recreational lake that was created out of former wetlands and hosted the rowing events for the 1956 Summer Olympics. Victoria Park is an expansive reserve with tree lined avenues and sporting fields in suburban Newington. The suburbs feature some privately run wildlife parks including Ballarat Wildlife Park in Ballarat East and Ballarat Bird World in Buninyong.In popular cultureBallarat has inspired many artists, with several celebrated works depicting the city. In the Australian Collection of the Ballarat Art Gallery are some of von Guerards works documenting the citys establishment as a gold digging settlement, Henry Fullwoods depictions of boom era streetscapes and Bulls View of Ballarat Across Lake Wendouree.(http://www.balgal.com/?idcollection)  Several other artists have painted depictions of historic events such as the Eureka Stockade.Historic Lydiard Street features prominently in national television advertisement advertisements including the Gold Lion award (Lions International Advertising Festival)(Williams, Erin. (27 July 2010) Ballarats big VB ad wins Cannes gong by Erin Williams for The Courier. 27 Jul 2010. Thecourier.com.au. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.) and Australasian Writers and Art Directors Association award winning The Regulars (2009) for Bitter(Fosters hoping to strike VB gold in Ballarat. Theage.com.au (14 May 2009). Retrieved on 18 August 2011.) and What About Me (2010) Safe Driver Rewards campaign for AAMI.()Ballarat is also a popular filming location() with the city making cameos in film including Brother Jack (2001), Ned Kelly (2003) and The Writer (2005).()Ballarat also features prominently in literature and fiction, including Boscombe Valley Mystery (1891) from Adventures of Sherlock Holmes by Conan Doyle, the Billy of Ballarat and Other Stories (1892) by Roberts, Fortunes of Richard Mahony (1917) by Handel Richardson, on the Ballarat Train (1993) by Greenwood and The Supply Party by Martin Edward (2009).The town of California is named after Ballarat.Two ships of the Australian Navy have been named Ballarat after the city, Ballarat (J184) and Ballarat (FFH 155).Popular nicknames used by locals for the city include The Rat, a shortened version of the name derived from the rat, the name and symbol was further popularised by Rebellion Brewerys The Rat beer.(Brown, Emma New beer proves brewery gives a rats about city The Courier 19 Feb 2010)  Another enduring nickname is Golden City which dates back to the gold rush and appears in several names including Golden City Hotel (1856) and the Golden City paddlesteamer (1885) and in numerous non-fiction works.InfrastructureHealthBallarat has major hospitals in Base Hospital which services the entire region and the Queen Elizabeth Centre. hospitals include a John of God Health Care centre, established in 1915 and is currently the largest private hospital in regional Victoria.UtilitiesHighlands Water supplies Ballarat with water. The main reservoir is the White Swan reservoir which is topped up through the Superpipe sourced from the Goulburn-Murray waterway system. Secondary supplies include the Gong Gong Reservoir.(Ballarat population growth: water supply critical by Kim Quinlan for The Courier 28 Apr 2010)Ballarats data communications services now come from several providers, however for a long time the city went without broadband services. An extensive private broadband network was built by Neighbourhood Cable, now Telstra and Optus also provide broadband services. No announcement of Ballarats rollout of the Broadband Network has yet been made however it is seen as vital for the citys growing IT industry.(Power, Marcus Broadband revolution coming to Ballarat 13 May 2009)(http://www.ballaratict.com/resources/Issues-MinisterConroy.pdf)Ballarats electricity supply is provided and maintained by Victorian electricity distributor Powercor.TransportRoadThe main mode of transport in Ballarat is the road network and the automobile. The Western Freeway is carriageway in Ballarat providing a connection to Melbourne (approximately 90 minutes) and bypassing the central city on its way westward to Ararat (approximately 75 minutes) and Horsham. A network of state highways from Ballarat. The Midland Highway is a dual carriageway which runs north along Creswick Road to the Western Freeway interchange but becomes a single carriageway north of Ballarat to Creswick (approximately 25 minutes) and runs south as the dual carriageway of Skipton Road to Magpie before becoming a single carriageway to Geelong (approximately 87 minutes). The Highway connects directly to Gambier and the Highway west of Ballarat which connects directly to Mildura. Sturt Street and Victoria Street, both dual carriageways carry the bulk of the east-west CBD traffic, while Mair Street is planned to become dual carriageway to relieve pressure on these main streets. Other dual carriageway main roads in the west include Howitt Street and Gillies Street. The remainder of Ballarats roads are mainly secondary single carriageways or service lanes to the inner suburbs.Ballarat is also served by an extensive public bus service branded as Ballarat Transit which is currently operated mainly by Ballarat Coachlines and Davis Bus Service.()  The taxi system operates in all suburbs and is currently operated by Ballarat Taxis Co-op Ltd.Regional coaches operated by V/Line connect Ballarat with other regional centres such as Warrnambool, Bendigo, Mildura and Maryborough. There is also a direct bus service to Melbournes Airport.(Airport Shuttlebus. Airport Shuttlebus. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)RailFile:Vlocity railcars ballarat.jpg|thumb|right|Modern fleet of VLocity railcars inside the shed of railway stationBallarat has historically been a major railway hub in Victoria, situated at the junction of the Ballarat line, Ararat line and Mildura lines it currently has several connections for both passenger services and freight.Ballarat has two passenger railway stations, the hub of railway station and suburban railway station(Victorian Transport Plan  Ballarat:Wendouree Station http://www4.transport.vic.gov.au/vtp/projects/wendouree.html ) out of which V/Line operates VLocity trains running at up to  east to Melbourne, west and Ararat and north to Maryborough. The busiest service is the peak hour express (64 minutes) to Melbourne which has become highly popular with commuters.(Regional rail travel booming, despite delays from The Age)  The Rail Link project is underway to separate Ballarats trains from Melbournes suburban rail network for more regular services.(Regional rail link seen as Ballarat work boost from the Australian Broadcasting Commission. 6 April 2011) Interurban services (Ballarat-Melbourne) now run half hourly during weekday peak and hourly on weekends from Ballarat station. A twice daily (53 minute) service connects Ballarat to Ararat while there is a (57 minute) service to and from Maryborough (stopping at Creswick) once a day each way.(Polkinghorne, David Ballarat-Maryborough day trip a no go, The Courier, 6 Aug 2010)The Ballarat to Geelong (the railway line) currently operates as a freight line only (passenger services were withdrawn in 1978) and the city has several disused railway corridors and stations along the Skipton railway, Buninyong railway and the Ballarat Cattle Yards railway.Ballarat once operated an extensive tramway network which began in 1887, however it was closed in 1971 and replaced by buses. A small section of track remains used as a tourist and museum tramway.(Ballarat Tramway Museum. Btm.org.au. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)  There have been proposals to extend the network, particularly to connect it to the railways and return it as a viable component of the Ballarat public transport system.(Tram plans on track by Mariza Fiamengo for The Courier. 1 May 2001)AirAirport located  North-West of the CBD consists of two sealed runways (each approximately 1,400 m/4,600 ft length and 30 m/100 ft wide) as well as extensive sealed aprons, night lighting and NDB Navaid. In 2005 the City of Ballarat commissioned a Master Plan 20042014,( ) that outlined future development and growth of the Airport. The report made a series of recommendations and forecasts that included eventual lengthening, widening and strengthening of the existing main runway up to 1800 metres (5,900 ft), consideration for expansion of the passenger terminal and recommendations for future use of aprons and development of future structures supporting larger aircraft and increased frequent usage. It is forecast that by 201215 regular domestic passenger services using 4050 seat commuter aircraft may feasibly commence.CyclingBallarat has a long history of cycling as a form of transport and recreation. The current cycling network continues to grow and consists of several marked on-road routes and 50 kilometres of bicycle facilities including several main routes :Rail Trail, Yarrowee River Trail with connections to the Gong Reservoir, Buningyong Trail, Sebastopol Trail, and the Lake Wendouree shared path.(Microsoft Word  0002-1-Ballarat Bicycle Strategy.doc. (PDF) . Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)  The Ballarat Bicycle Users Group provides advocacy for the growing number of cyclists in the city.(Ballarat Bicycle Users Group. Balbug.net. Retrieved on 18 August 2011.)  The popularity of cycling in Ballarat is also demonstrated by the large number of spectators and participants drawn to cycling sporting events held in the city.(Cycling boon for Ballarat region David Brehaut for The Courier. 10 May 2010)Notable residentsA great many notable peoples origins are in the Ballarat region with the most prominent being high ranking politicians and sportspeople.Several former Minister of Australia were from Ballarat (recognised by the citys Prime Ministers Avenue)  Deakin, Sir Menzies, Scullin and Curtin. Several of the Australian states are also from Ballarat, including Victorian premiers Sir Bolte, Bracks, Gillies, Hollway and Western Australia premier Daglish.Outside of politics, other prominent public figures include Lalor, an important historical figure in Australia as the leader of the Eureka Rebellion (1854); the inventor Alfred Julius, who spent part of his childhood in the town when his father was a local Anglican cleric; and Cardinal Pell, the current Catholic Archbishop of Sydney.Ballarat has also produced many notable athletes including the Olympic long distance runner Moneghetti. A large number of notable Australian rules football identities have come from Ballarat, including Lockett, an AFL Legend player and record holder of the most goals scored in a career; premiership coaches Malthouse and Football Club legend Bob Davis. Melbourne forward Petrie is also from the town.ReferencesBibliographyHistory books* Bate, Weston. Lucky City: The First Generation of Ballarat 18511901 (1978)* Bate, Weston. Life After Gold: Twentieth-Century Ballarat Melbourne University Press (1993)* Carboni, Raffaello. The Eureka Stockade (1980) first published (1855)* Goodman, David. Gold Seeking: Victorian and California in the 1850s (1994)* Jacobs, Wendy. Ballarat: A Guide to Buildings and Areas 18511940 Jacob Lewis Vines Conservation Architects and Planners (1981)* Lynch, John. The Story of the Eureka Stockade: Epic Days in the early fifties at Ballarat, (1947?)* Flett, James. The History of Gold Discovery in Victoria* Moloney, John. Eureka, (1984)* Serle, Geoffrey. The Golden Age: A History of the Colony of Victoria, 18511860, (1963)* Freund, P with Sarah V, Her Maj: A History of Her Majestys Theatre, Ballarat (2007)* Ballarat City Council* Victorian Heritage Register, Heritage VictoriaExternal links* Ballarat City Council* Ballarat  Tourism Victoria  Government tourism site.bg:cy:Ballaratda:Ballaratde:Ballaratel:es:Ballaratfr:Ballaratga:Ballaratgl:Ballaratko:Victoriait:BallaratVictoriaka:lt:Balaratasnl:Ballaratja:no:Ballaratpnb:pl:Ballaratpt:Ballaratro:Ballaratru:Victoriasr:fi:Ballaratsv:Ballaratuk:()
5025
Brisbane_Broncos
 awayjersey  Brisbane Broncos away jersey 2010.svgThe Brisbane Broncos are an Australian professional league football club based in the city of Brisbane, the capital of the state of Queensland. Founded in 1988, the Broncos play in Australasias elite competition, the Rugby League (NRL) premiership. They have won six premierships and two Club Challenges. The Broncos have achieved four premierships during their 22 years in competition, making them the Leagues most successful club over the past two decades. Brisbane have never been defeated in a final, and between 1991 and 2009, never failed to qualify for the finals. In 2010, Brisbane finished 10th in the NRL premiership, failing to make the semi finals for the first time in 19 years. The club has the largest fan base in the NRL in Australia and has the highest average attendance of any rugby club in the world; 36,336 in the NRL season.(http://stats.rleague.com/rl/crowds/2009.html). They are also the most successful club in the history of Rugby League, having won 63% of their games since their induction in 1988.The club records the highest annual revenue of all NRL clubs and has been named one of Australias most popular and most watched football team.() The club was founded in 1988 as part of the Cups national expansion, becoming, along with the Gold Coast-Tweed Giants, one of Queenslands first two participants in the South Wales Rugby League premiership. The Broncos later became a dominant force in the competition before playing a significant role in the League War of the mid-1990s, then continuing to compete successfully in the reunified National Rugby League competition. The Broncos are based in the Brisbane suburb of Red Hill where their training ground and Leagues club are located, but they play their home games at Miltons Stadium. They are the only publicly listed sporting club on the Securities Exchange, trading as Brisbane Broncos Limited ().HistoryQueenslands success in the 1980s State of Origin, the representative fixture between Queensland and South Wales, in addition to the inclusion of a Combined Brisbane team in the mid-week competition, convinced the New South Wales Rugby League (NSWRL) to invite a Queensland-based team into the competition.( After tough competition between the various syndicates for the Brisbane license, the Rugby League chose the bid of former Rugby League (BRL) players, Maranta and Paul Porky Morgan.(Image:Darren Lockyer cropped.jpg|thumb|150px|left|Lockyer playing for the Broncos in 2004. Lockyer made his Broncos debut in 1995 and is the current captain of the team.The Broncos secured the services of Kangaroos captain and former Brisbane State High Student Lewis and former BRL coach Wayne Bennett.( The team made their debut in the NSWRLs Winfield Cup premiership against reigning premiers, the Sea Eagles, and defeated them 4410. However after this promising start they failed to make the finals. In their second season they won the mid-week knockout competition, the Panasonic Cup. The club first tasted premiership success in 1992, and again in 1993, defeating the George Dragons in both years.( isbn0-9775226-4-4)In 1995, the League War broke out.  After threats of expulsion from the NSWRL, the Broncos were one of the first clubs to sign with the new league and all players followed suit. Broncos CEO Ribot moved to take over the running of the rebel Super League, leading to a perception that the conflict was orchestrated by the club.()() Brisbane won the only Super League premiership in 1997, before winning the first National Rugby League trophy in the re-unified 1998 competition.(1999 was disappointing for the club with a terrible early-season form hindering their attempt at a third consecutive premiership losing 8 of their first 10 matches. Club legend Langer retired mid-season, perhaps as a result of the teams form. Despite the clubs mid-season turnaround, which resulted in qualification for the finals after an 11-match winning streak, the team was eliminated by the Sharks in the first week of the finals.  However, the Broncos rebounded in 2000 with their fifth premiership, defeating the Roosters. The game marked the retirement of veterans Walters and Michael Hancock.(Image:NRL Grand Final 2006.JPG|thumb|right|200px|The 2006 Grand final at Australia.Allan Langer returned to the club in 2002 for one season before eventually retiring. 2002 was also the beginning of Brisbanes post-Origin slump, which has haunted the club in the years since. Many players represent Queensland in the State of Origin series, with 7 Broncos players on average included in the Queensland Origin team.( ) This extra workload has caused a loss of form for the club immediately after the series, evidenced in 2003 when the ladder-leading Broncos lost 10 of their last 11 games.  Despite faring better in 2004 and 2005, the team still struggled in the latter stages of the season, losing all of their finals matches.(In 2006, after a strong early and mid-season performance, the Broncos again entered the post-Origin slump, losing 5 consecutive games. However, they reversed this run of form, winning 6 of their last 7 games including the premiership decider against the Storm and keeping their perfect Grand Final record intact.( After a dismal 2007 season in which they only scraped into the finals, coach Wayne Bennett announced he would leave at the end of 2008 after twenty-one years as coach.() Henjak, a former rugby league player who had been assistant coach with the Broncos since the beginning of 2006, was named their second-ever coach, commencing as coach for the 2009 season.() Their 2009 season included their worst-ever post-Origin slump, featuring three matches in a row where the opposing team scored more than 40 points, concluding with a 560 loss to Canberra on 1 August 2009. They rallied around and in their match against Penrith two rounds later, they won 5824. This snapback (after Penrith, they won the rest of their games that season) got them into the finals for the 18th year running, but they fell against Melbourne in the 3rd preliminary final by 4010.Their 2010 season started moderately: a 3024 win against North Queensland, a 1422 loss to Canberra, and a 4816 hammering by the Warriors on 28 March 2010. On Monday 29 March, former Broncos player and recruitment agent Allan Langer was caught drink-driving in Brisbanes northside.(The Courier-Mail, 30 March 2010 and various other sources.)Apart from a late season 106 win against eventual premiers St George Illawarra, the 2010 season was one to forget; with injuries and poor form seeing the Broncos out of the finals for the first time since 1991. The Broncos missing the finals now means that every club has missed the finals at least once since the 2002 season.In February 2011, it was announced Ivan Henjak was leaving the club, and Anthony Griffin would take over as coach for the 2011 Season.()Season summariesPlayers2011 Squadlegend1 InjuredImage:Brisbane Broncos vs Bulldogs 3.jpg|thumb|right|300px|The Brisbane Broncos in action in 2004 with Tallis about to receive the ball. Corey Parker is on the left.Notable players:For a full list of Broncos representatives, see of Brisbane Broncos representativesThe representative playing list of the Brisbane Broncos has traditionally been extensive due to the clubs premiership success and being the dominant Queensland team in the competition for the majority of its participation. Consequently, there have been a large number of Queensland Maroons in the team. In 2007, a 20 man legends team was announced to celebrate the clubs 20 year anniversary.()legend1 InjuredHonours*World Club Challenge: 2::  1992, 1997*Premiership: 6:: 1992, 1993, 1997, 1998, 2000, 2006*Minor Premiership: 4::  1992, 1997, 1998, 2000*Panasonic Cup: 1::  1989*Lotto Challenge Cup: 1::  1991*Tooheys Challenge: 1::  1995Statistics and recordsThe Brisbane Broncos are the most successful club in terms of percentage of total games won, having won 65.80% of their games. This is more than 5% better than the second-placed club.() In their twenty completed seasons, the club has made a total of six Grand Finals, winning each time, and have made the finals for the past sixteen seasons. They are one of only two clubs to have won the Club Challenge twice, and were the first club to do so on British soil. They also won the now defunct Panasonic Cup in 1989.(Current team captain Darren Lockyer holds the record for the most First Grade games for both the club and National League. Lockyer also holds the record for the most points scored for the club, tallying 1,171 since his debut in 1995, and the club record of 272 points in a season, having achieved this in 1998. Renouf holds the record for the most career tries for the club with 142. Renouf also shares the club record for the most number of tries in a season with Darren Smith at 23. Tuqiris tally of 26 points from three tries and seven goals in a single match against the Eagles remains the club record for most individual points in a game.( Corey Parker holds the record for most goals in a game kicking ten in a round one clash of 2008, breaking the previous mark of nine kicked by Lockyer in 1998 and matched by De Vere in 2001. Parker converted ten from ten goals in the Broncos 4812 win over the Panthers in which Parker scored 24 points placing him in equal second place on the most points in a match tally.() Six players have scored four tries in a match for the Brisbane Broncos including Renouf, Sailor, Hunt, Hodges, Kemp and Folau.(2006 Official Rugby League Annual. Edited by David Middleton, Published by News Magazines, Surrey Hills, Sydney) Renouf achieved this feat five times from 1991 to 1998.The clubs biggest winning margin is 65 points, achieved in 2007 in a 716 victory over the Knights.() Their heaviest defeat is a 560 loss by the Canberra Raiders on the 1 August 2009.()Stadiumthumb|250px|The Brisbane Broncos, at the then-ANZ Stadium (19932003).In their first five seasons, the Broncos played their matches at Park, the ground considered to be the home of rugby league in Queensland. However, following ongoing conflict with the Queensland Rugby League and Lang Park Trust, the team relocated to ANZ Stadium in 1993.( The clubs home match attendance, which had averaged 19,637 at Lang Park, increased to 43,200 at the new ground in the first season following the clubs premiership title in the previous season.( However, despite the teams second premiership in 1993, crowds gradually declined and it was not until 2002 that the club again registered more than the 1996 average attendance of 23,712.thumb|250px|left|View of the current Brisbane Broncos home ground, Suncorp Stadium.With the Queensland Governments $280,000,000 redevelopment of Lang Park,() the team moved back to the refurbished and renamed Suncorp Stadium upon its completion in mid-2003. The more centrally-located stadium has begun to attract larger crowds, with the 2006 average attendance of 31,208 being significantly higher than the Knights with 21,848 and about double the regular season competition average of 15,601.()The club record attendance for a regular season match is 58,593, set against the St. George Dragons in the final round of the 1993 season. The record attendance for a match at Suncorp Stadium is 50,255 set in the semi-final match of the 2008 season, against the George Illawarra Dragons.()Emblem and coloursthumb|150px|The clubs original logo, used from 1988 to 1999.It had originally been planned for the Brisbane Broncos to adopt a logo incorporating both a kangaroo and a stylised Q which had been featured in the logo for the Queensland Rugby League for many years. However, with the national rugby league team also known as the Kangaroos, this was deemed inappropriate and conflicting. The state flower the Orchid and the Poinsettia which had long been used by Brisbane representative teams in the Bulimba Cup and midweek knockout competitions was also ruled out, along with other Australian animals such as the brumby, possum, galah and the kookaburra, which was used on Brisbanes Kookaburra Queen paddleships.() Having wanted to continue with the use of alliteration for local sporting teams such as the Bullets and Bears, the clubs directors eventually decided on the nickname Broncos.()The original club logo was first featured in the Broncos inaugural season in the premiership in 1988 and was used until 1999. It used a mostly gold colour scheme, in line with the predominant colour on the team jerseys. In 2000, the club adopted a new logo with a more maroon design, which was much closer to the traditional colour associated with Queensland rugby league and Queensland sport in general.( This design continues to be used to date.Traditionally, the colours of the Brisbane Broncos have been maroon, white and gold, which have all long been linked to the history of rugby league in Queensland. Initially, the founders of the club favoured the official blue and gold colours of City Council. However, Sydney advertiser John Singleton advised the board that Queenslanders had been booing players wearing blue for more than three-quarters of a century.( As a result, the traditional maroon and white colours of Queensland along with gold, symbolising the Queensland sunshine,() were adopted as the clubs colours.In the inaugural 1988 season, the clubs jersey design featured the top third being gold, the middle being alternating hoops of maroon and white and the bottom third being maroon. Although this design featured gold strongly, it did not please everyone as the jersey had to differentiate from the maroon and white of Manly-Warringah Sea Eagles and the maroon of the State of Origin team.( Following a number of design changes in the 1990s including a predominantly white jersey from 1997 to 1998, blue was added to the jersey in 2001 as a minor colour to show the aforementioned historical link with the colours of Brisbane. However, this was later dropped from the design in favour of a mainly maroon jersey with gold trim.(At the 1995 League World Sevens tournament, the club introduced a new combination of jersey colours  mauve, aqua and white. Brisbane Broncos Marketing Manager Shane Edwards stated that it will become our Sevens strip... but we will never change the Broncos colours.(Bronco! Magazine Issue 1, 1995) In 2001, following the release of the clubs predominantly white with navy-blue and maroon away jersey, the National Rugby League ordered the club to produce a third jersey since the new away jersey clashed with the home jerseys of the Panthers, Melbourne Storm and Zealand Warriors. An aqua strip using the same design as the jerseys used from 1999 to 2001 was worn, which was much derided by the local media. Following two years of public pressure the club dropped the jersey in favour of the design worn against Newcastle in 2003.(Image:Brisbane Broncos home jersey 1988.svg|19881991Image:Brisbane Broncos home jersey 1992.svg|19921996Image:Brisbane Broncos home jersey 1997.svg|19971998Image:Brisbane Broncos home jersey 1999.svg|19992001Image:Brisbane Broncos home jersey 2002.svg|20022009Image:Brisbane Broncos home jersey 2010.svg|2010SupportersThe Brisbane broncos have the largest fan base of any NRL club(Press Release from Morgan Research) and they have been voted the most popular rugby league team in Australia for several years.() A Broncos supporters group called The Thoroughbreds which is made up of prominent businessmen, made an unsuccessful bid to purchase News Ltds controlling share of the club in 2007.()Notable fans*Border, Australian cricket captain( )*Symonds, international cricketer()*Stefanovic, television presenter()*Talbot, mining magnate( )*Rafter, tennis player()*Rudd, Former Australian Prime Minister()*Pearson, Olympic athlete( )*Irwin, TV personality and environmentalist()*Terry Price, professional golfer()*Stosur, professional tennis playerCorporateThe Broncos are the only publicly listed NRL club.(Masters, Roy Proposed model is not the answer for rugby league, 4 December 2009 brisbanetimes.com.au) The parent company of the Brisbane Broncos is Nationwide News Pty Ltd, a subsidiary of Limited, which as of 30 June 2007, owns 68.87% of Broncos shares.( )Ribot, a former first grade rugby league player in Queensland and New South Wales, was the clubs original chief executive officer (CEO). Ribot left when he signed to become the CEO of the rebel Australian rugby league competition Super League. (p. 24,112) Shane Edwards, the Broncos Marketing Manager at the time, was promoted to CEO and later resigned. Bruno Cullen, who had been with the Broncos off-field staff since 1989, became the clubs third CEO in 2003.(NRMA Insurance are the major sponsors of the Broncos as of 2011, replacing Sight & Sound. 106.9 are the main radio sponsors after taking over from rival station FM in late 2006. Live broadcasts of all Broncos matches are provided by ABC Brisbane except if they play on Monday night, in which case 4MMM do so. Channel Nine Queensland also sponsors the Broncos, although former player Webcke is signed to rival Seven Queensland.FootnotesExternal linksOfficial Sites*Broncos Official Web Page*Broncos Leagues ClubStatistics & Information Sites*Rugby League Tables*RL1908 Broncos History*Broncos fan siteBroncos RLFCBroncosBroncosBroncosBroncosBroncos
5192
Geography_of_Canada
{| border1 alignright cellpadding4 cellspacing0 width300 stylemargin: 0.5em 0 1em 1em; background: #f9f9f9; border: 1px #aaaaaa solid; border-collapse: collapse; font-size: 95%;|+Canada|-| stylebackground:#efefef; text-align:center; colspan2||-| Continent || America|-| Subregion || America|-| coordinates || |-| Area - Total  - Water| Ranked 2nd  (8.92%)|-| Coastline || |-| Land boundaries || |-| Countries bordered || US |-| Maritime claims || |-| Highest point || Logan, |-| Lowest point || Ocean, 0 m|-| Longest river || River, |-| Largest inland body of water || Bear Lake |-| Land Use - Arable land - Permanent   crops - Permanent   pastures - Forests and   woodlands - Other ||5%0%3%54%38% (1993 est.)|-| Climate: || temperate in south to subarctic or arctic in north|-| Terrain: || mostly plains with mountains in west and lowlands in southeast|-| Natural resources || iron ore, nickel, zinc, copper, gold, lead, molybdenum, potash, diamonds, silver, fish, timber, wildlife, coal, petroleum, gas, hydropower|-| Natural hazards || permafrost, storms, tornadoes, fires|-| Environmental issues || air and pollution, rains|-|Portal || Geography of Canada|}The geography of Canada is vast and diverse. Occupying most of the northern portion of America (41% of the continent), Canada is the worlds second largest country in total area.Canada spans an immense territory between the Ocean to the west and the Ocean to the east and the Ocean to the north (hence the countrys motto From sea to sea), with the States to the south (United States) and northwest (Alaska), and the Ocean to the north; Greenland is to the northeast. Off the southern coast of Newfoundland lies and Miquelon, an overseas collectivity of France. Since 1925, Canada has claimed the portion of the Arctic between 60W and 141W longitude to the Pole; however, this claim is contested.()Covering  (Land: ; Water: ), Canada is slightly less than three-fifths as large as Russia, nearly 1.2 times larger than Australia, slightly larger than Europe, and more than 40 times larger than the UK. In total area, Canada is slightly larger than both the U.S. and China; however, Canada ranks fourth in land area (i.e., total area minus the area of lakes and rivers)China is  and the U.S. is ()The northernmost settlement in Canada (and in the world) is Canadian Forces Station (CFS) Alert (just north of Nunavut) on the northern tip of Islandlatitude 82.5Njust  from the North Pole.The magnetic North Pole lies within the Canadian Arctic territorial claim; however, recent measurements indicate it is moving towards Siberia.()Physical geographythumb|280px|left|A satellite composite image of Canada. Boreal forests prevail throughout the country, including the Arctic, the Coast Mountains and Saint Elias Mountains. The relatively flat Prairies facilitate agriculture. The Great Lakes feed the St. Lawrence River (in the southeast) where lowlands host much of Canadas population.Canada covers 9,984,670 km2 (3,855,103 sq. mi) and a panoply of various geoclimatic regions. Canada also encompasses vast maritime terrain, with the worlds longest coastline of . The geography of Canada is widely varied. Boreal forests prevail throughout the country, ice is prominent in northerly Arctic regions and through the Mountains, and the relatively flat Prairies in the southwest facilitate productive agriculture. The Lakes feed the Lawrence River (in the southeast) where lowlands host much of Canadas population.Appalachian MountainsThe Appalachian mountain range extends from Georgia in the United States through the Peninsula and the Provinces, creating rolling hills indented by river valleys. It also runs through parts of southern Quebec.The Appalachian mountains (more specifically the Notre Dame and Range Mountains) are an old and eroded range of mountains, approximately 380 million years in age. Notable mountains in the Appalachians include Jacques-Cartier (Quebec,  and Carleton (New Brunswick, ). Parts of the Appalachians are home to a rich endemic flora and fauna and are considered to have been nunataks during the last glaciation era.Great Lakes and St. Lawrence LowlandsImage:Niagara Falls and Maid of the Mist 2005.JPG|thumb|right|The Horseshoe Falls in Falls, Ontario, one of the worlds most voluminous waterfalls,() a major source of hydroelectric power, and a tourist destination.thumb|left|The Great Lakes from spaceThe southern parts of Quebec and Ontario, in the section of the Lakes (bordered entirely by Ontario on the Canadian side) and St. Lawrence basin (often called Lawrence Lowlands), is another particularly rich sedimentary plain. Prior to its colonization and heavy sprawl of the 20th century, this Great Lakes lowland forests area was home to large forests covering a mostly flat area of land between the Mountains and the Shield. Most of this forest has been cut down through agriculture and logging operations, but the remaining forests are for the most part heavily protected. (see Great Lakes lowland forests). In this part of Canada the of St. Lawrence is the worlds largest estuary (see of St. Lawrence lowland forests).While the relief of these lowlands is particularly flat and regular, a group of batholites known as the Hills are spread along a mostly regular line across the area. The most notable are Montreals Royal and Saint-Hilaire. These hills are known for a great richness in precious minerals.Canadian ShieldThe northern parts of Saskatchewan, Manitoba, Ontario, and Quebec, as well as most of Labrador, the mainland portions of the province of and Labrador, are located on a vast rock base known as the Shield. The Shield mostly consists of eroded hilly terrain and contains many lakes and important rivers used for hydroelectric production, particularly in northern Quebec and Ontario. The shield also encloses an area of wetlands, the Bay lowlands. Some particular regions of the Shield are referred to as ranges, including the Torngat and Mountains.The Shield cannot support intensive agriculture, although there is subsistence agriculture and small dairy farms in many of the river valleys and around the abundant lakes, particularly in the southern regions. forest covers much of the shield, with a mix of conifers that provide valuable timber resources in areas such as the Canadian Shield forests ecoregion that covers much of Ontario. The region is known for its extensive mineral reserves.The Canadian Shield is known for its vast minerals, such as emeralds, diamonds and copper. The Canadian shield is also called the mineral house.Canadian Interior PlainsThe Prairies are part of a vast sedimentary plain covering much of Alberta, southern Saskatchewan, and southwestern Manitoba, as well as much of the region between the Mountains and the Great Slave and Great Bear lakes in Territories. The plains generally describes the expanses of (largely flat) arable agricultural land which sustain extensive grain farming operations in the southern part of the provinces. Despite this, some areas such as the Cypress Hills and Badlands are quite hilly and the prairie provinces (Alberta, Saskatchewan and Manitoba) contain large areas of forest such as the Canadian forestsWestern CordilleraThe Cordillera, attached to the cordillera, stretches from the Rocky Mountains in the east to the Ocean.The Rockies are part of a major divide that extends north and south through western North America and western America. The Columbia and the Rivers have their headwaters in the Canadian Rockies and are the second and third largest rivers respectively to drain to the west coast of North America.Image:Vancouverpalms.jpg|right|thumb|250px|Vancouver has a mild enough climate to support several species of palm trees.Immediately west of the mountains is a large interior plateau encompassing the Chilcotin and Cariboo regions in central Columbia (the Fraser Plateau) and the Plateau further north. The Peace River Valley in northeastern British Columbia is Canadas most northerly agricultural region, although it is part of the prairies. The dry, temperate climate of the Okanagan Valley in south central British Columbia provides ideal conditions for fruit growing and a flourishing wine industry. Between the plateau and the coast is a second mountain range, the Mountains. The Coast Mountains contain some of the largest temperate-latitude icefields in the world.On the south coast of British Columbia, Island is separated from the mainland by the continuous Juan de Fuca, Georgia, and Johnstone straits. Those straits include a large number of islands, notably the Islands. North, near the Alaskan border, Gwaii lies across Strait from the Bella Coola region. Other than in the plateau regions of the interior and the river valleys, most of British Columbia is coniferous forest. The only rain forests in Canada are found along the Pacific coast in the Coast Mountains, on Vancouver Island, and on Haida Gwaii.VolcanoesImage:Mount Garibaldi.jpg|left|thumb|250px|Garibaldi as seen from Squamish Canada has many volcanoes and is part of the system of volcanoes found around the margins of the Ocean, which is called the Ring of Fire. There are over 200 young volcanic centres that stretch northward from the Range to the Territory. They are grouped into five belts with different volcano types and tectonic settings. The Cordilleran Volcanic Province was formed by faulting, cracking, rifting, and the interaction between the Plate and the American plate. The Volcanic Belt was formed by subduction of the de Fuca Plate beneath the North American Plate. The Volcanic Belt was formed as a result of the North American Plate sliding westward over the hotspot. The Group is believed to have formed as a result of back-arc extension behind the subduction zone. The Volcanic Field formed as a result of subduction of the Plate beneath the North American Plate at the easternmost end of the Trench.Volcanism has also occurred in the Shield. It contains over 150 belts (now deformed and eroded down to nearly flat plains) that range from 600 million to 2.8 billion years old. Many of Canadas major ore deposits are associated with Precambrian volcanoes. There are lavas in the Territories that are about 2.6 billion years old and are preserved in the River Volcanic Belt. The pillow lavas in rocks over 2 billion years old in the Canadian Shield signify that great oceanic volcanoes existed during the early stages of the formation of the Earths crust. Ancient volcanoes play an important role in estimating Canadas mineral potential. Many of the volcanic belts bear ore deposits that are related to the volcanism.Canadian ArcticWhile the largest part of the Canadian Arctic is composed of seemingly endless permanent ice and tundra north of the line, it encompasses geological regions of varying types: the Cordillera (with the Empire Range and the States Range on Island) contains the northernmost mountain system in the world. The Lowlands and Hudson Bay lowlands comprise a substantial part of the geographic region often designated as the Canadian Shield (in contrast to the sole geologic area). The ground in the Arctic is mostly composed of permafrost, making construction difficult and often hazardous, and agriculture virtually impossible.The Arctic, when defined as everything north of the tree line, covers most of Nunavut and the northernmost parts of Northwest Territories, Yukon, Manitoba, Ontario, Quebec, and Labrador.HydrographyCanada holds vast reserves of water: its rivers discharge nearly 9% of the worlds renewable water supply,() it contains a quarter of the worlds wetlands, and it has the third largest amount of glaciers (after Antarctica and Greenland). Because of extensive glaciation, Canada hosts more than two million lakes: of those that are entirely within Canada, more than 31,000 are between  in area, while 563 are larger than .()RiversCanadas two greatest rivers are the St. Lawrence, which drains the Great Lakes and empties into the Gulf of St. Lawrence, and the Mackenzie, which empties into the Arctic Ocean and drains a large part of northwestern Canada. While the St. Lawrence is the largest river in Canada in volume of water discharged at its mouth, the Mackenzie is the longest. Through its tributary, the Peace River, and tracing to its source in the Finlay River of British Columbia, the Mackenzie is 4,241 km (2,635 mi) long and is one of the longest rivers in the world. The St. Lawrence and the Mackenzie are the second and third largest rivers by volume of discharge, respectively, in North America.Drainage basinsThe Atlantic watershed drains the entirety of the provinces (parts of the Quebec-Labrador boundary are fixed at the Atlantic divide), most of inhabited Quebec and large parts of southern Ontario. It is mostly drained by the economically important St. Lawrence River and its tributaries, notably the Saguenay, Manicouagan and Ottawa rivers. The Great Lakes and Nipigon are also drained by the St. Lawrence. The Churchill River and St. John River are other important elements of the Atlantic watershed in Canada.The Hudson Bay watershed drains over a third of Canada. It covers Manitoba, northern Ontario and Quebec, most of Saskatchewan, southern Alberta, southwestern Nunavut and the southern half of Island. This basin is most important in fighting drought in the prairies and producing hydroelectricity, especially in Manitoba, northern Ontario and Quebec. Major elements of this watershed include Winnipeg, River, the North Saskatchewan and Saskatchewan Rivers, River, and Lake on Baffin Island. Lake lies on the boundary between the Hudson Bay and Arctic Ocean watersheds and drains into both. It is the largest lake in the world that naturally drains in two directions.The Continental Divide in the Rockies separates the Pacific watershed in British Columbia and the Yukon from the Arctic and Hudson Bay watersheds. This watershed irrigates the agriculturally important areas of inner British Columbia (such as the Okanagan and Kootenay valleys), and is used to produce hydroelectricity. Major elements are the Yukon, Columbia and Rivers.The northern parts of Alberta, Manitoba and British Columbia, most of Northwest Territories and Nunavut, and parts of the Yukon are drained by the Arctic watershed. This watershed has been little used for hydroelectricity, with the exception of the River, the longest river in Canada. The Peace, Athabasca and Rivers, as well as Great Bear Lake and Great Slave Lake (respectively the largest and second largest lakes wholly enclosed by Canada) are significant elements of the Arctic watershed. Each of these elements eventually merges with the Mackenzie, thereby draining the vast majority of the Arctic watershed.The southernmost part of Alberta drains into the Gulf of Mexico through the Milk River and its tributaries. The Milk River originates in the Rocky Mountains of Montana, then flows into Alberta, then returns into the States, where it is drained by the River. A small area of southwestern Saskatchewan is drained by Battle Creek, which empties into the Milk River.Floristic geographyImage:portneuf.jpg|thumb|250px|right|forest landscape in Rserve Faunique de Portneuf, QuebecCanada has produced a Action Plan in response to the 1992 international accord; the plan addresses conservation of species and certain habitats. The main biomes of Canada are:* Tundra* forest* forest* forest* Prairies* Mountains, vegetation includes various types of tundra and forests* coniferous forests, of which the rain forests of coastal British Columbia is an example.Political geographyCanada is divided into ten provinces and three territories. According to Canada, 72.0% of the population is concentrated within  of the nations southern border with the United States, 70.0% live south of the 49th parallel, and over 60% of the population lives along the Great Lakes and St. Lawrence River between Ontario and City. This leaves the vast majority of Canadas territory as sparsely populated wilderness; Canadas population density is 3.5 people/km2 (9.1/mi2), among the lowest in the world. Despite this, 79.7% of Canadas population resides in urban areas, where population densities are increasing.Canada shares with the U.S. the worlds longest undefended border at ;  are with Alaska. The Danish island dependency of Greenland lies to Canadas northeast, separated from the Arctic islands by Bay and Strait. The French islands of and Miquelon lie off the southern coast of Newfoundland in the of St. Lawrence and have a maritime territorial enclave within Canadas Economic Zone. Canada also shares a land border with Denmark, as maps released in December 2006 show that the agreed upon boundaries run through the middle of Island.()Canadas geographic proximity to the United States has historically bound the two countries together in the political world as well. Canadas position between the Union (now Russia) and the U.S. was strategically important during the War since the route over the North Pole and Canada was the fastest route by air between the two countries and the most direct route for ballistic missiles.  Since the end of the Cold War, there has been growing speculation that Canadas Arctic maritime claims may become increasingly important if warming melts the ice enough to open the Passage.Similarly, the disputedand tinyIsland (with Denmark), in the Strait between Island and northern Greenland, may be a flashpoint for challenges to overall claims of Canadian sovereignty in The North.Natural resourcesCanadas abundance of resources is reflected in their continued importance in the of Canada. Major resource-based industries are fisheries, forestry, agriculture, petroleum products and mining.The fisheries industry has historically been one of Canadas strongest. Unmatched cod stocks on the Banks off Newfoundland launched this industry in the 16th century. Today these stocks are nearly depleted, and their conservation has become a preoccupation of the Provinces. On the West Coast, tuna stocks are now restricted. The less depleted (but still greatly diminished) salmon population continues to drive a strong fisheries industry. Canada claims  of territorial sea, a contiguous zone of , an economic zone of  and a continental shelf of  or to the edge of the continental margin.Forestry has long been a major industry in Canada. Forest products contribute one fifth of the nations exports. The provinces with the largest forestry industries are British Columbia, Ontario and Quebec. Fifty-four percent of Canadas land area is covered in forest. The boreal forests account for four-fifths of Canadas forestland.Image:Grain Elevator 047.jpg|thumb|right|280px|Albertan elevatorsFive per cent of Canadas land area is arable, none of which is for permanent crops. Three per cent of Canadas land area is covered by permanent pastures. Canada has 7,200 square kilometres (2,800 mi2) of irrigated land (1993 estimate). Agricultural regions in Canada include the Canadian Prairies, the Mainland and interior plateau of British Columbia, the Lawrence Basin and the Canadian Maritimes. Main crops in Canada include flax, oats, wheat, maize, barley, beets and rye in the prairies; flax and maize in Ontario; Oats and potatoes in the Maritimes. Fruit and vegetables are grown primarily in the Valley of Nova Scotia, Ontario, the Horseshoe region of Ontario, along the south coast of Bay and in the Okanagan Valley of British Columbia. Cattle and sheep are raised in the valleys of British Columbia. Cattle, sheep and hogs are raised on the prairies, cattle and hogs in Western Ontario, sheep and hogs in Quebec, and sheep in the Maritimes. There are significant dairy regions in central Nova Scotia, southern New Brunswick, the St. Lawrence Valley, Ontario, southwestern Ontario, the Red River valley of Manitoba and the valleys of eastern British Columbia, on Island and the mainland.Fossil fuels are a more recently developed resource in Canada, with oil and gas being extracted from deposits in the Canadian Sedimentary Basin since the mid 1900s. While Canadas oil deposits are fewer, technological developments in recent decades have opened up oil production in Albertas Sands to the point where Canada now has some of the largest reserves of oil in the world. In other forms, Canadian industry has long exploited large coal and gas reserves.Canadas mineral resources are diverse and extensive. Across the Canadian Shield and in the north there are large iron, nickel, zinc, copper, gold, lead, molybdenum, and uranium reserves. Large diamond concentrations have been recently developed in the Arctic, making Canada one of the worlds largest producers. Throughout the Shield there are many mining towns extracting these minerals. The largest, and best known, is Sudbury, Ontario. Sudbury is an exception to the normal process of forming minerals in the Shield since there is significant evidence that the Basin is an ancient meteorite crater. The nearby, but less known Magnetic Anomaly has striking similarities to the Sudbury Basin. Its magnetic anomalies are very similar to the Sudbury Basin, and so it could be a second metal-rich impact crater.(3-D Magnetic Imaging using Conjugate Gradients: Temagami anomaly Retrieved on 2008-03-13) The Shield is also covered by vast boreal forests that support an important logging industry.Canadas many rivers have afforded extensive development of hydroelectric power. Extensively developed in British Columbia, Ontario, Quebec and Labrador, the many dams have long provided a clean, dependable source of energy.Natural hazardsContinuous permafrost in the north is a serious obstacle to development. Cyclonic storms form east of the Rocky mountains, a result of the mixing of air masses from the Arctic, Pacific, and North American interior, and produce most of the countrys rain and snowCurrent environmental issuesAir pollution and resulting rain severely affects lakes and damages forests. Metal smelting, coal-burning utilities, and vehicle emissions impact agricultural and forest productivity. And ocean waters are becoming contaminated from agricultural, industrial, mining, and forestry activities.Global change and the warming of the polar region will likely cause significant changes to the environment, including loss of the bear,() the exploration for resource then the extraction of these resources and an alternative transport route to the Canal through the Passage.Extreme pointsthumb|right|280px|Topographic mapThe northernmost point within the boundaries of Canada is Columbia, Island, Nunavut (8308 N, 7413W). The Pole at 90N is the northernmost water point. The northernmost point of the Canadian mainland is Promontory on Peninsula, Nunavut (7158N).The southernmost point is Middle Island, in Erie, Ontario (4141N, 8240W); the southernmost water point lies just south of the island, on the Ontario-Ohio border (414035N). The southernmost point of the Canadian mainland is Point Pelee, Ontario (415423N).The westernmost point is Peak 187 (141007.128W) at the southern end of the Yukon-Alaska border which is roughly following 141W but leans very slightly east as it goes North.()The easternmost point is Spear, Newfoundland (4731N, 5237W). The easternmost point of the Canadian mainland is St. Charles, Labrador (5213N, 5537W)The lowest point is level at 0 m, whilst the highest point is Logan at 5,959 m / 19,550 ft.The Canadian of inaccessibility is River, Alberta (Latitude: 592 60 N, Longitude: 11249 60 W).See alsoGeography by province*of Canada*Geographic*Rockies*communities of Canada*of areas disputed by the United States and Canada*of highest points of Canadian provinces and territories*peaks of Canada* in CanadaReferencesFurther reading***Drushka, Ken (2003), Canadas forests: a history, McGill-Queens University Press, ISBN 0773526609* * * * * External links*Government of Canada - The Atlas of Canada*Canadian Geographic - The Canadian Atlas Online list1   Kanadasde Canadgeografiadu Canadadi Kanadadel Canadageografijafldrajzavan CanadageografiKanadydo CanadCanadeimaantiedecorafyaszh:
5195
Economy_of_Canada
spelling             Canada has the ninth largest economy in the world() (measured in US dollars at market exchange rates), is one of the worlds wealthiest nations, and is a member of the for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) and Group of Eight (G8). As with other developed nations, the Canadian economy is dominated by the service industry, which employs about three quarters of Canadians.() Canada is unusual among developed countries in the importance of the primary sector, with the logging and oil industries being two of Canadas most important. Canada also has a sizable manufacturing sector, centered in Canada, with the automobile industry especially important.Basic informationCanada has one of the highest levels of economic freedom in the world. Today Canada closely resembles the U.S. in its market-oriented economic system, and pattern of production.() As of August 2011, Canadas national unemployment rate stood at 7.2%,() as the economy continues its recovery from the effects of the 2007-2010 global financial crisis. In May 2010, provincial unemployment rates varied from a low of 5.0% in Saskatchewan to a high of 13.8% in and Labrador.() According to the Forbes Global 2000 list of the worlds largest companies in 2008, Canada had 69 companies in the list, ranking 5th next to France.() As of 2008, Canadas total debt burden is the lowest in the G8.trade makes up a large part of the Canadian economy, particularly of its natural resources. In 2009, agricultural, energy, forestry and mining exports accounted for about 58% of Canadas total exports.() Machinery, equipment, automotive products and other manufactures accounted for a further 38% of exports in 2009.( In 2009, exports accounted for approximately 30% of Canadas GDP. The United States is by far its largest trading partner, accounting for about 73% of exports and 63% of imports as of 2009.() Canadas combined exports and imports ranked 8th among all nations in 2006.(2006 exports/imports)Canada has considerable natural resources spread across its varied regions. As an example, in Columbia the forestry industry is of great importance, while the oil and gas industry is important in Alberta, Saskatchewan and and Labrador. Ontario is home to a wide array of mines, while the fishing industry has long been central to the character of the provinces, though it has recently been in steep decline. Canada has mineral resources of coal, copper, iron ore, and gold.These primary industries are increasingly becoming less important to the overall economy. Only some 4% of Canadians are employed in these fields, and they account for 6.2% of GDP.() They are still paramount in many parts of the country. Many, if not most, towns in northern Canada, where agriculture is difficult, exist because of a nearby mine or source of timber. Canada is a world leader in the production of many natural resources such as gold, nickel, uranium, diamonds and lead. Several of Canadas largest companies are based in natural resource industries, such as EnCana, Cameco, Goldcorp, and Gold. The vast majority of these products are exported, mainly to the United States. There are also many secondary and service industries that are directly linked to primary ones. For instance one of Canadas largest manufacturing industries is the and paper sector, which is directly linked to the logging industry.The large reliance on natural resources has several effects on the Canadian economy and Canadian society. While manufacturing and service industries are easy to standardize, natural resources vary greatly by region. This ensures that differing economic structures developed in each region of Canada, contributing to Canadas strong regionalism. At the same time the vast majority of these resources are exported, integrating Canada closely into the international economy. Howlett and Ramesh argue that the inherent instability of such industries also contributes to greater government intervention in the economy, to reduce the social impact of market changes.(Howlett, Michael and M. Ramesh. Political Economy of Canada: An Introduction. Toronto: McClelland and Stewart, 1992.)Such industries also raise important questions of sustainability. Despite many decades as a leading producer, there is little risk of depletion. Large discoveries continue to be made, such as the massive nickel find at Bay. Moreover the far north remains largely undeveloped as producers await higher prices or new technologies as many operations in this region are not yet cost effective. In recent decades Canadians have become less willing to accept the environmental destruction associated with exploiting natural resources. High wages and Aboriginal land claims have also curbed expansion. Instead many Canadian companies have focused their exploration and expansion activities overseas where prices are lower and governments more accommodating. Canadian companies are increasingly playing important roles in Latin America, Southeast Asia, and Africa.The exploitation of renewable resources have raised concerns in recent years. After decades of escalating overexploitation the cod fishery all but collapsed in the 1990s, and the Pacific salmon industry also suffered greatly. The logging industry, after many years of activism, has in recent years moved to a more sustainable model. Key industries Service sectorImage:TD Centre View from Yonge and King.JPG|thumb|left|200px|The Centre in TorontoThe service sector in Canada is vast and multifaceted, employing some three quarters of Canadians and accounting for 78% of GDP.() The largest employer is the retail sector, employing almost 12% of Canadians.(Wallace, Iain, A Geography of the Canadian Economy. Don Mills: Oxford University Press, 2002.) The retail industry is mainly concentrated in a small number of chain stores clustered together in malls. In recent years, there has been an increase in the number of stores, such as Wal-Mart (of the United States) and Shop (a subsidiary of the US based Buy) and Zellers (since most of their leases have been purchased by Target). This has led to fewer workers in this sector and a migration of retail jobs to the suburbs.The second largest portion of the service sector is the business services, employing only a slightly smaller percentage of the population. This includes the services, estate, and communications industries. This portion of the economy has been rapidly growing in recent years. It is largely concentrated in the major urban centres, especially Toronto, Montreal and Vancouver (see in Canada).The education and health sectors are two of Canadas largest, but both are largely under the purview of the government. The health care industry has been quickly growing, and is the third largest in Canada. Its rapid growth has led to problems for governments who must find money to fund it.Canada has an important tech industry, and also an entertainment industry creating content both for local and international consumption . Tourism is of ever increasing importance, with the vast majority of international visitors coming from the United States. Though the recent strength of the Canadian Dollar has hurt this sector, other nations such as China have increased tourism to Canada.ManufacturingFile:lufthansa cityline crj900lr d-acke takeoff london heathrow arp.jpg|thumb|right|CityLine the Bombardier CRJ family of aircraft are produced in Canada. (2010)The general pattern of development for wealthy nations was a transition from a primary industry based economy to a manufacturing based one, and then to a service based economy. Canada did not escape this pattern - at its (abnormally high World War 2) peak in 1944, manufacturing accounted for 29% of GDP,() declining to 15.6% in 2005. Canada has not suffered as greatly as most other rich, industrialized nations from the pains of the relative decline in the importance of manufacturing since the 1960s.() A 2009 study by Canada also found that, while manufacturing declined as a relative percentage of GDP from 24.3% in the 1960s to 15.6% in 2005, manufacturing volumes between 1961 and 2005 kept pace with the overall growth in the volume index of GDP.() Manufacturing in Canada was especially hard hit by the 2007-2010 global financial crisis. As of 2010, manufacturing accounts for 13% of Canadas GDP,( a relative decline of more than 2% of GDP since 2005.Central Canada is home to plants to all the major American and Japanese automobile makers and many parts factories owned by Canadian firms such as International and Linamar Corporation. Central Canada today produces more vehicles each year than the neighbouring U.S. state of Michigan, the heart of the American automobile industry. Manufacturers have been attracted to Canada due to the highly educated population with lower labour costs than the United States. Canadas funded health care system is also an important attraction, as it exempts companies from the high health insurance costs they must pay in the United States.Much of the Canadian manufacturing industry consists of branch plants of United States firms, though there are some important domestic manufacturers, such as Inc.. This has raised several concerns for Canadians. Branch plants provide mainly blue collar jobs, with research and executive positions confined to the United States.EnergyImage:Oil well3419.jpg|thumb|left|200px|donkey pumping an oil well near OntarioCanada is one of the few developed nations that is a net exporter of energy - in 2009 net exports of energy products amounted to 2.9% of GDP. Most important are the large oil and gas resources centred in Alberta and the Northern Territories, but also present in neighbouring Columbia and Saskatchewan. The vast Oil Sands give Canada the worlds second largest reserves of oil after Saudi Arabia according to USGS. In British Columbia and Quebec, as well as Ontario, Saskatchewan, Manitoba and the Labrador region, hydroelectric power is an inexpensive and relatively environmentally friendly source of abundant energy. In part because of this, Canada is also one of the worlds highest per capita consumers of energy.(Environment Canada - Energy Consumption)() Cheap energy has enabled the creation of several important industries, such as the large aluminum industry in British Columbia.Historically, an important issue in Canadian politics is the interplay between the oil and energy industry in Canada and the industrial heartland of Southern Ontario. Foreign investment in Western oil projects has fueled Canadas rising dollar. This has raised the price of Ontarios manufacturing exports and made them less competitive, a problem similar to the decline of the manufacturing sector in Holland.()() Also, Ontario has relatively fewer native sources of power. However, it is cheaper for Alberta to ship its oil to the western United States than to eastern Canada. The eastern Canadian ports thus import significant quantities of oil from overseas, and Ontario makes significant use of nuclear power.In times of high oil prices this has meant that the majority of Canadas population benefits, while the West works hard. The Energy Policy of the early 1980s attempted to force Alberta to sell low priced oil to eastern Canada. This policy proved deeply divisive, and quickly lost its importance as oil prices collapsed in the mid-1980s. One of the most controversial sections of the States Free Trade Agreement of 1988 was a promise that Canada would never charge the United States more for energy than fellow Canadians.Agricultureleft|thumb|200px|A grain elevator in AlbertaCanada is also one of the worlds largest suppliers of agricultural products, particularly of wheat and other grains.() Canada is a major exporter of agricultural products, to the United States but also to Europe and East Asia. As with all other developed nations the proportion of the population and GDP devoted to agriculture fell dramatically over the 20th century.As with other developed nations, the Canadian agriculture industry receives significant government subsidies and supports. However, Canada has been a strong supporter of reducing market influencing subsidies through the Trade Organization. In 2000, Canada spent approximately CDN$4.6 billion on supports for the industry. Of this, $2.32 billion was classified under the WTO designation of green box support, meaning it did not directly influence the market, such as money for research or disaster relief. All but $848.2 million were subsidies worth less than 5% of the value of the crops they were provided for, which is the WTO threshold. Consequently, Canada used only $848.2 million of its $4.3 billion subsidy allowance granted by the WTO.()Political issuesRegional imbalancesThe Canadian economy differs greatly from region to region.  Traditionally Central Canada has been the economic engine of Canada, home to more than half of its population and much of its industry. Recent years have seen rapid growth in Western Canada as trade with Asia has enriched British Columbia and oil wealth provided a major boost to Alberta and Saskatchewan.The four Atlantic provinces, though once the centre of economic activity, underwent a major decline in the late 19th century and have traditionally been significantly poorer than the rest of Canada, especially after the recent collapse of the fishing industry. Recent years have seen some significant moves towards diversification, especially as offshore oil and gas wealth have begun to flow into the region. Quebec has also traditionally been poorer than the Canadian average although by a lesser margin than the Atlantic provinces. In more recent years and Labrador have started to see a change in their economy, being called the Celtic tiger of Canada, (in a comparison to the economic transformation in Ireland); it has also been called a mini Alberta because of new oil and gas exploration. While many Newfoundlanders and Labradorians still emigrate to Alberta for higher-paying jobs, the provinces population has been on the rise in recent years with many people deciding to move back home.Relations with the U.S.Canada and the United States share a common trading relationship. Canadas job market continues to perform well along with the US, reaching a 30 year low in the unemployment rate in December 2006, following 14 consecutive years of employment growth.()thumb|Flags of Canada and the United StatesThe United States is by far Canadas largest trading partner, with more than $1.7 billion CAD in trade per day in 2005. In 2009 73% of Canadas exports went to the United States, and 63% of Canadas imports were from the United States.() Trade with Canada makes up 23% of the United States exports and 17% of its imports.()  By comparison, in 2005 this was more than U.S. trade with all countries in the Union combined,() and well over twice U.S. trade with all the countries of America combined.()  Just the two-way trade that crosses the Bridge between Michigan and Ontario equals all U.S. exports to Japan. Canadas importance to the United States is not just a border-state phenomenon: Canada is the leading export market for 35 of 50 U.S. states, and is the United States largest foreign supplier of energy.Bilateral trade increased by 52% between 1989, when the U.S.-Canada Free Trade Agreement (FTA) went into effect, and 1994, when the American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) superseded it. Trade has since increased by 40%. NAFTA continues the FTAs moves toward reducing trade barriers and establishing agreed-upon trade rules. It also resolves some long-standing bilateral irritants and liberalizes rules in several areas, including agriculture, services, energy, financial services, investment, and government procurement. NAFTA forms the largest trading area in the world, embracing the 405 million people of the three North American countries.The largest component of U.S.-Canada trade is in the commodity sector.The U.S. is Canadas largest agricultural export market, taking well over half of all Canadian food exports.(Agriculture and Agri-Food Canada / Agriculture et Agroalimentaire Canada) Similarly, Canada is the largest market for U.S. agricultural goods, with nearly 20% of American food exports going to its northern neighbour. Nearly two-thirds of Canadas forest products, including pulp and paper, are exported to the United States; 72% of Canadas total newsprint production also is exported to the U.S.At $73.6 billion in 2004, U.S.-Canada trade in energy is the largest U.S. energy trading relationship, with the overwhelming majority ($66.7 billion) being exports from Canada. The primary components of U.S. energy trade with Canada are petroleum, gas, and electricity. Canada is the United States largest oil supplier and the fifth-largest energy producing country in the world. Canada provides about 16% of U.S. oil imports and 14% of total U.S. consumption of natural gas. The United States and Canadas national electricity grids are linked, and both countries share hydropower facilities on the western borders.While most of U.S.-Canada trade flows smoothly, there are occasionally bilateral trade disputes, particularly in the agricultural and cultural fields. Usually these issues are resolved through bilateral consultative forums or referral to Trade Organization (WTO) or NAFTA dispute resolution. In May 1999, the U.S. and Canadian governments negotiated an agreement on magazines that provides increased access for the U.S. publishing industry to the Canadian market. The United States and Canada also have resolved several major issues involving fisheries. By common agreement, the two countries submitted a of Maine boundary dispute to the Court of Justice in 1981; both accepted the courts 12 October 1984 ruling which demarcated the territorial sea boundary. A current issue between the United States and Canada is the ongoing softwood lumber dispute, as the U.S. alleges that Canada unfairly subsidizes its forestry industry.In 1990, the United States and Canada signed a bilateral Fisheries Enforcement Agreement, which has served to deter illegal fishing activity and reduce the risk of injury during fisheries enforcement incidents. The U.S. and Canada signed a Salmon Agreement in June 1999 that settled differences over implementation of the 1985 Pacific Salmon Treaty for the next decade.Canada and the United States signed an aviation agreement during Clintons visit to Canada in February 1995, and air traffic between the two countries has increased dramatically as a result. The two countries also share in operation of the Lawrence Seaway, connecting the Lakes to the Ocean.()The U.S. is Canadas largest foreign investor and the most popular destination for Canadian foreign investments; at the end of 2007, the stock of U.S. direct investment in Canada was estimated at $293 billion, while Canadian direct investment (stock) in the United States was valued at $213 billion.(http://www.dfait-maeci.gc.ca/economist-economiste/assets/pdfs/FDI_stocks-Inward_by_Country-ENG.pdf)() U.S. FDI accounts for 59.5% of total direct investment in Canada while Canadian FDI in the U.S. accounts for 10% (5th largest foreign investor).() US investments are primarily directed at Canadas mining and smelting industries, petroleum, chemicals, the manufacture of machinery and transportation equipment, and finance, while Canadian investment in the United States is concentrated in manufacturing, wholesale trade, real estate, petroleum, finance, and insurance and other services.()Median household income comparison*note - Canadas statistic is only based on families of 2 or more people, rather than household incomeFree Trade Agreements(source:())*Free Trade Agreement (Signed 12-Oct-1987, entered into force 01-Jan-1989, later superseded by NAFTA)*American Free Trade Agreement (Entered into force 01-Jan-1994, includes Canada, U.S. and Mexico)*Free Trade Agreement (Entered into force 01-Jan-1997)*Free Trade Agreement (Entered into force 05-Jul-1997)*Rica Free Trade Agreement (Entered into force 01-Nov-2002)*Free Trade Association Free Trade Agreement (Entered into force 01-Jul-2009)*Free Trade Agreement (Entered into force 01-Aug-2009)*Free Trade Agreement (Signed 21-Nov-2008; Canadas ratification of this FTA is now dependant upon Colombias ratification of the Agreement Concerning Annual Reports on Human Rights and Free Trade Between Canada and the Republic of Colombia signed on 27-May-2010)*Free Trade Agreement (Signed on 28-June-2009)*Free Trade Agreement (Signed on 14-May-2010)thumb|400px|Nations that have Free Trade Agreements with Canada are in dark blue, nations in negotiations are in cyan. Canada is green.Canada is negotiating bilateral FTAs with the following countries and trade blocs:*Ukraine*Morocco*India*Korea*Republic*Singapore*Community (Negotiations have already concluded with Peru and Colombia)*CARICOM (Caribbean Community)*Union ()*Japan ()Canada is also involved in negotiations to create the following regional trade blocks:*Central American Free Trade Agreement*Trade Area of the Americas (FTAA) See also *and American economies compared*history of Canada*of Ontario*of Quebec*of Alberta*of Saskatchewan*of the petroleum industry in Canada*of Canadian provinces and territories by gross domestic productExternal links*OECDs Canada country Web site and OECD Economic Survey of Canada*Statatistics Canada: Latest release from the Labour Force SurveyNotes(There is an apparent discrepancy between the factbooks 65.4% of GDP estimate for Canadas debt in 2006 https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/ca.html, and the 30.2% trumpeted by the Canadian government at http://www.fin.gc.ca/ec2006/ec/eca1e.html. Both numbers are correct. The reason is that the Canadian government uses the OECDs net financial liabilities, while the CIA World Factbook uses a different measure of financial liabilities. The OECD itself reports the gross number as 68%, and the net number as 30.2% http://findarticles.com/p/articles/mi_m4456/is_80/ai_n18617470. The net number places Canada as one of the least indebted G8 countries, while the gross number is less flattering.);Bibliography*Howlett, Michael and M. Ramesh. Political Economy of Canada: An Introduction. Toronto: McClelland and Stewart, 1992.*Wallace, Iain, A Geography of the Canadian Economy. Don Mills: Oxford University Press, 2002.Further reading * * * * * * * * * * External links*Canada Economy 2011  CIA World Factbook list1  *del CanadKanadasde Canaddu Canadado Canaddi Kanadadel CanadaekonomikaKanadaja:de Canaddo Canadtaloust Canada zh:
5197
Transport_in_Canada
Canada is a developed country whose economy includes the extraction and export of raw materials from its large area. Because of this, it has a transportation system which includes more than  of roads, 10 major international airports, 300 smaller airports,  of functioning railway track, and more than 300 commercial ports and harbours that provide access to the Pacific, Atlantic and Arctic oceans as well as the Lakes and the Lawrence Seaway.() In 2005, the transportation sector made up 4.2% of Canadas GDP, compared to 3.7% for Canadas mining and oil and gas extraction industries.()Canada oversees and regulates most aspects of transportation within Canadian jurisdiction. Transport Canada is under the direction of the federal governments Minister of Transport. The Safety Board of Canada is responsible for maintaining transportation safety in Canada by investigating accidents and making safety recommendations.Roadsright|thumb|The Trans-Canada highway in Chilliwack, BCThere is a total of  of roads in Canada,of which  are paved, including  of expressways. As of 2008,  were unpaved.()In 2009, there were 20,706,616 road vehicles registered in Canada, of which 96% were vehicles under , 2.4% were vehicles between  tonnes and 1.6% were  or greater. These vehicles travelled a total of 333.29 billion kilometres, of which 303.6 billion was for vehicles under , 8.3 billion was for vehicles between  and 21.4 billion was for vehicles over . For the  trucks, 88.9% of vehicle-kilometres were intra-province trips, 4.9% were inter-province, 2.8% were between Canada and the US and 3.4% made outside of Canada. For trucks over , 59.1% of vehicle-kilometres were intra-province trips, 20% inter-province trips, 13.8% Canada-US trips and 7.1% trips made outside of Canada.()Image:Ambassador bridge evening.jpg|thumb|left|Bridge between Ontario and Detroit, Michigan has a quarter of US-Canada trade cross over it.Canadas vehicles consumed a total of  of gasoline and  of diesel.( Trucking generated 35% of the total GDP from transport, compared to 25% for rail, water and air combined (the remainder being generated by the industrys transit, pipeline, scenic and support activities).( Hence roads are the dominant means of passenger and freight transport in Canada.Roads and highways were managed by provincial and municipal authorities until construction of the Northwest Highway System (the Highway) and the Highway project initiation. The Alaska Highway of 1942 was constructed during War II for military purposes connecting St. John, British Columbia with Alaska.( The transcontinental highway, a joint national and provincial expenditure, was begun in 1949 under the initiation of the Trans Canada Highway Act on December 10, 1949. The  highway was completed in 1962 at a total expenditure of $1.4 billion.()Internationally, Canada has road links with both the lower 48 US states and Alaska. The Ministry of Transportation maintains the road network in Ontario and also employs Ministry of Transport Enforcement Officers for the purpose of administering the Canada Transportation Act and related regulations.()( ) The Department of Transportation in Brunswick performs a similar task in that province as well.Regulations enacted in regards to Canada highways are the 1971 Motor Vehicle Safety Act() and the 1990 Highway Traffic Act()The safety of Canadas roads is moderately good by international standards, and is improving both in terms of accidents per head of population and per billion kilometers.()Air transportAir transportation made up 9% of the transport sectors GDP generation in 2005. Canadas largest air carrier and its carrier is Canada, which had 34 million customers in 2006 and, as of April 2010, operates 363 aircraft (including Canada Jazz).(Transport Canada listing of aircraft owned by Air Canada and Air Canada Jazz (enter Air Canada (226 aircraft), Jazz Air LP (137 aircraft), Canadian Helicopters or Westjet in the box titled Owner Name)) Helicopter, the largest commercial helicopter operator in the world, is second with 142 aircraft( and WestJet, a carrier formed in 1996, is third with 96 aircraft.( Canadas airline industry saw significant change following the signing of the US-Canada skies agreement in 1995, when the marketplace became less regulated and more competitive.()The Transportation Agency employs transportation enforcement officers to maintain aircraft safety standards, and conduct periodic aircraft inspections, of all air carriers.() The Air Transport Security Authority is charged with the responsibility for the security of air traffic within Canada. In 1994 the National Airports Policy was enacted()Principal airportsOf over 1,800 registered Canadian aerodromes, certified airports, heliports, and floatplane bases,() 26 are specially designated under Canadas Airports System() (NAS): these include all airports that handle 200,000 or more passengers each year, as well as the principal airport serving each federal, provincial, and territorial capital. However, since the introduction of the policy only one, Airport, has been added and no airports have been removed despite dropping below 200,000 passengers.() The of Canada, with the exception of the three territorial capitals, retains ownership of these airports and leases them to local authorities. The next tier consists of 64 regional/local airports formerly owned by the federal government, most of which have now been transferred to other owners (most often to municipalities).(Below is a table of Canadas ten biggest airports by passenger traffic in 2010.thumb|Toronto Pearson, Canadas busiest airport.thumb|Vancouver InternationalRailImage:Eastbound over SCB.jpg|thumb|left|A CPR freight train in Pass.In 2007, Canada had a total of ( ) of freight and passenger railway, of which  is electrified. While intercity passenger transportation by rail is now very limited, freight transport by rail remains common. Total revenues of rail services in 2006 was $10.4 billion, of which only 2.8% was from passenger services. The Canadian National and Pacific Railway are Canadas two major freight railway companies, each having operations throughout America. In 2007, 357 billion tonne-kilometres of freight were transported by rail, and 4.33 million passengers travelled 1.44 billion passenger-kilometres (an almost negligible amount compared to the 491 billion passenger-kilometres made in light road vehicles). 34,281 people were employed by the rail industry in the same year.()Nation-wide passenger services are provided by the federal crown corporation Rail. Three Canadian cities have rail services: in the Montreal area by AMT, in the Toronto area by Transit, and in the Vancouver area by Coast Express. Smaller railways such as Ontario Northland, Mountaineer, and Algoma Central also run passenger trains to remote rural areas.In Canada railways are served by standard gauge, , rails.Canada has rail links with the lower 48 US States, but no connection with Alaska other than a ferry service from Rupert, British Columbia, although a line has been proposed.() There are no other international rail connections.WaterwaysImage:PortOVan.jpg|thumb|The of Vancouver, Canadas busiest port.|300pxIn 2005, 139.2 million tonnes of cargo was loaded and unloaded at Canadian ports.() The of Vancouver is the busiest port in Canada, moving 68 million tonnes or 15% of Canadas total in domestic and international shipping in 2003.( )Transport Canada oversees most of the regulatory functions related to marine registration,() safety of large vessel,() and port pilotage duties.() Many of Canadas port facilities are in the process of being divested from federal responsibility to other agencies or municipalities.()Inland waterways comprise , including the Saint Lawrence Seaway. Transport Canada enforces acts and regulations governing water transportation and safety.()Ferry servicesImage:The Breeze Fast Ferry 2004-08-08.JPG|thumb|The of Ontario I, part of The Breeze fast ferry service.*Passenger ferry service::Island to the mainland::several Sunshine Coast communities to the mainland and to Alaska.::Internationally to St. Pierre and Miquelon*Automobile ferry service::Scotia to and Labrador,::Quebec to Newfoundland across the of Belle Isle::Labrador and the island of Newfoundland.::Chandler to the Magdalen Islands, Quebec::Prince Edward Island to the Magdalen Islands, Quebec::Prince Edward Island to Nova Scotia::Digby, Nova Scotia, to Saint John, New Brunswick*ferry service::Columbia to Alaska or Washington state.Canalsthumb|Welland Canal, Port Weller, Lock #1The St. Lawrence waterway was at one time the worlds greatest inland water navigation system. The main route canals of Canada are those of the St. Lawrence River and the Great Lakes. The others are subsidiary canals.* Lawrence Seaway* Canal* Locks* Waterway* CanalPorts and harboursThe Harbours Board administered Halifax, Saint John, Chicoutimi, Trois-Rivires, Churchill, and Vancouver until 1983. Over 300 harbours across Canada were supervised by the Department of Transport.(  After divestiture Canada oversees only 17 Canada Port Authorities for the 17 largest shipping ports.()West coast*Victoria, British Columbia*Vancouver, British Columbia*Westminster, British Columbia*Prince Rupert, British ColumbiaEast coast*Halifax, Nova Scotia*Saint John, New Brunswick*St. Johns, Newfoundland and Labrador*Sept-les, Quebec*Sydney, Nova Scotia*Botwood, Newfoundland and LabradorNorthern and centralImage:Churchill Seaport 1996-08-12.jpg|thumb|Manitoba Seaport*Bcancour, Quebec*Churchill, Manitoba*Hamilton, Ontario*Montreal, Quebec*City, Quebec*Trois-Rivires, Quebec*Bay, Ontario*Toronto, Ontario*Windsor, OntarioMerchant marineCanadas merchant marine comprised a total of 173 ships ( or over)  or  at the end of 2007.(Pipelinesthumb|300px|The TransCanada pipeline routePipelines are part of the energy extraction and transportation network of Canada and are used to transport gas, natural gas liquids, crude oil, crude and other petroleum based products. Canada has  of pipeline for transportation of crude and refined oil, and  for petroleum gas.(Urban transportthumb|300px|Some North American cities arranged by size along the horizontal axis and public transportation use on the vertical axis. Canada has higher public transit use than American cities of similar size and less than New York and the large Mexican cities listed.File:McGillMetro-RushHour.JPG|thumb|200px|Metros McGill station during rush hour.Most Canadian cities have transportation, if only a bus system. Six Canadian cities have transit systems and three have rail systems (see below). In 2006, 11% of Canadians used public transportation to get to work. This compares to 72.3% that got to work by car, 6.4% that walked and 1.3% that rode a bike.() In general, Canadian cities have rates of public transit use which are two to three times as high as comparably sized US cities; census data indicates 4.8% of Americans take public transit to work.()() This means that transportation planners must allow for higher passenger volumes on Canadian transit systems than American ones.Rapid transit systemsThere are six urban rapid transit systems operating in Canada: The Metro, the Toronto Subway, the Vancouver SkyTrain, the Calgary C-Train, the Light Rail Transit and the O-Train in Ottawa.There is also a Airport Circulator, the Train at Pearson International Airport. It operates 24 hours a day, 7 days a week and is wheelchair-accessible. It is free of cost.Commuter train systemsCommuter trains exist in Montreal, Toronto and Vancouver:HistoryEuropean contactpeoples in Canada, relied on canoes, kayaks, umiaks and Boats, in addition to the snowshoe, toboggan and sled in winter for transportation prior to European contact. Europeans adopted these technologies as they pushed deeper into the continents interior, and were thus able to travel via the waterways that fed from the Lawrence River and Bay.(Virtual Vault, an online exhibition of Canadian historical art at Library and Archives Canada)In the 19th century and early 20th century transportation relied on harnessing oxen to River ox carts or horse to waggon. Maritime transportation was via manual labour such as canoe or wind on sail. Water or land travel speeds was approximately .()Settlement was along river routes. Agricultural commodities were perishable, and trade centres were within . Rural areas centred around villages, and they were approximately  apart. The advent of steam railways and steamships connected resources and markets of vast distances in the late 19th century.( Railways also connected city centres, in such a way that the traveller went by sleeper, railway hotel, to the cities. Crossing the country by train took four or five days, as it still does by car. People generally lived within  of the downtown core thus the train could be used for inter-city travel and the tram for commuting.The advent of the interstate or Trans-Canada Highway in Canada in 1963 established ribbon development, truck stops, and industrial corridors along throughways.EvolutionThe Canada Year Book 1956()The Federal Department of Transport established November 2, 1936, supervised railways, canals, harbours, marine and shipping, civil aviation, radio and meteorology. The Transportation Act of 1938 and the amended Railway Act, placed control and regulation of carriers in the hands of the Board of Transport commissioners for Canada. The Royal Commission on Transportation was formed December 29, 1948, to examine transportation services to all areas of Canada to eliminate economic or geographic disadvantages. The Commission also reviewed the Railway Act to provide uniform yet competitive freight-rates.(See also* Royal tours of Canada: Transportation* Forces VIP aircraft* Commission on Railways* in the United States*Romance of Transportation in Canada, a Film Board of Canada short* of CanadaReferencesExternal links*Transportation and Maps in Virtual Vault, an online exhibition of Canadian historical art at Library and Archives Canada* North American transportation statisticsin Canadakzlekedsedo Canad liikenne zh:
5233
Carl_Linnaeus
240pxThe of arms of Carl von Linn.Carl Linnaeus (Swedish original name Carl Nilsson Linnus, 23 May( 1707  10 January 1778), also known after his ennoblement as ,(Blunt (2004), p. 171.) was a Swedish botanist, physician, and zoologist, who laid the foundations for the modern scheme of nomenclature. He is known as the father of modern taxonomy, and is also considered one of the fathers of modern ecology. Many of his writings were in Latin, and his name is rendered in Latin as  (after 1761 Carolus a Linn).Linnaeus was born in the countryside of Smland, in southern Sweden. Linnaeus received most of his higher education at University, and began giving lectures in botany there in 1730. He lived abroad between 1735 and 1738, where he studied and also published a first edition of his  in the Netherlands. He then returned to Sweden, where he became professor of botany at Uppsala. In the 1740s, he was sent on several journeys through Sweden to find and classify plants and animals. In the 1750s and 60s, he continued to collect and classify animals, plants, and minerals, and published several volumes. At the time of his death, he was one of the most acclaimed scientists in Europe.The Swiss philosopher Rousseau sent him the message: Tell him I know no greater man on earth.() The German writer Wolfgang von Goethe wrote: With the exception of Shakespeare and Spinoza, I know no one among the no longer living who has influenced me more strongly.( Swedish author Strindberg wrote: Linnaeus was in reality a poet who happened to become a naturalist.() Among other compliments, Linnaeus has been called  (Prince of Botanists), The Pliny of the North, and The Second Adam.(Broberg (2006), p. 7.)In botany, the author abbreviation used to indicate Linnaeus as the authority for species names is L.() In 1959, Carl Linnaeus was designated as the lectotype for Homo sapiens,(Stearn (1959), p. 4.) which means that following the nomenclatural rules, Homo sapiens was validly defined as the animal species to which Linnaeus belonged.Biography Early life ChildhoodFile:LA2-Rashult-2.jpg|thumb|right|Birth place of Linnaeus at RshultCarl Linnaeus was born in the village of Rshult in Smland, Sweden on 23 May 1707. He was the first child of Nils Ingemarsson Linnaeus and Christina Brodersonia. His father was the first in his ancestry to adopt a permanent surname. Before that, ancestors had used the patronymic naming system of Scandinavian countries: his father was named Ingemarsson after his father Ingemar Bengtsson. When Nils was admitted to the of Lund, he had to take on a family name. He adopted the Latinate name Linnus after a giant tree (or lime tree),  in Swedish, that grew on the family homestead.(Blunt (2004), p. 12.) This name was spelled with the  ligature. When Carl was born, he was named Carl Linnus, with his fathers family name. The son also always spelled it with the  ligature, both in handwritten documents and in publications.(Blunt (2004), p. 13.) Carls patronymic would have been Nilsson, as in Carl Nilsson Linnus.One of a long line of peasants and priests, Nils was an amateur botanist, a Lutheran minister, and the curate of the small village of Stenbrohult in Smland. Christina was the daughter of the rector of Stenbrohult, Samuel Brodersonius. She subsequently gave birth to three daughters and another son, Samuel (who would eventually succeed their father as rector of Stenbrohult and write a manual on beekeeping).((Stver (1974), p. 8.)(Broberg (2006), p. 10.) A year after Linnaeus birth, his grandfather Samuel Brodersonius died, and his father Nils became the rector of Stenbrohult. The family moved into the rectory from the curates house.((Quammen (2007), p. 1.)Even in his early years, Linnaeus seemed to have a liking for plants, flowers in particular. Whenever he was upset, he was given a flower, which immediately calmed him. Nils spent much time in his garden and often showed flowers to Linnaeus and told him their names. Soon Linnaeus was given his own patch of earth where he could grow plants.(Blunt (2004), p. 15.)Early educationHis father began teaching Linnaeus Latin, religion, and geography at an early age; one account says that due to family use of Latin for conversation, the boy learned Latin before he learned Swedish. When Linnaeus was seven, Nils decided to hire a tutor for him. The parents picked Johan Telander, a son of a local yeoman. Linnaeus did not like him, writing in his autobiography that Telander was better calculated to extinguish a childs talents than develop them.(Blunt (2004), pp. 1516.) Two years after his tutoring had begun, he was sent to the Lower School at Vxj in 1717.(Stver (1974), p. 5.) Linnaeus rarely studied, often going to the countryside to look for plants. He reached the last year of the Lower School when he was fifteen, which was taught by the headmaster, Daniel Lannerus, who was interested in botany. Lannerus noticed Linnaeus interest in botany and gave him the run of his garden. He also introduced him to Johan Rothman, the state doctor of Smland and a teacher at Vxj Gymnasium. Also a botanist, Rothman broadened Linnaeus interest in botany and helped him develop an interest in medicine.(Blunt (2004), p. 16.)(Stver (1974), pp. 56.)Linnaeus entered the Vxj Gymnasium in 1724, where he studied mainly Greek, Hebrew, theology and mathematics, a curriculum designed for boys preparing for the priesthood.(Stver (1974), p. 6.)(Blunt (2004), pp. 1617.) In the last year at the gymnasium, Linnaeus father visited to ask the professors how his sons studies were progressing; to his dismay, most said that the boy would never become a scholar. Rothman believed otherwise, suggesting Linnaeus could have a future in medicine. The doctor offered to have Linnaeus live with his family in Vxj and to teach him physiology and botany. Nils accepted this offer.(Blunt (2004), pp. 1718.)(Stver (1974), pp. 811.)University Lund File:Carl von Linn i Lund.jpg|thumb|upright|Statue of Linnaeus as a University student in LundRothman showed Linnaeus that botany was a serious subject. He taught Linnaeus to classify plants according to Tourneforts system. Linnaeus was also taught about sexuality of plants, according to Vaillant.( In 1727, Linnaeus, age 21, enrolled in University in Skne.(Blunt (2004), p. 18.)(Stver (1974), p. 13.) He was registered as , the Latin form of his full name, which he also used later for his Latin publications.(The local doctor Kilian Stobaeus offered Linnaeus tutoring and lodging, as well as the use of his library, which included many books about botany. He also gave the student free admission to his lectures.(Blunt (2004), pp. 2122.)(Stver (1974), p. 15.) In his spare time, Linnaeus explored the flora of Skne, together with students sharing the same interests.(Stver (1974), pp. 1415.)UppsalaFile:Linn-Praeludia Sponsaliorum Plantarum.jpg|thumb|left|Pollination depicted in  (1729)In August 1728, Linnaeus decided to attend University on the advice of Rothman, who believed it would be a better choice if Linnaeus wanted to study both medicine and botany. Rothman based this recommendation on the two professors who taught at the medical faculty at Uppsala: Rudbeck the Younger and Roberg. Although Rudbeck and Roberg had undoubtedly been good professors, by then they were older and not so interested in teaching. Rudbeck no longer gave public lectures, and had others stand in for him. The botany, zoology, pharmacology and anatomy lectures were not in their best state.(Blunt (2004), pp. 2325.) In Uppsala, Linnaeus met a new benefactor, Celsius, who was a professor of theology and an amateur botanist.(Blunt (2004), pp. 3132.) He received Linnaeus into his home and allowed him use of his library, which was one of the richest botanical libraries in Sweden.(Stver (1974), pp. 1920.)In 1729, Linnaeus wrote a thesis,  on sexuality. This attracted the attention of Rudbeck; in May 1730, he selected Linnaeus to give lectures at the University although the young man was only a second-year student. His lectures were popular, and Linnaeus often addressed an audience of 300 people.(Blunt (2004), pp. 3234.) In June, Linnaeus moved from Celsius house to Rudbecks to become the tutor of the three youngest of his 24 children. His friendship with Celsius did not wane and they continued their botanical expeditions.(Blunt (2004), p. 3437.) Over that winter, Linnaeus began to doubt Tourneforts system of classification and decided to create one of his own. His plan was to divide the plants by the number of stamens and pistils. He began writing several books, which would later result in, for example,  and . He also produced a book on the plants grown in the Uppsala Botanical Garden, .(Blunt (2001), pp. 3637.)Rudbecks former assistant, Nils Rosn, returned to the University in March 1731 with a degree in medicine. Rosn started giving anatomy lectures and tried to take over Linnaeus botany lectures, but Rudbeck prevented that. Until December, Rosn gave Linnaeus private tutoring in medicine. In December, Linnaeus had a disagreement with Rudbecks wife and had to move out of his mentors house; his relationship with Rudbeck did not appear to suffer. That Christmas, Linnaeus returned home to Stenbrohult to visit his parents for the first time in about three years. His mother had disapproved of his failing to become a priest, but she was pleased to learn he was teaching at the University.((Anderson (1997), p. 40.)Expedition to LaplandFile:Carolus Linnaeus by Hendrik Hollander 1853.jpg|thumb|upright|Linnaeus in the traditional dress of the people of Lapland, holding the twinflower that became his personal emblemDuring a visit with his parents, Linnaeus told them about his plan to travel to Lapland; Rudbeck had made the journey in 1695, but the detailed results of his exploration were lost in a fire seven years afterwards. Linnaeus hope was to find new plants, animals and possibly valuable minerals. He was also curious about the customs of the native people, reindeer-herding nomads who wandered Scandinavias vast tundras. In April 1732, Linnaeus was awarded a grant from the Society of Sciences in Uppsala for his journey.(Anderson (1997), pp. 4243.)(Blunt (2001), p. 38.)Linnaeus began his expedition from Uppsala in May; he travelled on foot and horse, bringing with him his journal, botanical and ornithological manuscripts and sheets of paper for pressing plants. Near Gvle he found great quantities of Campanula serpyllifolia, later known as borealis, the twinflower that would become his favourite.(Blunt (2001), pp. 4243.) He sometimes dismounted on the way to examine a flower or rock(Anderson (1997), pp. 4344.) and was particularly interested in mosses and lichens, the latter a main part of the diet of the reindeer, a common animal in Lapland.(Anderson (1997), p. 46.)Linnaeus travelled clockwise around the coast of the of Bothnia, making major inland incursions from Ume, Lule and Tornio. He returned from his six-month long, over  expedition in October, having gathered and observed many plants, birds and rocks.(Blunt (2001), pp. 6365.)(Blunt (2004), pp. 3942.)(Broberg (2006), p. 29.) Although Lapland was a region with limited biodiversity, Linnaeus described about 100 previously unidentified plants. These became the basis of his book .(Quammen (2007), p. 2.)(Stver (1974), pp. 3839.)In  Linnaeus ideas about nomenclature and classification were first used in a practical way, making this the first proto-modern Flora.( The account covered 534 species, used the Linnaean classification system and included, for the described species, geographical distribution and taxonomic notes. It was Pyramus de Candolle who attributed Linnaeus with  as the first example in the botanical genre of Flora writing. Botanical historian E. L. Greene described  as the most classic and delightful of Linnaeuss works.(Frodin (2001), p. 27.)It was also during this expedition that Linnaeus had a flash of insight regarding the classification of mammals. Upon observing the lower jawbone of a horse at the side of a road he was traveling, Linnaeus remarked: If I only knew how many teeth and of what kind every animal had, how many teats and where they were placed, I should perhaps be able to work out a perfectly natural system for the arrangement of all quadrupeds.(Blunt (2001), p. 54.)DalarnaIn 1734, Linnaeus led a small group of students to Dalarna. Funded by the Governor of Dalarna, the expedition was to catalogue known natural resources and discover new ones, but also to gather intelligence on Norwegian mining activities at Rros.(European excursionsDoctorateBack in Uppsala, Linnaeus relations with Nils Rosn worsened, and thus he gladly accepted an invitation from the student Claes Sohlberg to spend the Christmas holiday in Falun with Sohlbergs family. Sohlbergs father was a mining inspector, and let Linnaeus visit the mines near Falun.(Blunt (2001), p. 74.) Sohlands father suggested to Linnaeus he should bring Sohlberg to the Republic and continue to tutor him there for an annual salary. At that time, the Dutch Republic was one of the most revered places to study natural history and a common place for Swedes to take their doctoral degree; Linnaeus, who was interested in both of these, accepted.(Blunt (2001), pp. 7879.)In April 1735, Linnaeus and Sohlberg set out for the Netherlands, with Linnaeus to take a doctoral degree in medicine at the of Harderwijk.(Stver (1974), p. 71.) On the way, they stopped in Hamburg, where they met the mayor, who proudly showed them a wonder of nature which he possessed: the taxidermied remains of a seven-headed hydra. Linnaeus quickly discovered it was a fake: jaws and clawed feet from weasels and skins from snakes had been glued together. The provenance of the hydra suggested to Linnaeus it had been manufactured by monks to represent the Beast of Revelation. As much as this may have upset the mayor, Linnaeus made his observations public and the mayors dreams of selling the hydra for an enormous sum were ruined. Fearing his wrath, Linnaeus and Sohlberg had to leave Hamburg quickly.(Anderson (1997), pp. 6061.)(Blunt (2004), p. 90.)File:Albertus Seba - Hydra.jpg|thumb|left|The Hamburg Hydra, from the  (1734) of SebaWhen Linnaeus reached Harderwijk, he began working toward a degree immediately; at the time, Harderwijk was known for awarding instant degrees after as little as a week.( First he handed in a thesis on the cause of malaria he had written in Sweden, which he then defended in a public debate. The next step was to take an oral examination and to diagnose a patient. After less than two weeks, he took his degree and became a doctor, at the age of 28.((Blunt (2001), p. 94.) During the summer, Linnaeus met a friend from Uppsala, Artedi. Before their departure from Uppsala, Artedi and Linnaeus had decided should one of them die, the survivor would finish the others work. Ten weeks later, Artedi drowned in one of the of Amsterdam, and his unfinished manuscript on the classification of fish was left to Linnaeus to complete.(Anderson (1997), p. 66.)(Blunt (2004), pp. 98100.)Publishing of One of the first scientists Linnaeus met in the Netherlands was Johan Frederik Gronovius to whom Linnaeus showed one of the several manuscripts he had brought with him from Sweden. The manuscript described a new system for classifying plants. When Gronovius saw it, he was very impressed, and offered to help pay for the printing. With an additional monetary contribution by the Scottish doctor Isaac Lawson, the manuscript was published as .(Blunt (2001), p. 98.)(Anderson (1997), pp. 6263.)Linnaeus became acquainted with one of the most respected physicians and botanists in the Netherlands, Boerhaave, who tried to convince Linnaeus to make a career there. Boerhaave offered him a journey to South Africa and America, but Linnaeus declined, stating he would not stand the heat. Instead, Boerhaave convinced Linnaeus that he should visit the botanist Burman. After his visit, Burman, impressed with his guests knowledge, decided Linnaeus should stay with him during the winter. During his stay, Linnaeus helped Burman with his . Burman also helped Linnaeus with the books on which he was working:  and .(Blunt (2004), pp. 100102.)George Clifford width2  106In August, during Linnaeus stay with Burman, he met Clifford III, a director of the East India Company and the owner of a rich botanical garden at the estate of Hartekamp in Heemstede. Clifford was very impressed with Linnaeus ability to classify plants, and invited him to become his physician and superintendent of his garden. Linnaeus had already agreed to stay with Burman over the winter, and could thus not accept immediately. However, Clifford offered to compensate Burman by offering him a copy of Sir Hans Sloanes Natural History of Jamaica, a rare book, if he let Linnaeus stay with him, and Burman accepted.(Anderson (1997), p. 64.)(Stver (1974), pp. 8182.) On 24 September 1735, Linnaeus became the botanical curator and house physician at Hartekamp, free to buy any book or plant he wanted.In July 1736, Linnaeus travelled to England, at Cliffords expense.(Blunt (2001), pp. 106107.) He went to London to visit Sir Hans Sloane, a collector of natural history, and to see his cabinet,(Stver (1974), p. 89.) as well as to visit the Physic Garden and its keeper, Miller. He taught Miller about his new system of subdividing plants, as described in . Miller was impressed, and from then on started to arrange the garden according to Linnaeus system.(Stver (1974), pp. 8990.) Linnaeus also traveled to University to visit the botanist Jacob Dillenius. He failed, however, to make Dillenius publicly accept his new classification system. He then returned to Hartekamp, bringing with him many specimens of rare plants.(Stver (1974), pp. 9093.) The next year, he published , in which he described 935 genera of plants, and shortly thereafter he supplemented it with , with another sixty (sexaginta) genera.(Stver (1974), p. 95.)His work at Hartekamp led to another book, , a catalogue of the botanical holdings in the herbarium and botanical garden of Hartekamp. He wrote it in nine months (completed in July 1737), but it was not published until 1738.( It contains the first use of the name Nepenthes, which Linnaeus used to describe a genus of plants.(Veitch (1897))(If this is not Helens Nepenthes, it certainly will be for all botanists. What botanist would not be filled with admiration if, after a long journey, he should find this wonderful plant. In his astonishment past ills would be forgotten when beholding this admirable work of the Creator! (translated from Latin by Veitch))Linnaeus stayed with Clifford at Hartekamp until 18 October 1737 (new style), when he left the house to return to Sweden. Illness and the kindness of Dutch friends obliged him to stay some months longer in Holland. In May 1738, he set out for Sweden again. On the way home, he stayed in Paris for about a month, visiting botanists such as de Jussieu. After his return, Linnaeus never left Sweden again.(Blunt (2001), p. 123.)(Koerner (1999), p. 56.)Return to SwedenWhen Linnaeus returned to Sweden on 28 June 1738, he went to Falun, where he entered into an engagement to Sara Elisabeth Mora. Three months later, he moved to Stockholm to find employment as a physician, and thus to make it possible to support a family.()(Stver (1974), p. 141.) Once again, Linnaeus found a patron; he became acquainted with Count Carl Gustav Tessin, who helped him get work as a physician at the Admiralty.(Stver (1974), pp. 146147.)(Koerner (1999), p. 16.) During this time in Stockholm, Linnaeus helped found the Swedish Academy of Science; he became the first Praeses in the academy by drawing of lots.(Koerner (1999), pp. 103105.)Because his finances had improved and were now sufficient to support a family, he received permission to marry his fiance, Sara Elisabeth Mora. Their wedding was held 26 June 1739. Seven months later, Sara gave birth to their first son, Carl. Two years later, a daughter, Elisabeth Christina, was born, and the subsequent year Sara gave birth to Sara Magdalena, who died 15 days old. Sara and Linnaeus would later have four other children: Lovisa, Sara Christina, Johannes and Sophia.((Stver (1974), p. 382.)File:CarlvonLinne house.jpg|thumb|left|The Linnaeus house in UppsalaIn May 1741, Linnaeus was appointed Professor of Medicine at Uppsala University, first with the responsibility of the medicine-related matters. Soon, he changed place with the other Professor of Medicine, Nils Rosn, and thus was responsible for the Botanical Garden (which he would thoroughly reconstruct and expand), botany and history, instead. In October that same year, his wife and nine-year-old son followed him to live in Uppsala.(Gribbin & Gribbin (2008), pp. 4950.)Further exploration of Sweden land and Gotland Ten days after he was appointed Professor, he undertook an expedition to the island provinces of land and Gotland with six students from the university, to look for plants useful in medicine. First, they travelled to land and stayed there until 21 June, when they sailed to Visby in Gotland. Linnaeus and the students stayed on Gotland for about a month, and then returned to Uppsala. During this expedition, they found 100 previously unrecorded plants. The observations from the expedition were later published in , written in Swedish. Like , it contained both zoological and botanical observations, as well as observations concerning the culture in land and Gotland.(Koerner (1999), p. 115.)(Blunt (2004), pp. 137142.)During the summer of 1745, Linnaeus published two more books:  and .  was a strictly botanical book, while  was zoological.((Stver (1974), pp. 117118.) Celsius had created the temperature scale named after him in 1742. Celsius scale was inverted compared to today, the boiling point at 0C and freezing point at 100C. In 1745, Linnaeus inverted the scale to its present standard.(Koerner (1999), p. 204.)VstergtlandIn the summer of 1746, Linnaeus was once again commissioned by the Government to carry out an expedition, this time to the Swedish province of Vstergtland. He set out from Uppsala on 12 June and returned on 11 August. On the expedition his primary companion was Erik Gustaf Lidbeck, a student who had accompanied him on his previous journey. Linnaeus described his findings from the expedition in the book , published the next year.((Blunt (2004), p. 159.) After returning from the journey the Government decided Linnaeus should take on another expedition to the southernmost province Scania. This journey was postponed, as Linnaeus felt too busy.(In 1747, Linnaeus was given the title archiater, or chief physician, by the Swedish king Adolf Fredericka mark of great respect.(Blunt (2004), p. 165.) The same year he was elected member of the Academy of Sciences in Berlin.(Stver (1974), p. 167.)ScaniaIn the spring of 1749, Linnaeus could finally journey to Scania, again commissioned by the Government. With him he brought his student, Olof Sderberg. On the way to Scania, he made his last visit to his brothers and sisters in Stenbrohult since his father had died the previous year. The expedition was similar to the previous journeys in most aspects, but this time he was also ordered to find the best place to grow walnut and Swedish whitebeam trees; these trees were used by the military to make rifles. The journey was successful, and Linnaeus observations were published the next year in .(Blunt (2004), pp. 198205.)(Koerner (1999), p. 116.)Rector of Uppsala UniversityIn 1750, Linnaeus became rector of Uppsala University, starting a period where natural sciences were esteemed.( Perhaps the most important contribution he made during his time at Uppsala was to teach; many of his students travelled to various places in the world to collect botanical samples. Linnaeus called the best of these students his apostles.(Gribbin & Gribbin (2008), pp. 5657.) His lectures were normally very popular and were often held in the Botanical Garden. He tried to teach the students to think for themselves and not trust anybody, not even him. Even more popular than the lectures were the botanical excursions made every Saturday during summer, where Linnaeus and his students explored the flora and fauna in the vicinity of Uppsala.(Blunt (2004), pp. 173174.) Publishing of  Linnaeus published  in 1751. The book contained a complete survey of the taxonomy system he had been using in his earlier works. It also contained information of how to keep a journal on travels and how to maintain a botanical garden.(Blunt (2004), p. 221.) Publishing of  Linnaeus published , the work which is now internationally accepted as the starting point of modern nomenclature, in 1753.(Stace (1991), p. 24.) The first volume was issued on May 24, the second volume followed on August 16(ICBN (Vienna Code), Art. 13.5, ex. 13.3.) of the same year.(Sprague (1953)) The book contained 1,200 pages and was published in two volumes; it described over 7,300 species.(Gribbin & Gribbin (2008), p. 47.)(Stver (1974), pp. 198199.) The same year the king dubbed him knight of the of the Polar Star, the first civilian in Sweden to become a knight in this order. He was then seldom seen not wearing the order.(Blunt (2004), p. 166.)EnnoblementLinnaeus felt Uppsala was too noisy and unhealthy, so he bought two farms in 1758: Hammarby and Svja. The next year, he bought a neighbouring farm, Edeby. He spent the summers with his family at Hammarby; initially it only had a small one-storey house, but in 1762 a new, larger main building was added.((Blunt (2004), p. 219.) In Hammarby, Linnaeus made a garden where he could grow plants that could not be grown in the Botanical Garden in Uppsala. He began constructing a museum on a hill behind Hammarby in 1766, where he moved his library and collection of plants. A fire that destroyed about one third of Uppsala and had threatened his residence there necessitated the move.(Blunt (2004), pp. 220224.)Since the initial release of  in 1735, the book had been expanded and reprinted several times; the tenth edition was released in 1758. This edition established itself as the starting point for nomenclature, the equivalent of .((Blunt (2004), p. 6.)The Swedish king Adolf Frederick granted Linnaeus nobility in 1757, but he was not ennobled until 1761. With his ennoblement, he took the name Carl von Linn (Latinized as ), Linn being a shortened and gallicised version of Linnus, and the German title von signifying his ennoblement.( The noble familys of arms prominently features a twinflower, one of Linnaeus favourite plants; it was given the scientific name Linnaea borealis in his honour by Gronovius. The shield in the coat of arms is divided into thirds: red, black and green for the three kingdoms of nature (animal, mineral and vegetable) in Linnaean classification; in the center is an egg to denote Nature, which is continued and perpetuated in ovo. At the bottom is a phrase in Latin, borrowed from the Aeneid, which reads : we extend our fame by our deeds.(Blunt (2004), p. 199.)(Blunt (2004), pp. 229230.)(Gribbin & Gribbin (2008), p. 62.)Last yearsFile:LinnUppsalaDom.jpg|thumb|upright0.85|Headstone of Carl Linnaeus and his son Linnaeus the YoungerLinnaeus was relieved of his duties in the Royal Swedish Academy of Science in 1763, but continued his work there as usual for more than ten years after.( He stepped down as rector at Uppsala University in December 1772, mostly due to his declining health.((Blunt (2004), p. 245.)Linnaeus last years were troubled by illness. He had suffered from a disease called the Uppsala fever in 1764, but survived thanks to the care of Rosn. He developed sciatica in 1773, and the next year, he had a stroke which partially paralysed him.(Blunt (2004), p. 232.) He suffered a second stroke in 1776, losing the use of his right side and leaving him bereft of his memory; while still able to admire his own writings, he could not recognize himself as their author.(Stver (1974), pp. 243245.)(Broberg (2006), p. 42.)In December 1777, he had another stroke which greatly weakened him, and eventually led to his death on 10 January 1778 in Hammarby.((Gribbin & Gribbin (2008), p. 63.) Despite his desire to be buried in Hammarby, he was interred in Cathedral on 22 January.(Quammen (2007), p. 4.)(Anderson (1997), pp. 104106.)His library and collections were left to his widow Sara and their children. Banks, an English botanist, wanted to buy the collection, but his son Carl refused and moved the collection to Uppsala. However, in 1783 Carl died and Sara inherited the collection, having outlived both her husband and son. She tried to sell it to Banks, but he was no longer interested; instead an acquaintance of his agreed to buy the collection. The acquaintance was a 24-year-old medical student, Edward Smith, who bought the whole collection: 14,000 plants, 3,198 insects, 1,564 shells, about 3,000 letters and 1,600 books. Smith founded the Society of London five years later.((Blunt (2001), pp. 238240.)The von Linn name ended with his son Carl, who never married.( His other son, Johannes, had died aged 3.() There are over two hundred descendents of Linnaeus through two of his daughters.(ApostlesFile:Pehr Forsskl portrait (cropped and color balanced).png|thumb|upright|left|Forsskl was among the apostles who met a tragic fate abroad.During Linnaeus time as Professor and Rector of Uppsala University, he taught many devoted students, 17 of whom he called apostles. They were the most promising, most committed students, and all of them made botanical expeditions to various places in the world, often with his help. The amount of this help varied; sometimes he used his influence as Rector to grant his apostles a scholarship or a place on an expedition.(Blunt (2004), pp. 189190.) To most of the apostles he gave instructions of what to look for on their journeys. Abroad, the apostles collected and organised new plants, animals and minerals according to Linnaeus system. Most of them also gave some of their collection to Linnaeus when their journey was finished.(Broberg (2006), pp. 3739.) Thanks to these students, the Linnaean system of taxonomy spread through the world without Linnaeus ever having to travel outside Sweden after his return from Holland.(Anderson (1997), pp. 9293.) The British botanist T. Stearn notes without Linnaeus new system, it would not have been possible for the apostles to collect and organise so many new specimens.(Blunt (2004), pp. 184185.) Many of the apostles died during their expeditions.Early expeditionsChristopher Trnstrm, the first apostle and a 43-year-old pastor with a wife and children, made his journey in 1746. He boarded a East India Company ship headed for China. Trnstrm never reached his destination, dying of a tropical fever on Sn Island the same year. Trnstrms widow blamed Linnaeus for making her children fatherless, causing Linnaeus to prefer sending out younger, unmarried students after Trnstrm.(Blunt (2004), pp. 185186.) Six other apostles later died on their expeditions, including Forsskl and Lfling.(Two years after Trnstrms expedition, Finnish-born Kalm set out as the second apostle to North America. There he spent two-and-a-half years studying the flora and fauna of Pennsylvania, New York, New Jersey and Canada. Linnaeus was overjoyed when Kalm returned, bringing back with him many pressed flowers and seeds. At least 90 of the 700 North American species described in Species Plantarum had been brought back by Kalm.(Anderson (1997), pp. 9394.)Cook expeditions and JapanFile:Mortimer - Captain James Cook, Sir Joseph Banks, Lord Sandwich, Dr Daniel Solander and Dr John Hawkesworth.jpg|thumb |right |Apostle Solander (far left) with Banks (left, sitting) accompanied Cook (centre) on his journey to Australia.Solander was living in Linnaeus house during his time as a student in Uppsala. Linnaeus was very fond of him, promising Solander his oldest daughters hand in marriage. On Linnaeus recommendation, Solander travelled to England in 1760, where he met the English botanist Banks. With Banks, Solander joined Cook on his expedition to Oceania on the Endeavour in 176871.(Anderson (1997), p. 96.)(Blunt (2004), pp. 191192.) Solander was not the only apostle to journey with James Cook; Sparrman followed on the Resolution in 177275 bound for, among other places, Oceania and South America. Sparrman made many other expeditions, one of them to South Africa.(Blunt (2004), pp. 192193.)Perhaps the most famous and successful apostle was Peter Thunberg, who embarked on a nine-year expedition in 1770. He stayed in South Africa for three years, then travelled to Japan. All foreigners in Japan were forced to stay on the island of Dejima outside Nagasaki, so it was thus hard for Thunberg to study the flora. He did, however, manage to persuade some of the translators to bring him different plants, and he also found plants in the gardens of Dejima. He returned to Sweden in 1779, one year after Linnaeus death.(Blunt (2004), pp. 193194.)Major publicationsSystema Naturaepage of the 10th edition of Systema Natur (1758)The first edition of  was printed in the Netherlands in 1735. It was a twelve-page work.(Linnaeus (1735)) By the time it reached its 10th edition in 1758, it classified 4,400 species of animals and 7,700 species of plants. In it, the unwieldy names mostly used at the time, such as , were supplemented with concise and now familiar binomials, composed of the generic name, followed by a specific epithet  in the case given, angulata. These binomials could serve as a label to refer to the species. Higher taxa were constructed and arranged in a simple and orderly manner. Although the system, now known as nomenclature, was partially developed by the Bauhin brothers (see Bauhin and Bauhin) almost 200 years earlier,(Windelspecht (2002), p. 28.) Linnaeus was the first to use it consistently throughout the work, including in monospecific genera, and may be said to have popularised it within the scientific community. (or, more fully, ) was first published in 1753, as a two-volume work. Its prime importance is perhaps that it is the primary starting point of plant nomenclature as it exists today.(In 1754, Linnaeus divided the plant Kingdom into 25 classes. One, Cryptogamia, included all the plants with concealed reproductive parts (algae, fungi, mosses and liverworts and ferns).(Van den Hoek et al. (2005).) was first published in 1737, delineating plant genera. Around 10 editions were published, not all of them by Linnaeus himself; the most important is the 1754 fifth edition.(Stace (1991), p. 22.) (1751) was a summary of Linnaeus thinking on plant classification and nomenclature, and an elaboration of the work he had previously published in  (1736) and  (1737). Other publications forming part of his plan to reform the foundations of botany include his  and : all were printed in Holland (as well as  (1737) and  (1735)), the Philosophia being simultaneously released in Stockholm.(Stafleu (1971), p. 157.)Linnaean taxonomythumb|right|Table of the Animal Kingdom () from the 1st edition of  (1735)The establishment of universally accepted conventions for the naming of organisms was Linnaeus main contribution to taxonomyhis work marks the starting point of binomial nomenclature. During the 18th century expansion of natural history knowledge, Linnaeus also developed what became known as the Linnaean taxonomy; the system of classification now widely used in the biological sciences.The Linnaean system classified nature within a hierarchy, starting with three kingdoms. Kingdoms were divided into classes and they, in turn, into orders, which were divided into genera (singular: genus), which were divided into Species (singular: species). Below the rank of species he sometimes recognized taxa of a lower (unnamed) rank; these have since acquired standardised names such as variety in botany and subspecies in zoology.Linnaeus groupings were based upon shared physical characteristics. Only his groupings for animals survive, and the groupings themselves have been significantly changed since their conception, as have the principles behind them. Nevertheless, Linnaeus is credited with establishing the idea of a hierarchical structure of classification which is based upon observable characteristics. While the underlying details concerning what are considered to be scientifically valid observable characteristics have changed with expanding knowledge (for example, sequencing, unavailable in Linnaeus time, has proven to be a tool of considerable utility for classifying living organisms and establishing their evolutionary relationships), the fundamental principle remains sound. Views on mankind According to German biologist Haeckel, the question of mans origin began with Linnaeus. He helped future research in the natural history of man by describing humans just as he described any other plant or animal.(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), pp. 156157.) He was the first person to place humans in a system of biological classification.  Anthropomorpha File:Antropomorpha12c.png|thumb|left|Detail from the 6th edition of  (1748) describing Anthropomorpha|Anthropomorpha with a division between Homo and Simia.Linnaeus classified humans among the primates (as they were later called) beginning with the first edition of . During his time at Hartekamp, he had the opportunity to examine several monkeys and noted similarities between them and man.(Gribbin & Gribbin (2008), pp. 173174.) He pointed out both species basically have the same anatomy; except for speech, he found no other differences.(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), p. 170.)(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), p. 167, quotes Linnaeus explaining the real difference would necessarily be absent from his classification system, as it was not a morphological characteristic: I well know what a splendidly great difference there is between a man and a bestia beast; that is, a non-human animal when I look at them from a point of view of morality. Man is the animal which the Creator has seen fit to honor with such a magnificent mind and has condescended to adopt as his favorite and for which he has prepared a nobler life. See also books.google.com in which Linnaeus cites the significant capacity to reason as the distinguishing characteristic of humans.) Thus he placed man and monkeys under the same category, Anthropomorpha, meaning manlike.(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), p. 167.) This classification received criticism from other biologists such as Gottschalk Wallerius, Theodor Klein and Georg Gmelin on the ground that it is illogical to describe a human as like a man.() In a letter to Gmelin from 1747, Linnaeus replied:( Also available as JPG.)It does not please you that Ive placed Man among the Anthropomorpha, perhaps because of the term with human form,(antropomorphon ) but man learns to know himself. Lets not quibble over words. It will be the same to me whatever name we apply. But I seek from you and from the whole world a generic difference between man and simian that follows from the principles of Natural History.(Others who followed were more inclined to give humans a special place in classification; Friedrich Blumenbach in the first edition of his Manual of Natural History (1779), proposed that the primates be divided into the Quadrumana (four-handed, i.e. apes and monkeys) and Bimana (two-handed, i.e. humans). This distinction was taken up by other naturalists, most notably Cuvier. Some elevated the distinction to the level of order. However, the many affinities between humans and other primates  and especially the great apes  made it clear that the distinction made no scientific sense. Darwin wrote, in The Descent of Man in 1871:The greater number of naturalists who have taken into consideration the whole structure of man, including his mental faculties, have followed Blumenbach and Cuvier, and have placed man in a separate Order, under the title of the Bimana, and therefore on an equality with the orders of the Quadrumana, Carnivora, etc. Recently many of our best naturalists have recurred to the view first propounded by Linnaeus, so remarkable for his sagacity, and have placed man in the same Order with the Quadrumana, under the title of the Primates. The justice of this conclusion will be admitted: for in the first place, we must bear in mind the comparative insignificance for classification of the great development of the brain in man, and that the strongly marked differences between the skulls of man and the Quadrumana (lately insisted upon by Bischoff, Aeby, and others) apparently follow from their differently developed brains. In the second place, we must remember that nearly all the other and more important differences between man and the Quadrumana are manifestly adaptive in their nature, and relate chiefly to the erect position of man; such as the structure of his hand, foot, and pelvis, the curvature of his spine, and the position of his head.) I absolutely know of none. If only someone might tell me a single one! If I would have called man a simian or vice versa, I would have brought together all the theologians against me. Perhaps I ought to have by virtue of the law of the discipline.The theological concerns were twofold: first, putting man at the same level as monkeys or apes would lower the spiritually higher position that man was assumed to have in the chain of being, and second, because the Bible says man was created in the of God() (theomorphism), if monkeys/apes and humans were not distinctly and separately designed, that would mean monkeys and apes were created in the image of God as well. This was something many could not accept.(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), pp. 171172.) The conflict between worldviews based on science and theology that was caused by asserting man was a type of animal would simmer for a century until the much greater, and still ongoing, controversy began in earnest with the publication of the Origin of Species by Darwin in 1859.After such criticism, Linnaeus felt he needed to explain himself more clearly. The 10th edition of  introduced new terms, including Mammalia and Primates, the latter of which would replace Anthropomorpha(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), p. 175.) as well as giving humans the full binomial Homo sapiens.(Blunt (2004), p. 8.) The new classification received less criticism, but many natural historians still believed he had demoted humans from their former place to rule over nature, not be a part of it. Linnaeus believed that man biologically belongs to the animal kingdom and had to be included in it.(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), pp. 191192.) In his book , he said, One should not vent ones wrath on animals, Theology decree that man has a soul and that the animals are mere aoutomata mechanica, but I believe they would be better advised that animals have a soul and that the difference is of nobility.(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), p. 166.)  Strange people in distant lands Anthropomorpha.png|thumb|right|Anthropomorpha depicted in Hoppius  (1763)1. Troglodyta Bontii, 2. Lucifer Aldrovandi, 3. Satyrus Tulpii, 4. Pygmaeus EdwardiLinnaeus added a second species to the genus Homo in  based on a figure and description by Bontius from a 1658 publication: Homo troglodytes (caveman)(Linnaeus (1758), p. 24.)(Bontius (1658), p. 84.) and published a third in 1771: Homo lar.(Linnaeus (1771), p. 521.) Swedish historian Broberg states that the new human species Linnaeus described were actually simians or native people clad in skins to frighten colonial settlers, whose appearance had been exaggerated in accounts to Linnaeus.(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), p. 187.)In early editions of , many well-known creatures were included such as the phoenix, dragon and manticore as well as cryptids like the satyrus,(#Engel|Linnaeus (1964) 1735, p. 30.) which Linnaeus collected into the catch-all category Paradoxa. Broberg thought Linnaeus was trying to offer a natural explanation and demystify the world of superstition.(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), pp. 176177.) Linnaeus tried to debunk some of these creatures, as he had with the hydra; regarding the purported remains of dragons, Linnaeus wrote that they were either derived from lizards or rays.(Broberg (2008)) For Homo troglodytes he asked the East India Company to search for one, but they did not find any signs of its existence.(Frngsmyr et al. (1983), p. 186.) Homo lar has since been reclassified as Hylobates lar, the gibbon.(Wilson & Reeder (2005), p. 179.)  Four races In the first edition of , Linnaeus subdivided the human species into four varieties based on continent and skin colour: Europus albus (white European), Americanus rubescens (red American), Asiaticus fuscus (brown Asian) and Africanus niger (black African). In the tenth edition of Systema Naturae he further detailed stereotypical characteristics for each variety, based on the concept of the Temperaments from antiquity, and changed the description of Asians skin tone to luridus (yellow).(Loring Brace (2005), p. 27.)(Slotkin (1965), pp. 176178.)(Marks (2010), p. 265.)(Keevak (2011), pp. 34.)(Braziel (2007), pp. 4344.) Additionally, Linnaeus created a taxon monstrosus for wild and monstrous humans, unknown groups, and more or less abnormal people.(Willoughby (2007), pp. 3334, citing Broberg (1975), p. 291.)CommemorationFile:Rshult 1907.jpg|thumb|right|220px|1907 celebration in RshultAnniversaries of Linnaeus birth, especially in centennial years, have been marked by major celebrations.(stholm (2007)) Linnaeus has appeared on numerous Swedish stamps and banknotes.( There are numerous statues of Linnaeus in countries around the world. The Society of London has awarded the Medal for excellence in botany or zoology since 1888. Following approval by the of Sweden, University and College merged on 1 January 2010 to become University.() Other things named after Linnaeus include the twinflower genus Linnaea, the crater Linn on the Earths moon and the cobalt sulfide mineral Linnaeite.See also* Insectorum* of botany* of phycology* cards, which were invented by Linnaeus* flower clock* revolutionFootnotesReferences Notes Bibliography*********************************Further reading******External linksBiographies* Biography at the Department of Systematic Botany, University of Uppsala* Biography at The Linnean Society of London* Biography from the of California Museum of Paleontology* A four minute biographical video from the London History Museum on YouTubeResources* * The Linnaeus Apostles* The Linnean Collections* The Linnean Correspondence* Linnaeus Disciples and Apostles* The Linnaean Dissertations* Linnean Herbarium* The Linnus TercentenaryOther* Linnaeus was depicted by Hosler in a parody of Peanuts titled Good ol Charlie Darwin.* The 15 March 2007 issue of Nature featured a picture of Linnaeus on the cover with the heading Linnaeuss Legacy and devoted a substantial portion to items related to Linnaeus and Linnaean taxonomy.* A tattoo of Linnaeus definition of the order Primates mentioned by Zimmer* biloba tree at the University of Harderwijk, said to have been planted by Linnaeus in 1735Linnaeusvon Linnvon LinnLinnaeusLinneoLinneyLinnaeusvon Linnvon Linnvon Linnvon LinnLinnvon LinnLinnaeusvon Linnvon Linnvon Linnvon LinnLinneoLineovon Linnvon LinnLinnaeusvon LinnLinnaeusvon LinnLinnaeusLinnaeusvon Linngan: von LinnLinnLinnaeusLinnaeusLinnaeusvon Linnvon Linnit:LinneoLinnaeusLinnaeusLinneszLinnaeusvon LinnLinnaeusLinnejsvon Linnvon Linnvon Linnvon Linnvon LinnLinnaeusLinnaeusLinnaeusLinnaeusja:von Linnvon Linnvon Linnvon Linnvon LinnLinneuszLinnaeusLinnvon LinnLinnaeusLinnaeusLinnaeusLinnLinnaeusvon Linn Linnaeusvon Linnvon LinnLinnaeusLinnaeusvon Linnvon LinnLinnaeusLinnaeusLinnaeus LinnaeusLinnaeusLiniejoszh:
5321
Czech_Republic
footnote4                    Shared code 42 with Slovakia until 1997.a. Rhetorical question meaning Those places where my homeland lies.The Czech Republic ( ;(Oxford English Dictionary, second edition, Oxford University Press, 1989.) , , short form esko ) is a landlocked country in Europe. The country is bordered by Poland to the northeast, Slovakia to the east, Austria to the south, and Germany to the west and northwest. It is a pluralist multi-party parliamentary democracy, a member of the Union, NATO, the OECD, the OSCE, the of Europe and the Group.The Czech state, formerly known as Bohemia, was formed in the late 9th century as a small duchy around Prague, at that time under dominance of the powerful Moravian Empire (which reached its greatest territorial extent during the reign of I from the of Mojmr). After the fall of the Empire in 907, the centre of power was transferred from Moravia to Bohemia, under the Pemyslids. During the rule of Pemyslid dukes/kings and their successors, the Luxembourgs, the country reached its greatest territorial extent (13th14th century). Life in the country was significantly affected by the wars, during which it faced economic embargo and crusades from all over Europe. Following the of Mohcs in 1526, the of Bohemia was gradually integrated into the monarchy as one of its three principal parts alongside the of Austria and the of Hungary. The Revolt (161820) led to the further centralization of the monarchy including forced recatholization and Germanization. During radical reforms in the 18th century the Bohemian Crown was even de facto abolished (1749). In the 19th century the Czech lands became the industrial powerhouse of the monarchy and the core of the Republic of Czechoslovakia which was formed in 1918, following the collapse of the empire after War I.After the Agreement, Polish annexation of Zaolzie and occupation of Czechoslovakia and the consequent disillusion with the Western response and gratitude for the liberation of the major portion of Czechoslovakia by the Red Army, the Party of Czechoslovakia won the plurality in the 1946 elections. In a 1948 coup dtat, Czechoslovakia became a communist-ruled state. In 1968, the increasing dissatisfaction culminated in attempts to reform the communist regime. The events, known as the Spring of 1968, ended with an invasion by the armies of the Pact countries (with the exception of Romania); the troops remained in the country until the 1989 Revolution, when the communist regime collapsed. On 1 January 1993, Czechoslovakia peacefully dissolved into its constituent states, the Czech Republic and the Republic.The Czech Republic is the first former member of the Comecon to achieve the status of a country according to the Bank.() In addition, the country has the highest human development in and Eastern Europe,() ranking as a Very High Human Development nation. It is also ranked as the third most peaceful country in Europe(Peace Index) and most democratic and healthy (by infant mortality) country in the region(Index)(of countries by infant mortality rate).EtymologyThe traditional English name Bohemia derives from Latin Boiohaemum, which means home of the Boii. The current name comes from the Czech endonym echy using the antiquated spelling Czechy, identical with the Polish one.()The country has been traditionally divided into lands, namely proper (echy) in the west, Moravia (Morava) in the southeast, and Silesia (Slezsko; the smaller, south-eastern part of historical Silesia, most of which is located within modern Poland) in the northeast. Known officially as the Crown of the Kingdom of Bohemia since the 14th century, a number of other names of the country had been used, including the Lands of the Bohemian Crown, Czech/Bohemian lands, Bohemian Crown, Lands of the Crown of Saint Wenceslas etc. When the country regained its independence after the dissolution of the Austro-Hungarian empire in 1918, the new name of Czechoslovakia was coined to reflect the union of the Czech and Slovak nations within the new country.Following the dissolution of Czechoslovakia at the end of 1992, the Czech part of the former nation found itself without a common single-word name in English. In 1993, the Czech Ministry of Foreign Affairs suggested the name Czechia  (esko  in Czech) as an official alternative in all situations other than formal official documents and the full names of government institutions; however, this has not become widespread in English, even though most other languages have single-word names for the country (usually their own variants of Czechia). History PrehistoryFile:Great moravia svatopluk.png|thumb|upleft|Great Moravia during the reign of IArchaeologists have found evidence of prehistoric human settlements in the area, dating back to the Neolithic era. In the era, from the 3rd century BC Celtic migrations, the Boii and later in the 1st century, Germanic tribes of Marcomanni and Quadi settled there. During the Period around the 5th century, many Germanic tribes moved westwards and southwards out of Central Europe.people from the Sea and Carpathian regions settled in the area (a movement that was also stimulated by the onslaught of peoples from Siberia and Eastern Europe: Huns, Avars, Bulgars and Magyars). Following in the Germans wake, they moved southwards into Bohemia, Moravia and some of present day Austria. During the 7th century, the Frankish merchant Samo, supporting the Slavs fighting their Avar rulers, became the ruler of the first known Slav state in Central Europe. The Moravian principality arose in the 8th century.BohemiaFile:Premysl2Gelnhausen.jpg|thumb|upright|Pemysl Ottokar II, (c. 12331278), King of Bohemia and ruler of Austria, Styria, Carinthia and CarniolaThe Bohemian or Czech state emerged in the late 9th century, when it was unified by the dynasty. The of Bohemia was, as the only kingdom in the Roman Empire, a significant regional power during the Ages. It was part of the Empire from 1002 till 1804, with the exception of years 14401526.In 1212, King Pemysl Otakar I, bearing the title king since 1198, extracted a Bull of Sicily (a formal edict) from the emperor, confirming the royal title for Otakar and his descendants. Large-scale German immigration occurred in the 13th century. The Germans populated towns and mining districts on the Bohemian periphery and, in some cases, formed German colonies in the interior of the Czech lands. In 1235, the mighty Mongol army launched an invasion of Europe. After the of Legnica, the Mongols carried their devastating raid into Moravia, but they were beaten by the Czech royal army in a battle of Olomouc and continued into Hungarian lands.()File:Karl IV. (HRR).jpg|thumb|170px|left|Charles IV, 131678, eleventh king of Bohemia, elected as the ech (Greatest Czech) of all time.(Emperor Charles IV elected Greatest Czech of all time, Radio Prague)King Pemysl Otakar II earned the nickname Iron and Golden King because of his military power and wealth. He acquired Austria, Styria, Carinthia and Carniola, thus spreading the Bohemian territory to the Sea. He met his death at the on the Marchfeld in 1278 in a war with his rival, King I of Germany.() Ottokars son Wenceslaus II acquired the Polish crown in 1300 for himself and the Hungarian crown for his son. In 1306, the last king of Pemyslid line was murdered in mysterious circumstances in Olomouc while he was resting. After a series of dynastic wars, the of Luxembourg gained the Bohemian throne.The 14th century, particularly the reign of Charles IV, is considered the Golden Age of Czech history. Of particular significance was the founding of University in Prague in 1348. The Death, which had raged in Europe from 1347 to 1352, decimated the Kingdom of Bohemia in 1380,() killing about 10% of the population.(Plague epidemics in Czech countries. E. Strouhal. p.49.)In the 15th century, the religious and social reformer Hus formed a movement later named after him. Although Hus was named a heretic and burnt in Constanz in 1415, his followers seceded from the Catholic Church and in the Wars (14191434) defeated five crusades organized against them by the Holy Roman Emperor Sigismund. Chelick continued with Czech Hussite Reformation movement. During the next two centuries, 90% of the inhabitants became adherents of the Hussite movement.After 1526 Bohemia came increasingly under Habsburg control as the Habsburgs became first the elected and then the hereditary rulers of Bohemia. The of Prague and subsequent revolt against the Habsburgs in 1618 marked the start of the Years War, which quickly spread throughout Central Europe. In 1620, the rebellion in Bohemia was crushed at the of White Mountain, and the ties between Bohemia and Habsburgs hereditary lands in Austria were strengthened. The war had a devastating effect on the local population; the people were given the choice either to convert to Catholicism or leave the country.The following period, from 1620 to the late 18th century, has been often called the Dark Age. The population of the Czech lands declined by a third through war, disease, famine and the expulsion of the Protestant Czechs.(Czech.cz, The Thirty Years War  Czech republic) The Habsburgs banned all religions other than Catholicism.() Ottoman Turks and Tatars invaded Moravia in 1663,(History of the Mongols from the 9th to the 19th Century. Part 2. The So-Called Tartars of Russia and Central Asia. Division 1. Henry Hoyle Howorth. p.557. ISBN 1402177720) taking 12,000 slaves.(Lnov rejstky (16561711) ) In 16791680 the Czech lands faced a devastating plague and an uprising of serfs.(The new Cambridge modern history: The ascendancy of France, 164888. Francis Ludwig Carsten (1979). p.494. ISBN 0521045444)The reigns of Theresa of Austria and her son Joseph II, Holy Roman Emperor and co-regent from 1765, were characterized by absolutism. In 1742, most of Silesia, then the possession of the Bohemian crown, was seized by King II of Prussia in the of the Austrian Succession. The Great Famine, which lasted from 1770 until 1771, killed about one tenth of the Czech population, or 250,000 inhabitants, and radicalized countrysides leading to peasant uprisings.(The Cambridge economic history of Europe: The economic organization of early modern Europe. E. E. Rich, C. H. Wilson, M. M. Postan (1977). p.614. ISBN 0521087104)After the fall of the Roman Empire, Bohemia became part of the Empire and later of AustriaHungary. Serfdom was not completely abolished until 1848. After the of 1848, Emperor Josef I of Austria instituted an absolute monarch in an effort to balance competing ethnic interests in the empire.File:File:Czech Troops.jpg|thumb|Czechoslovak troops in Vladivostok (1918)File:Tom G Masaryk1918.jpg|thumb|right|185px|Garrigue Masaryk, first president of Czechoslovakia.File:Memorial lidice children (2007)-commons.JPG|thumb|A memorial to 82 Lidice children killed by the Nazis in Chelmno.File:Tratado de Lisboa 13 12 2007 (081).jpg|thumb|right|The Czech Republic became a member of the European Union in 2004, signed the Treaty in 2007 and ratified it in 2009 as the last EU member. Czechoslovakia An estimated 1.4 million Czech soldiers fought in in World War I, of them some 150,000 died. More than 90,000 Czech volunteers formed the Legions in France, Italy and Russia, where they fought against the Powers and the latter later against Bolshevik troops.(Radio Praha  zprvy ) Following the collapse of the Austro-Hungarian Empire after World War I, the independent republic of Czechoslovakia was created in 1918. This new country incorporated the Crown (Bohemia, Moravia and Silesia) and parts of the of Hungary (Slovakia and the Ruthenia) with significant German, Hungarian, Polish and Ruthenian speaking minorities.()Although Czechoslovakia was a state, it provided what were at the time rather extensive rights to its minorities and remained the only democracy in this part of Europe in the interwar period. The effects of the Depression including high unemployment and massive propaganda from Nazi Germany, however, resulted in discontent and strong support among ethnic Germans for a break from Czechoslovakia. Hitler took advantage of this opportunity and, using Henleins separatist German Party, gained the largely German speaking Sudetenland (and its substantial Line like border fortifications) through the 1938 Agreement (signed by Germany, France, Britain and Italy), despite the mobilization of 1.2 million-strong Czechoslovak army and the Franco-Czech military alliance. Poland annexed the Zaolzie area around Tn. Hungary gained parts of Slovakia and the Subcarpathian Rus as a result of the Vienna Award in November 1938.The remainders of Slovakia and the Subcarpathian Rus gained greater autonomy, with the state renamed to Czecho-Slovakia. After Nazi Germany threatened to annex part of Slovakia, allowing the remaining regions to be partitioned by Hungary and Poland, Slovakia chose to maintain its national and territorial integrity, seceding from Czecho-Slovakia in March 1939, and allying itself, as demanded by Germany, with Hitlers coalition.(Gerhard L. Weinberg, The Foreign Policy of Hitlers Germany: Starting World War II, 19371939 (Chicago, 1980), pp. 470481.)The remaining Czech territory was occupied by Germany, which transformed it into the so-called of Bohemia and Moravia. The protectorate was proclaimed part of the Third Reich, and the president and prime minister were subordinate to the Nazi Reichsprotektor (imperial protector). Subcarpathian Rus declared independence as the Republic of Carpatho-Ukraine on 15 March 1939 but was invaded by Hungary the same day and formally annexed the next day. Approximately 345,000 Czechoslovak citizens, including 277,000 Jews, were killed or executed while hundreds of thousands of others were sent to prisons and concentration camps or used as forced labour. Perhaps twothirds of the Czech nation was destined either for extermination or removal.(Stephen A. Garrett (1996). Conscience and power: an examination of dirty hands and political leadership. Palgrave Macmillan. p.60. ISBN 0312159080) A Nazi concentration camp existed at Terezn, north of Prague.There was resistance to Nazi occupation, both at home and abroad, most notably with the assassination of Nazi leader Heydrich in a Prague suburb on 27 May 1942. The Czechoslovak government-in-exile and its army fighting against the Germans were acknowledged by the Allies; Czech/Czechoslovak troops fought from the very beginning of the war in Poland, France, the UK, North Africa, the Middle East and the Union. The German occupation ended on 9 May 1945, with the arrival of the Soviet and American armies and the uprising. An estimated 140,000 Soviet soldiers died in conquering Czechoslovakia from German rule.(A Companion to Russian History. Abbott Gleason (2009). Wiley-Blackwell. p.409. ISBN 1-4051-3560-3)In 19451946, almost the entire German minority in Czechoslovakia, about 3 million people, were expelled to Germany and Austria. During this time, thousands of Germans were held in prisons and detention camps or used as forced labour. In the summer of 1945, there were several massacres. The only Germans not expelled were some 250,000 who had been active in the resistance against the Nazis or were considered economically important, though many of these emigrated later. Following a Soviet-organised referendum, the Subcarpathian Rus never returned under Czechoslovak rule but became part of the Soviet Socialist Republic, as the Oblast in 1946.Czechoslovakia uneasily tried to play the role of a bridge between the West and East. However, the Party of Czechoslovakia rapidly increased in popularity, with a general disillusionment with the West, because of the pre-war Agreement, and a favourable popular attitude towards the Union, because of the Soviets role in liberating Czechoslovakia from German rule. In the 1946 elections, the Communists gained 38%(Libri.cz ) of the votes and became the largest party in the Czechoslovak parliament. They formed a coalition government with other parties of the National Front and moved quickly to consolidate power. The decisive step took place in February 1948, during a series of events characterized by Communists as a revolution and by anti-Communists as a takeover, the Communist Peoples Militias secured control of key locations in Prague, and a new all-Communist government was formed.For the next 41 years, Czechoslovakia was a Communist state within the Bloc. This period is characterized by lagging behind the West in almost every aspect of social and economic development. The countrys GDP per capita fell from the level of neighboring Austria below that of Greece or Portugal in the 1980s. The Communist government completely nationalized the of production and established a command economy. The economy grew rapidly during the 1950s but slowed down in the 1960s and 1970s and stagnated in the 1980s. The political climate was highly repressive during the 1950s, including numerous trials and hundreds of thousands of political prisoners, but became more open and tolerant in the late 1960s, culminating in Dubeks leadership in the 1968 Spring, which tried to create socialism with a human face and perhaps even introduce political pluralism. This was forcibly ended by 21 August 1968 Pact invasion.The invasion was followed by a harsh program of Normalization in the late 1960s and the 1970s. Until 1989, the political establishment relied on censorship of the opposition. Dissidents published 77 in 1977, and the first of a new wave of protests were seen in 1988. Between 1948 and 1989 more than 250,000 Czechs and Slovaks were sent to prison for anti-state activities and over 400,000 emigrated.(Czech schools revisit communism. BBC News. 1 November 2005.) Velvet revolution and independence In November 1989, Czechoslovakia returned to a liberal democracy through the peaceful Revolution. However, Slovak national aspirations strengthened and on 1 January 1993, the country peacefully split into the independent Czech Republic and Slovakia. Both countries went through economic reforms and privatisations, with the intention of creating a capitalist economy. This process was largely successful; in 2006 the Czech Republic was recognised by the World Bank as a developed country,( and in 2009 the Development Index ranked it as a nation of Very High Human Development.(From 1991, the Czech Republic, originally as part of Czechoslovakia and now in its own right, has been a member of the Group and from 1995, the OECD. The Czech Republic joined NATO on 12 March 1999 and the European Union on 1 May 2004. It held the Presidency of the European Union for the first half of 2009. Politics File:Vclav Havel.jpg|thumb|right|205px|Havel, the first President of the Czech Republic.File:Vaclav Klaus headshot.jpg|thumb|170px|Klaus, current President of the Czech Republic.The Czech Republic is a pluralist multi-party parliamentary democracy, with the Prime Minister as of government. The Parliament (Parlament esk republiky) is bicameral, with the Chamber of Deputies () (200 members) and the Senate (accessdate25 April 2010)|-! Year !! Total !! Change|-! 1857| 7,016,531 || |-! 1869| 7,617,230 || +8.6%|-! 1880| 8,222,013 || +7.9%|-! 1890| 8,665,421 || +5.4%|-! 1900| 9,372,214 || +8.2%|-! 1910| 10,078,637 || +7.5%|-! 1921| 10,009,587 || 0.7%|-! 1930| 10,674,386 || +6.6%|-! 1950| 8,896,133 || 16.7%|-! 1961| 9,571,531 || +7.6%|-! 1970| 9,807,697 || +2.5%|-! 1980| 10,291,927 || +4.9%|-! 1991| 10,302,215 || +0.1%|-! 2001| 10,230,060 || 0.7%|-! 2011| 10,540,748 || +2.9%|} Demographics According to the 2001 census, the vast majority of the inhabitants of the Czech Republic are Czechs (94.24%) (including Moravians and Silesians). The most numerous national minorities are: Slovaks (1.89%); Poles (0.51%); Germans (0.38%); Ukrainians (0.22%); Vietnamese (0.17%); Hungarians (0.14%); Russians (0.12%); Romani (0.11%); Bulgarians (0.04%); and Greeks (0.03%).() According to some estimates, there are actually at least 250,000 people in the Czech Republic.()()There were 436,116 foreigners residing in the country in October 2009, according to the Czech Interior Ministry,(Foreigners by type of residence, sex and citizenship, Czech Statistical Office, 31 October 2009) with the largest groups being Ukrainian (132,481), Slovak (75,210), Vietnamese (61,102), Russian (29,976), Polish (19,790), German (14,156), Moldovan (10,315), Bulgarian (6,346), Mongolian (5,924), American (5,803), Chinese (5,314), British (4,461), Belarusian (4,441), Serbian (4,098), Romanian (4,021), Kazakh (3,896), Austrian (3,114), Italian (2,580), Dutch (2,553), French (2,356), Croatian (2,351), Bosnian (2,240), Armenian (2,021), Uzbek (1,969), Macedonian (1,787) and Japanese (1,581).(The Jewish population of Bohemia and Moravia, 118,000 according to the 1930 census, was virtually annihilated by the Nazis during Holocaust.() There were approximately 4,000 Jews in the Czech Republic in 2005.(The Virtual Jewish Library  Jewish population of Czech republic, 2005) The former Czech prime minister, Jan Fischer, is of Jewish origin and faith.(PM Fischer visits Israel. Radio Prague. 22 July 2009.)The fertility rate is a low 1.50 children per woman.Immigration increased the population by almost 1% in 2007. About 77,000 new foreigners settle down in the Czech Republic every year.(Press: Number of foreigners in R up ten times since 1989. Prague Monitor. 11 November 2009.) Vietnamese immigrants began settling in the Czech Republic during the Communist period, when they were invited as workers by the Czechoslovak government.() Today, there are an estimated 70,000 Vietnamese in the Czech Republic.(Crisis Strands Vietnamese Workers in a Czech Limbo. The New York Times. 5 June 2009.) In contrast to Ukrainians, Vietnamese come to the Czech Republic to live permanently.(Foreigners working in the Czech Republic. Ministry of Foreign Affairs. July 2006.)At the turn of the 20th century, Chicago was the city with the third largest Czech population,(Czechs and Bohemians. Encyclopedia of Chicago.) after Prague and Vienna.(Czech and Slovak roots in Vienna. Wieninternational.at) According to the 2006 US census, there are 1,637,218 Americans of full or partial Czech descent.() Religion The Czech Republic has one of the least religious populations on Earth. Historically, the Czech people have been characterised as tolerant and even indifferent towards religion.(Richard Felix Staar, Communist regimes in Eastern Europe, Issue 269, p. 90) According to the 2001 census, 59% of the country is agnostic, atheist or irreligious, 26.8% is Roman Catholic and 2.5% is Protestant.() From 1991 to 2001, the number of people identifying with no religion increased by 19.1%, or two million people, representing the largest group increase. Adherence to Christianity decreased by over one million persons.According to a Eurobarometer Poll in 2005,() 19% of Czech citizens responded that they believe there is a God (the second lowest rate among European Union countries after Estonia with 16%),() whereas 50% answered that they believe there is some sort of spirit or life force and 30% said that they do not believe there is any sort of spirit, God or life force. Culture  Music File:PragueSpring.jpg|thumb|right|Festival Prague Spring at dm in PragueMusic in the Czech Republic has its roots in more than 1000 years old music (first preserved references come from the end of 10th century), in traditional folk music of Bohemia, Moravia and Silesia and in long-term high-culture classical music tradition. Since early eras of artificial music, Czech musicians and composers have been often influenced by genuine folk music. Notable Czech composers include Michna, Dismas Zelenka, Mysliveek, Smetana, Janek, Dvok, Martin, Schulhoff and Eben. The most famous music festival is Prague Spring (Prask jaro), that has been annually organized since 1946. Literature literature is the literature written by Czechs or other inhabitants of the Czech state, mostly in the language, although other languages like Church Slavonic, Latin or German have been also used, especially in the past. Czech authors who had written in the German language, such as Kafka, are usually excluded from the corpus of Czech literature, regardless of their own national self-identification.Czech literature is divided into several main time periods: the Middle Ages; the Hussite period; the years of re-Catholicization and the baroque; the Enlightenment and Czech reawakening in the 19th century; the avantgarde of the interwar period; the years under Communism and the Prague Spring; and the literature of the post-Communist Czech Republic. Czech literature and culture played a major role on at least two occasions, when Czechs lived under oppression and political activity was suppressed. On both of these occasions, in the early 19th century and then again in the 1960s, the Czechs used their cultural and literary effort to strive for political freedom, establishing a confident, politically aware nation. Theatre of the Czech Republic has rich tradition with roots in the Middle Ages. In the 19th century, the theatre played an important role in the national awakening movement and later, in the 20th century it became a part of the modern European theatre art. Cuisine Image:Praha 2005-09-25 svkov na smetan-00.jpg|thumb|250px|right|na smetan is a signature Czech dish, consisting of marinated beef with Czech dumplingsFile:Pilsner Urquell 2.JPG|thumb|left|130px|Urquell was the first pilsner type beer in the world.Czech cuisine is marked by a strong emphasis on meat dishes. Pork is quite common; beef and chicken are also popular. Goose, duck, rabbit and wild game are served. Fish is rare, with the occasional exception of fresh trout and carp, which is served at Christmas.beer has a long and important history. The first brewery is known to have existed in 1118 and Czech Republic has the highest beer consumption per capita in the world. The famous Pilsener style beer originated in western Bohemian city of Plze, and further south the town of Budweis lent its name to its beer, eventually known as Bier Brgerbru thus Budvar. The tourism is slowly sparkling around the Southern Moravian region too, which is producing wine since Middle Ages, about 94% of vineyards in Czech Republic are Moravian. Aside from Slivovitz, beer and wine, Czechs also produce two uniquely Czech liquors, Stock and Becherovka. Kofola is a non-alcoholic domestic cola drink which competes with Cola and Pepsi in popularity.Two unique Czech dishes are vepo-knedlo-zelo and svkov na smetan. Czech desserts arent particularly sweet, and frequently are with poppy seeds. Sports Sports play a part in the life of many Czechs, who are generally loyal supporters of their favourite teams or individuals. The two leading sports in the Czech Republic are football (soccer) and hockey, both drawing the largest attention of both the media and supporters. Tennis is also a very big sport in the Czech Republic. The many other sports with professional leagues and structures include basketball, volleyball, handball, and field athletics and floorball.Sport is a source of strong waves of patriotism, usually rising several days or weeks before an event. The events considered the most important by Czech fans are: the Hockey World Championships, Olympic Ice hockey tournament, European Football Championship, World Cup and qualification matches for such events. In general, any international match of the Czech ice hockey or football national team draws attention, especially when played against a traditional rival: Germany and Netherlands in football; Russia, Finland, Sweden, States, and Canada in ice hockey; and Slovakia in both. Matches against Germany and Russia possess an additional element of rivalry due to historically political friction, while matches against Slovakia are in large part considered significant because the two countries had been united prior to their separation from each other in the 1993. The Czech Republic also has great influence on tennis with such players as,Wimbledon Championships - Mens Singles finalist Berdych, Wimbledon Championships - Womens Singles champion, Kvitova, Wimbledon Womens Singles title Novotn, Wimbledon Championships  Womens Doubles champion Peschke and 18 time Grand Slam Champion Navratilova.File:Praga 0003.JPG|Astronomical Clock is the oldest working astronomical clock in the world.File:Burgkarlstein01.jpg|Karltejn Castle in the Bohemian Region, founded in 1348 by Charles IV.File:Marienbad-Brunnen.jpg|Lzn, a spa town in the Vary Region.File:CeskyKrumlovNacht.JPG|Krumlov Castle in the Bohemian Region.File:Zamek hluboka 1 beentree.jpg|Royal castle in nad Vltavou, built in the 13th century.File:Jaromr Jgr Russia vs. Czech Republic 2010 Olympics.jpg|Jgr, 2010 Olympics.File:KUTNA HORA (js) 11.jpg|Barbara Church in Hora.File:Moravian Slovak Costumes during Jizda Kralu.jpg|The folk costume of kroje, seen in Vlnov, Moravia.File:Zmek Lednice.jpg|Chateau in Lednice, a village containing a palace and the largest park in the country.File:Cesky Stemberk 01.JPG|esk ternberk is an early gothic castle from the mid 13th century.File:Trebon1024b.jpg|Tebo is a historical town in the Bohemian Region.File:Czech crown jewels.jpg|The precious Crown Jewels are the fourth oldest in Europe.See also* Atlas of Europe* in the Czech Republic* glass* of the Czech Republic* in the Czech Republic* Vary International Film Festival* of Decorative Arts in Prague* Theatre (Prague)* holidays in the Czech Republic* towns in the Czech Republic* in the Czech RepublicLists:* of cities in the Czech Republic* of Czech musical groups* of Czech Republic-related topics* of postal codes in the Czech Republic* of twin towns and sister cities in the Czech Republic* of Czechs* of airports in the Czech Republiclist list }}ReferencesFurther reading* Hochman, Ji. Historical dictionary of the Czech State (1998)External links* Czech Republic.; Government* Governmental website.* Presidential website.* Portal of the Public Administration.* Chamber of Deputies.* Senate.* Chief of State and Cabinet Members.; General information** Czech Republic information from the States Department of State.* Portals to the World from the United States of Congress.* Czech Republic at UCB Libraries GovPubs.*; News* The Prague Post.* CzechNews.* Czech News Agency News.* Prague Daily Monitor.* Radio Prague.; Statistics* Czech Statistical Office.; Travel* Czech Tourism Official travel site of the Czech Republic.* Ckaf:Tsjeggials:Tschechienang:Ceclandar:Checaarc:roa-rup:CehiatchcaChecagn:Chekoaz:exiyazh-min-nan:eskobe:be-x-old:RepublikaRepublicRepublikbo:bs:ekaTchekbg:TxecaCzechcs:eskoco:CechiaTsiecda:Tjekkietpdc:Tschechereide:TschechienBikyahdsb:eskadz:et:Tehhiel:Checaeo:eioChecaErrepublikaRepublicRepublicfo:Kekkiatchquefy:TsjechjeCechena SeicePhobblaght heckgag:ehiyat-SeicCheca - esk republikagan:ko:o Tiekahy:republikahr:ekaio:ChekiaCekoChecie:TchechiaRepublicos:zu:ICekiyais:TkklandCecahe:jv:Ckokl:TjekkiaRepublickrc:ka:Repblikakk:Chekrw:Cekiyaky:sw:Uchekikv:tchquetchkeklad:Chekialtg:ekejala:Cechialv:ehijaRepubliklt:ekijaCecali:TsjechiShekigubyseltruhu:Csehorszgmk:ekaTekexmf:arz:Czechmdf:  my:nah:ChequiaCzechianl:Tsjechinds-nl:Tsjechieja:ce:frr:TschechienRepablikno:Tsjekkiann:TsjekkiaTchquenov:ChekiaChcamhr:uz:ChexiyaRepublicpnb: koi:tchqueCecaRipabliknds:Tschechienpl:Czechypnt:Checakbd:kaa:Shexiyacrh:ehiyaro:Cehiarmy:Chexiyaqu:Chiksuyurue:ru:sah:se:eahkkaRepublicRepublicstq:TschechienekeCecaRepublicss:Shekhisk:eskocu:sl:ekaRepublikaTashiksrn:Tsjekikondresr:Republikasu:Ckofi:Tekkisv:TjeckienTsekott:Xekath:tg:Cumhuriyetitk:ehiaudm:uk:Cecaha Scvo:TsyegnVabariikzh-classical:vls:TsjechiCzekaCekwuu:yi:Olmnirazh-yue:diq:ekstanbat-smg:ekjzh:
5323
Computer_science
Computer science or computing science (abbreviated CS) is the study of the theoretical foundations of information and computation and of practical techniques for their implementation and application in systems.( Computer science and engineering is the systematic study of algorithmic processes-their theory, analysis, design, efficiency, implementation, and application-that describe and transform information.)() Computer scientists invent algorithmic processes that create, describe, and transform information and formulate suitable abstractions to model systems.Computer science has many sub-fields; some, such as complexity theory, study the fundamental properties of problems, while others, such as graphics, emphasize the computation of specific results. Still others focus on the challenges in implementing computations. For example, language theory studies approaches to describe computations, while programming applies specific languages to solve specific computational problems, and interaction focuses on the challenges in making computers and computations useful, usable, and universally accessible to humans.The general public sometimes confuses scientists with other professionals having careers in technology, or think that computer science relates to their own experience with computers, which typically involves activities such as gaming, web-browsing, and word-processing. However, the focus of computer science is more on understanding the properties of the programs used to implement software such as games and web-browsers, and using that understanding to create new programs or improve existing ones.(Common myths and preconceptions about Cambridge Computer Science Computer Science Department, of Cambridge)Computer science deals with the theoretical foundations of information, computation, and with practical techniques for their implementation and application. History The early foundations of what would become computer science predate the invention of the modern computer. Machines for calculating fixed numerical tasks, such as the abacus, have existed since antiquity. Schickard designed the first mechanical calculator in 1623, but did not complete its construction.() Pascal designed and constructed the first working mechanical calculator, the Pascaline, in 1642. Babbage designed a engine and then a general-purpose Engine in Victorian times,() for which Lovelace wrote a manual. Because of this work she is regarded today as the worlds first programmer.() Around 1900, punched card machines were introduced.During the 1940s, as newer and more powerful computing machines were developed, the term computer came to refer to the machines rather than their human predecessors.(The for Computing Machinery (ACM) was founded in 1947.) As it became clear that computers could be used for more than just mathematical calculations, the field of computer science broadened to study computation in general. Computer science began to be established as a distinct academic discipline in the 1950s and early 1960s.((CAM.ac.uk) The worlds first computer science degree program, the Diploma in Computer Science, began at the of Cambridge Computer Laboratory in 1953. The first computer science degree program in the United States was formed at University in 1962.(Computer science pioneer Samuel D. Conte dies at 85 July 1, 2002) Since practical computers became available, many applications of computing have become distinct areas of study in their own right.Although many initially believed it was impossible that computers themselves could actually be a scientific field of study, in the late fifties it gradually became accepted among the greater academic population.() It is the now well-known IBM brand that formed part of the computer science revolution during this time. IBM (short for International Business Machines) released the IBM 704 and later the IBM 709 computers, which were widely used during the exploration period of such devices. Still, working with the IBM computer was frustrating...if you had misplaced as much as one letter in one instruction, the program would crash, and you would have to start the whole process over again.( During the late 1950s, the computer science discipline was very much in its developmental stages, and such issues were commonplace.Time has seen significant improvements in the usability and effectiveness of computer science technology. Modern society has seen a significant shift from computers being used solely by experts or professionals to a more widespread user base. Initially, computers were quite costly, and for their most-effective use, some degree of human aid was needed, in part by professional computer operators. However, as computers became widespread and far more affordable, less human assistance was needed, although residues of the original assistance still remained. Major achievements File:Enigma.jpg|thumb|The German military used the machine (shown here) during War II for communication they thought to be secret. The large-scale decryption of Enigma traffic at Park was an important factor that contributed to Allied victory in WWII.(Despite its short history as a formal academic discipline, computer science has made a number of fundamental contributions to science and society. These include:* The start of the digital revolution, which includes the current Age and the Internet.(Cornell.edu)* A formal definition of computation and computability, and proof that there are computationally unsolvable and intractable problems.()* The concept of a language, a tool for the precise expression of methodological information at various levels of abstraction.()* In cryptography, breaking the Enigma machine was an important factor contributing to the Allied victory in World War II.(David Kahn, Codebreakers, 1967, ISBN 0-684-83130-9.)* computing enabled practical evaluation of processes and situations of great complexity, as well as experimentation entirely by software. It also enabled advanced study of the mind, and mapping of the human genome became possible with the Genome Project.( computing projects such as Folding@home explore folding.* trading has increased the efficiency and liquidity of financial markets by using intelligence, learning, and other statistical and numerical techniques on a large scale.(Black box traders are on the march The Telegraph, August 26, 2006)* Image synthesis, including video by computing individual video frames.* Human language processing, including practical speech-to-text conversion and automated translation of languages* Simulation of various processes, including computational fluid dynamics, physical, electrical, and electronic systems and circuits, as well as societies and social situations (notably war games) along with their habitats, among many others. Modern computers enable optimization of such designs as complete aircraft. Notable in electrical and electronic circuit design are SPICE as well as software for physical realization of new (or modified) designs. The latter includes essential design software for circuits. Philosophy Following Wegner, Amnon H. Eden proposes that there are three paradigms at work in various areas of computer science:()* a rationalist paradigm, which treats computer science as branch of mathematics, which is prevalent in theoretical computer science, and mainly employs reasoning,* a technocratic paradigm, readily identifiable with engineering approaches, most prominent in software engineering, and* a scientific paradigm, which approaches computer-related artifacts from the empirical perspective of sciences, and identifiable in some branches of artificial intelligence (the study of life for instance). Areas of computer science As a discipline, computer science spans a range of topics from theoretical studies of algorithms and the limits of computation to the practical issues of implementing computing systems in hardware and software.()()CSAB, formerly called Computing Sciences Accreditation Board  which is made up of representatives of the for Computing Machinery (ACM), and the Computer Society (IEEE-CS)(CSAB, Inc.)  identifies four areas that it considers crucial to the discipline of computer science: theory of computation, algorithms and data structures, programming methodology and languages, and computer elements and architecture. In addition to these four areas, CSAB also identifies fields such as software engineering, artificial intelligence, computer networking and communication, database systems, parallel computation, distributed computation, computer-human interaction, computer graphics, operating systems, and numerical and symbolic computation as being important areas of computer science.( Theoretical computer science The broader field of computer science encompasses both the classical theory of computation and a wide range of other topics that focus on the more abstract, logical, and mathematical aspects of computing. Theory of computation According to J. Denning, the fundamental question underlying computer science is, What can be (efficiently) automated?() The study of the of computation is focused on answering fundamental questions about what can be computed and what amount of resources are required to perform those computations. In an effort to answer the first question, computability theory examines which computational problems are solvable on various theoretical of computation. The second question is addressed by complexity theory, which studies the time and space costs associated with different approaches to solving a multitude of computational problems.The famous PNP? problem, one of the Prize Problems,(Clay Mathematics Institute PNP) is an open problem in the theory of computation. Information and coding theory Information theory is related to the quantification of information.This was developed by Claude E. Shannon to findfundamental limits on signal processing operations such as compressing data and on reliably storing and communicating data.Coding theory is the study of the properties of codes and their fitness for a specific application. Codes are used for data compression, cryptography, error-correction and more recently also for network coding. Codes are studied for the purpose of designing efficient and reliable data transmission methods. Algorithms and data structures  Programming language theory Programming language theory is a branch of computer science that deals with the design, implementation, analysis, characterization, and classification of languages and their individual features.  It falls within the discipline of computer science, both depending on and affecting mathematics, engineering and linguistics.  It is a well-recognized branch of computer science, and an active research area, with results published in numerous journals dedicated to PLT, as well as in general computer science and engineering publications.{| styleborder:1px solid #ccc; text-align:center; margin:auto; cellspacing15|-| \Gamma\vdash x: \text{Int}| | |-| theory| design| languages|} Formal methods Formal methods are a particular kind of mathematically-based techniques for the specification, development and verification of software and hardware systems. The use of formal methods for software and hardware design is motivated by the expectation that, as in other engineering disciplines, performing appropriate mathematical analysis can contribute to the reliability and robustness of a design. However, the high cost of using formal methods means that they are usually only used in the development of high-integrity systems, where safety or security is of utmost importance. Formal methods are best described as the application of a fairly broad variety of computer science fundamentals, in particular logic calculi, languages, automata theory, and semantics, but also systems and data types to problems in software and hardware specification and verification. Concurrent, parallel and distributed systems Concurrency is a property of systems in which several computations are executing simultaneously, and potentially interacting with each other. A number of mathematical models have been developed for general concurrent computation including nets, calculi and the Random Access Machine model. A distributed system extends the idea of concurrency onto multiple computers connected through a network. Computers within the same distributed system have their own private memory, and information is often exchanged amongst themselves to achieve a common goal. Databases and information retrieval A database is intended to organize, store, and retrieve large amounts of data easily. Digital databases are managed using database management systems to store, create, maintain, and search data, through models and languages. Applied computer science Despite its name, a significant amount of computer science does not involve the study of computers themselves. Because of this, several alternative names have been proposed. Certain departments of major universities prefer the term computing science, to emphasize precisely that difference. Danish scientist Naur suggested the term datalogy, to reflect the fact that the scientific discipline revolves around data and data treatment, while not necessarily involving computers. The first scientific institution to use the term was the Department of Datalogy at the University of Copenhagen, founded in 1969, with Peter Naur being the first professor in datalogy. The term is used mainly in the Scandinavian countries. Also, in the early days of computing, a number of terms for the practitioners of the field of computing were suggested in the Communications of the ACM  turingineer, turologist, flow-charts-man, applied meta-mathematician, and applied epistemologist.(Communications of the ACM 1(4):p.6) Three months later in the same journal, comptologist was suggested, followed next year by hypologist.(Communications of the ACM 2(1):p.4) The term computics has also been suggested.(IEEE Computer 28(12):p.136) In continental Europe, terms derived from information and automatic are often used, e.g. informatique (French), Informatik (German), Informatica (Italian) or informatika (languages) are also used.Renowned computer scientist Edsger Dijkstra once stated: Computer science is no more about computers than astronomy is about telescopes.(Research Methods for Science By Michael P. Marder page 14. Published by Cambridge University Press) The design and deployment of computers and computer systems is generally considered the province of disciplines other than computer science. For example, the study of hardware is usually considered part of engineering, while the study of commercial systems and their deployment is often called technology or systems. However, there has been much cross-fertilization of ideas between the various computer-related disciplines. Computer science research also often intersects other disciplines, such as philosophy, science, linguistics, mathematics, physics, statistics, and logic.Computer science is considered by some to have a much closer relationship with mathematics than many scientific disciplines, with some observers saying that computing is a mathematical science.( Early computer science was strongly influenced by the work of mathematicians such as Gdel and Turing, and there continues to be a useful interchange of ideas between the two fields in areas such as logic, theory, theory, and algebra.The relationship between computer science and engineering is a contentious issue, which is further muddied by disputes over what the term software engineering means, and how computer science is defined. Parnas, taking a cue from the relationship between other engineering and science disciplines, has claimed that the principal focus of computer science is studying the properties of computation in general, while the principal focus of software engineering is the design of specific computations to achieve practical goals, making the two separate but complementary disciplines.(, p. 19: Rather than treat software engineering as a subfield of computer science, I treat it as an element of the set, Civil Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, ...)The academic, political, and funding aspects of computer science tend to depend on whether a department formed with a mathematical emphasis or with an engineering emphasis. Computer science departments with a mathematics emphasis and with a numerical orientation consider alignment with science. Both types of departments tend to make efforts to bridge the field educationally if not across all research. Artificial intelligence This branch of computer science aims to synthesise goal-orientated processes such as problem-solving, decision-making, environmental adaptation, learning and communication which are found in humans and animals. From its origins in cybernetics and in the Dartmouth Conference (1956), artificial intelligence (AI) research has been necessarily cross-disciplinary, drawing on areas of expertise such as mathematics, symbolic logic, semiotics, engineering, of mind, neurophysiology, and intelligence. AI is associated in the popular mind with robotic development, but the main field of practical application has been as an embedded component in areas of development which require computational understanding and modeling such as finance and economics, data mining and the physical sciences.  The starting-point in the late 1940s was Turings question Can computers think?, and the question remains effectively unanswered although the Test is still used to assess computer output on the scale of human intelligence. But the automation of evaluative and predictive tasks  has been increasingly successful as a substitute for human monitoring and intervention in domains of computer application involving complex real-world data.  Computer architecture and engineering Computer architecture, or digital computer organization, is the conceptual design and fundamental operational structure of a computer system. It focuses largely on the way by which the central processing unit performs internally and accesses addresses in memory. The field often involves disciplines of computer engineering and electrical engineering, selecting and interconnection hardware components to create computers that meet functional, performance, and cost goals. Computer graphics and visualization Computer graphics is the study of digital visual contents, and involves syntheses and manipulations of image data. The study is connected to many other fields in computer science, including vision, processing, and geometry, and are heavily applied in the fields of effects and games. Computer security and cryptography Computer security is a branch of computer technology, whose objective includes protection of information from unauthorized access, disruption, or modification while maintaining the accessibility and usability of the system for its intended users. Cryptography is the practice and study of hiding (encryption) and therefore deciphering (decryption) information. Modern cryptography is largely related to computer science, for many encryption and decryption algorithms are based on their computational complexity. Computational science science (or computing) is the field of study concerned with constructing mathematical models and quantitative analysis techniques and using computers to analyze and solve scientific problems. In practical use, it is typically the application of simulation and other forms of computation to problems in various scientific disciplines. Information science  Software engineering Software engineering is the study of designing, implementing, and modifying software in order to ensure it is of high quality, affordable, maintainable, and fast to build. It is a systematic approach to software design, involving the application of engineering practices to software. Academia  Conferences  Journals  Education Some universities teach computer science as a theoretical study of computation and algorithmic reasoning. These programs often feature the of computation, of algorithms, methods, concurrency theory, databases, graphics, and analysis, among others. They typically also teach programming, but treat it as a vessel for the support of other fields of computer science rather than a central focus of high-level study.Other colleges and universities, as well as schools and vocational programs that teach computer science, emphasize the practice of advanced programming rather than the theory of algorithms and computation in their computer science curricula. Such curricula tend to focus on those skills that are important to workers entering the software industry. The process aspects of computer programming are often referred to as engineering.Yet while computer science professions increasingly drive the U.S. economy, computer science education is absent in most American K-12 curricula. A report entitled Running on Empty: The Failure to Teach K-12 Computer Science in the Digital Age was released in October 2010 by Association for Computing Machinery (ACM) and Computer Science Teachers Association (CSTA), and revealed that only 14 states have adopted significant education standards for high school computer science. The report also found that only nine states count high school computer science courses as a core academic subject in their graduation requirements. In tandem with Running on Empty, a new, non-partisan advocacy coalition--Computing in the Core (CinC)--was founded to influence federal and state policy, such as the Computer Science Education Act, which calls for grants to states to develop plans for improving computer science education and supporting computer science teachers. Industry  See also * genealogy of computer scientists* scientist* Computing* of computer science* Informatics* of academic computer science departments* of computer science conferences* of computer scientists* List of open problems in computer science* List of publications in computer science* of pioneers in computer science* of software engineering topics* of computer science* in computing References  Further reading ; Overview* ** Within more than 70 chapters, every one new or significantly revised, one can find any kind of information and references about computer science one can imagine. ... all in all, there is absolute nothing about Computer Science that can not be found in the 2.5 kilogram-encyclopaedia with its 110 survey articles .... (Christoph Meinel, MATH)* ** ... this set is the most unique and possibly the most useful to the computer science community, in support both of teaching and research .... The books can be used by anyone wanting simply to gain an understanding of one of these areas, or by someone desiring to be in research in a topic, or by instructors wishing to find timely information on a subject they are teaching outside their major areas of expertise. (Rocky Ross, News)* ** Since 1976, this has been the definitive reference work on computer, computing, and computer science. ... Alphabetically arranged and classified into broad subject areas, the entries cover hardware, computer systems, information and data, software, the mathematics of computing, theory of computation, methodologies, applications, and computing milieu. The editors have done a commendable job of blending historical perspective and practical reference information. The encyclopedia remains essential for most public and academic library reference collections. (Joe Accardin, Northeastern Illinois Univ., Chicago);Selected papers* ** Covering a period from 1966 to 1993, its interest lies not only in the content of each of these papers &mdash; still timely today &mdash; but also in their being put together so that ideas expressed at different times complement each other nicely. (N. Bernard, Zentralblatt MATH);Articles* Peter J. Denning. Is computer science science?, Communications of the ACM, April 2005.* Peter J. Denning, Great principles in computing curricula, Technical Symposium on Computer Science Education, 2004.* Research evaluation for computer science, Informatics Europe report. Shorter journal version: Bertrand Meyer, Christine Choppy, Jan van Leeuwen and Jorgen Staunstrup, Research evaluation for computer science, in of the ACM, vol. 52, no. 4, pp. 3134, April 2009.; Curriculum and classification* for Computing Machinery. 1998 ACM Computing Classification System. 1998.* Joint Task Force of Association for Computing Machinery (ACM), for Information Systems (AIS) and Computer Society (IEEE-CS). Computing Curricula 2005: The Overview Report. September 30, 2005.* Gibbs, Tucker. A model curriculum for a liberal arts degree in computer science. Communications of the ACM, Volume 29 Issue 3, March 1986. External links * * Scholarly Societies in Computer Science* Best Papers Awards in Computer Science since 1996* Photographs of computer scientists by Meyer* EECS.berkeley.edu; Bibliography and academic search engines* CiteSeerx (article): search engine, digital library and repository for scientific and academic papers with a focus on computer and information science.* DBLP Computer Science Bibliography (article): computer science bibliography website hosted at Universitt Trier, in Germany.* The Collection of Computer Science Bibliographies (article);Webcasts* Directory of free university lectures in Computer Science* Collection of computer science lectures* UCLA Computer Science 1 Freshman Computer Science Seminar Section 1af:Rekenaarwetenskapals:Informatikam:an:Informaticaast:Informticakho-hakbe-x-old:bs:Informatikabr:Urzhiataerezhbg:ca:Informticacs:Informatikada:Datalogide:Informatiket:Informaatikaeml:Informticade la computacineo:Komputadoext:Enhormticaeu:Informatikafo:Teldufrifr:Informatiquefy:Ynformatikafur:Informatichega:Romheolaochtco-earrooaghgl:Informticahy:hr:Raunarstvoio:Informatikokomputeria:Informaticaie:Informatica/tusaumaqattautijjutinik aulattijiitis:Tlvunarfriit:Informaticailisimatusarneqcsb:Infrmatikaht:Enfmatiklad:Informatikala:Informaticalv:Datorzintnelb:Informatiklt:Informatikali:Informaticajbo:samskehu:Szmtstechnikamk:mg:Informatikaltg:Datorzineibakomputer nl:Informaticands-nl:Infermatikaja:frr:Informaatikno:Informatikknn:Informatikknov:Informatikeoc:Informaticamhr:ps:pms:Anformticapl:Informatykada computaoro:Informaticrue:kompjuterikescn:Nfurmticascienceo potaochsl:Raunalnitvosr:sh:Informatikafi:Tietojenksittelytiedesv:Datavetenskappangkompyuterta:th:tg:bilimitk:Informatikauk:ur:Sciencehc my tnhfiu-vro:Informaatigawa:Infrmatikehan komputasyonnosukaaywuu:(Ifitonileti)zh-yue:bat-smg:Infuormatkazh:
